OUTLOOK  FOR  SUMMER  AIR  TRAVEL: 
ADDRESSING  CONGESTION  AND  DELAY 

S.  HRG.  110–1214 

HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON AVIATION OPERATIONS, 

SAFETY, AND SECURITY 

OF THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

SECOND  SESSION 

JULY  15,  2008 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

80–048 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2013 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Mar 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\GPO\DOCS\80048.TXT JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

SECOND  SESSION 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Vice  Chairman 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 
ROGER  F.  WICKER,  Mississippi 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Policy  Director 

CHRISTINE D.  KURTH,  Republican  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

PAUL NAGLE,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

SUBCOMMITTEE  ON  AVIATION  OPERATIONS,  SAFETY,  AND  SECURITY 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia, 

Chairman 

JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas,  Ranking 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 
ROGER  F.  WICKER,  Mississippi 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Mar 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\80048.TXT JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on July 15, 2008 
...............................................................................
Statement of Senator Klobuchar  ............................................................................
Statement of Senator Pryor  ....................................................................................
Statement of Senator Rockefeller  ...........................................................................
Statement of Senator Stevens 
................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

WITNESSES 

Fleming,  Susan,  Director,  Physical  Infrastructure  Issues,  U.S.  Government 
Accountability Office  ............................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Krakowski,  Henry  P.  ‘‘Hank’’,  Chief  Operating  Officer,  Air  Traffic  Organiza-
tion,  Federal  Aviation  Administration;  accompanied  by  Hon.  Tyler  D. 
Duvall,  Assistant  Secretary  for  Transportation  Policy  and  Acting  Under 
Secretary for Policy, Department of Transportation  .........................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Meenan, John M., Executive Vice President and COO, Air Transport Associa-
tion of America, Inc.  .............................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

APPENDIX 

Boxer, Hon. Barbara, U.S. Senator from California, prepared statement  ..........
Smith, Hon. Gordon H., U.S. Senator from Oregon, prepared statement 
..........
Response to written question submitted to Hon. Tyler D. Duvall by: 

Hon. Barbara Boxer 
.........................................................................................
Hon. Daniel K. Inouye  ......................................................................................

Page 
1 
50 
55 
1 
3 
3 

15 
16 

5 
6 

34 
35 

65 
65 

66 
66 

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Mar 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\80048.TXT JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Mar 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\80048.TXT JACKIE

OUTLOOK  FOR  SUMMER  AIR  TRAVEL: 
ADDRESSING  CONGESTION  AND  DELAY 

TUESDAY,  JULY  15,  2008 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON AVIATION OPERATIONS, SAFETY, AND 
SECURITY, 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

U.S. SENATE, 

The Subcommittee met, pursuant to notice, at 10:03 a.m. in room 
SR–253,  Russell  Senate  Office  Building,  Hon.  John  D.  Rockefeller 
IV, Chairman of the Subcommittee, presiding. 

Washington, DC. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN D. ROCKEFELLER IV, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM WEST VIRGINIA 

Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  Well,  we’re  meant  to  have  eight  in  at-

tendance, and they are coming, I do sorely hope. 

Aviation and all of its glories. The summer travel season has ac-
tually gone relatively smoothly, thus far. For those for whom it has 
not  gone  smoothly,  they  will  not  agree  with  that  statement.  But, 
relative  to  what  might  be,  the  weather  has  generally  cooperated. 
The  navigation  infrastructure  improvements  the  FAA  has  brought 
online  last  year,  and  capping  flights  at  New  York’s  three  regional 
airports,  appears  to  have  made  an  impact  on  preventing  the  ex-
traordinary delays that passengers experienced last summer. 

Now,  these  improvements  have  saved  us  from  a  worse  summer, 
but far too many planes still are delayed. I’ve not been in my office 
this morning, but I know three people are going to start screaming 
at  me,  as  soon  as  I  get  there,  because  of  delays.  Far  too  many 
flights are being cancelled. Far too many passengers are still being 
inconvenienced. 

I  met,  recently,  with  the  Chief  Executive  Officer  of  a  major  air-
line—U.S.—and  he  stated  that  the  exploding  cost  of  fuel,  which  is 
about  40  percent  of  the  cost  of  everything  they  do,  has  created  a 
serious and immediate crisis in the industry. However—and this is 
interesting—he  still  believes  that  our  aging  antiquated  air  traffic 
control  system  remains  the  single  biggest  threat  to  the  Nation’s— 
to  the  industry’s  long-term  viability,  and,  I  would  add,  to  our  Na-
tion’s  ability  to  compete  globally.  Mongolia,  as  I  like  to  say,  is 
ahead of us on this count. And—have that as you will. 

The current price of fuel threatens the future of a number of air-
lines. During the Senate debate over the FAA bill, I gave an abso-
lutely  brilliant  speech,  which  nobody  paid  any  attention  to.  But  I 
did, and I enjoyed it, and it—well, I didn’t enjoy it, because it was 
a  dreadful  thing  to  have  to  do.  And  it  was  a  speech  on  the  weak-

(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Mar 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\80048.TXT JACKIE

2 

ened  financial  state  of  the  airline  industry.  And  what  I  said  then 
is much worse now. 

So,  the  airlines  are  cutting  jobs,  they’re  reducing  capacity  and 
adding  a  host  of  new  fees  to  manage  their  current  financial  crises. 
Not  all  are,  but  most  are.  I  believe  that  our  commercial  aviation 
system is teetering, to be quite honest, on the brink of collapse. 

We  hear  that  in  Washington,  and  don’t  pay  much  attention,  be-
cause  everything’s  always  about  to  collapse.  But,  an  aviation  sys-
tem  which  is  losing  money  and  having  to  do  things  which  are  cut-
ting consumers’ capacities to board the airlines, and then all of this 
in the middle of a national recession, is not good. 

The  changes  in  the  industry  are  going  to  be  painful  for  the  air-
lines.  They’re  going  to  be  painful  to  their  employees,  and  they’re 
going  to  be  painful  for  the  communities  that  they  serve,  particu-
larly  the  ones  in  small  states,  such  as  West  Virginia,  which  I  rep-
resent. All of us are going to be affected at some level. 

When  the  current  crisis  abates—and  I  believe  it  will,  in  time;  I 
say  that  without  knowledge,  but  I  say  that  if  you’re  not  optimistic 
in  life,  you  don’t  get  anywhere,  so  I  just  make  that  statement:  it’s 
going  to  abate—the  challenges  and  issues  we  face  in  modernizing 
our  air  traffic  control  system,  if  all  of  these  other  matters  abate, 
that will still be there. 

That  will  still  be  there.  Despite  the  recent  economic  downturn, 
the number of airline passengers will continue to grow. The air taxi 
industry  will  continue  to  expand,  and  more  business  jets  will  com-
pete for the same limited airspace. 

We  all  know  that  the  current  air  traffic  control  system  cannot 
meet  current,  much  less  future,  demand.  I  talk  about  this  end-
lessly, and I will talk about it forever, until it’s fixed. 

And although air travelers have every reason to be unhappy with 
significant  delays  when  traveling,  we  have  to  be  honest,  and  we 
have to tell them that there aren’t any easy solutions, and certainly 
not quick ones. 

We must recognize that unless we invest in our air traffic control 
system, which we are probably going to do, although not this year, 
but  when  we  do  our  authorization,  probably  next  year,  which  is  a 
story  in  itself,  our  airports  can  adopt  policies  that  allow  for  eco-
nomically viable airlines, the situation’s going to get worse, a whole 
lot  worse,  before  it  gets  better.  When  we  take  up  the  reauthoriza-
tion  of  the  FAA  again,  in  all  likelihood  next  year,  Congress  will 
again  be  faced  with  the  challenge  of  finding  a  way  to  pay  for  the 
billions  in  air  traffic  control  infrastructure  that  the  system  needs. 
This change will remain—the need for this change. 

This  hearing  is  going  to  provide  the  Subcommittee  the  ability  to 
assess  the  effectiveness  of  the  policies  that  FAA  has  put  in  place 
to  address  congestion  and  airline  delays  this  summer.  And  they 
have made some progress. 

The  hearing  will  also  give  us  an  opportunity  to  explore  how  the 
changes  in  the  airline  industry  will  affect  congestion  delays,  how 
pieces  of  the  country  and  airports—how  they  interact  with  each 
other. I have very specific questions on that. And all of this, in both 
the near and the long term. 

Despite  the  first  weeks  of  summer  air  travel  season  is  going,  as 
I  indicated,  relatively  well,  with  some  exceptions,  we  cannot  guar-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Mar 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\80048.TXT JACKIE

3 

antee  that  the  weather  will  hold—it  doesn’t  totally  appear  to  me 
that  it  has  held,  but  that  it  will  stay  at  least  as  good  as  it  is—or 
some  other  event  will  not  create  havoc  in  the  skies  creating  mas-
sive disruptions for airlines and their passengers. 

But,  every  time  the  aviation  system  collapses  under  the  strains 
of weather or equipment failures, it’s another dramatic and painful 
reminder of how much work we have to do to make sure our Nation 
has  a  modern  air  traffic  control  system  capable  of  meeting  our  fu-
ture needs. 

Those  are  my  comments.  And  when  Senator  Stevens  arrives, 

which he will, I will ask for some comments from him. 

But,  I  seem  to  be  having  my  own  hearing,  here,  and  I’m  going 

to enjoy it. 

[Laughter.] 
Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  Mr.  Krakowski,  I  think  that  many  pas-

sengers become frustrated—— 

Ah,  Senator  Stevens.  We  cannot  proceed  without  an  opening 
statement  from  you,  sir.  Comments,  ruminations,  we  accept  any-
thing. 

STATEMENT OF HON. TED STEVENS, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM ALASKA 

Senator STEVENS. Have you finished? 
Senator ROCKEFELLER. I have. 
Senator  STEVENS.  I  missed  that  statement?  Good  morning.  I’m 
sorry  to  be  late.  I’ll  just  ask  that  you  put  my  statement  in  the 
record as though read, and we will proceed with the witnesses. 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. Well, that’s disappointing, but I will obey 

your wishes. 
[Laughter.] 
Senator STEVENS. Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Senator Stevens follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. TED STEVENS, U.S. SENATOR FROM ALASKA 

Thank  you,  Senator  Rockefeller,  for  holding  today’s  hearing.  The  summer  travel 
season  last  year  was  certainly  difficult  for  both  the  airlines  and  their  passengers, 
and the airline delays and cancellations experienced so far this year have impacted 
the travel schedules of many travelers. 

This coupled with the announced airline capacity reductions and workforce reduc-
tions,  has  made  for  a  very  difficult  summer  and  the  situation  does  not  look  any 
brighter for the rest of the year. 

While  most  of  the  traveling  public  has  become  tolerant  of  modest  flight  delays, 
government agencies and the airlines need to take note of the lessons learned from 
previous  summers.  I  recognize  delays  will  never  be  avoided  altogether,  but  how  we 
deal with them and track them can certainly be improved. 

I  understand  the  frustration  felt  as  a  result  of  airline  delays  and  cancellations. 
When  I  travel  to  Alaska,  on  average,  the  flight  time  to  transit  from  Washington 
D.C.  to  Anchorage,  can  take  almost  10  hours  and  that  doesn’t  include  additional 
time due to flight delays. 

With  the  financial  state  of  the  airline  industry,  rising  fuel  costs,  and  a  downturn 
in the economy, the Government and the airlines are faced with the near impossible 
challenge of coping with those factors while at the same time developing and imple-
menting a modern air traffic control system to reduce delay and congestion. 

The  Department  of  Transportation,  the  Federal  Aviation  Administration,  and 
Congress are in an opportune position to significantly modernize our antiquated air 
traffic control system and should make every effort to take advantage of that oppor-
tunity.  Coordination  between  the  government  and  industry  on  this  effort  is  essen-
tial. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Mar 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80048.TXT JACKIE

4 

Our  Nation  also  is  confronted  with  a  troubling  energy  crisis  as  well.  The  cost  of 
airline operations are increasing due to rising fuel costs, which has the greatest im-
pact  on  rural  states  like  Alaska.  The  industry  is  going  to  have  to  restructure  itself 
in order to become solvent, and it is important it is done quickly. 

The time is now to confront our energy needs and an essential component of that 
solution is producing and utilizing our domestic oil and gas reserves to increase sup-
ply.  The  effect  of  utilizing  domestic  oil  and  gas  reserves  will  go  a  long  way  toward 
bringing fuel prices down and creating a more stable aviation transportation system. 
I  look  forward  to  hearing  from  the  witnesses  on  this  issue  and  working  with  my 

colleagues and the industry to construct solutions to this problem. 

Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  I  was  just  going  to  ask  Mr.  Krakowski 
the—and  I  should  identify  each  of  these  folks.  And  Hank 
Krakowski is the Chief Operating Officer of the Air Traffic Organi-
zation,  Federal  Aviation  Administration;  Mr.  Tyler  Duvall,  Acting 
Under  Secretary  of  Transportation  for  Policy,  U.S.  Department  of 
Transportation;  Ms.  Susan  Fleming,  Director  of  Physical  Infra-
structure,  Government  Accountability  Office—I  envy  you,  not;  Mr. 
John  Meenan—and  there  was  a  question  as  to  whether  you  were 
going to be here. 

Mr. MEENAN. Not from me, Mr. Chairman. 
Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  Is  that  right?  OK.  Well,  anyway,  you’re 
here,  and  I’m  glad.  And  you’re  the  Executive  Vice  President  and 
Chief Operating Officer of the Air Transportation Association, so it 
was important that you do be here. 

Mr. Krakowski, this is about delay. I want to understand it, and 
I  want  to  help  you  understand—the  Committee  as  a  whole  before 
you here, to help us understand how this works. 

I  think  many  passengers  become  frustrated  when  they  see  clear 
weather outside and cannot understand why their flight is delayed 
because  of  weather  or  air  traffic  control  problems.  I’d  like  you  to 
walk  me  and  other  members  of  this  Committee  through  how  the 
National Airspace System, NAS, is affected by, say, severe weather 
in  Chicago  or  New  York.  Please  describe  what  actions  FAA  takes 
when  weather  or  other  events  force  you  to  stop  traffic  into  an  air-
port,  or  greatly  reduce  the  operations  at  an  airport.  I  want  the 
Committee to know how problems in one region of the country can 
cascade into systemwide delays, how all of this system sort of oper-
ates  together—O’Hare,  LaGuardia,  Peterborough,  Newark,  the 
whole—Atlanta,  everything.  And  please  describe  how  FAA  begins 
to  get  the  system  again  running  smoothly  after  the  weather  has 
passed. 

And  then,  Mr.  Meenan,  I’d  like  to  have  you,  sir,  add  your 
thoughts  on  whether  the  airlines  are  generally  pleased  with  how 
FAA handles delays. 

So,  just  take  us  through  and  do  this  interconnection  of  airports 
and  the  special  problem  in  the  Northeast  and  the  rest  of  it.  Just 
have at it. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Mar 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80048.TXT JACKIE

5 

STATEMENT  OF  HENRY  P. 

‘‘HANK’’  KRAKOWSKI,  CHIEF 
OPERATING  OFFICER,  AIR  TRAFFIC  ORGANIZATION, 
FEDERAL  AVIATION  ADMINISTRATION;  ACCOMPANIED  BY 
HON.  TYLER  D.  DUVALL,  ASSISTANT  SECRETARY  FOR 
TRANSPORTATION POLICY AND ACTING UNDER SECRETARY 
FOR POLICY, DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION 
Mr. KRAKOWSKI. OK, thank you, Mr. Chairman. Senator Stevens, 

good to see you. 

I will also come from the context of actually being—— 
Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  Oh,  yes.  I  made  a  rather  large  mistake. 
I  have  no  right  to  ask  questions  until  you  have  given  statements. 
And so, Mr. Krakowski, will you so do? 

Mr. KRAKOWSKI. Would you like me to read the whole statement, 

or submit—— 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. No, not particularly. 
[Laughter.] 
Mr. KRAKOWSKI. OK. 
Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  But,  because  of  the  question  that  you 
were  about  to  answer,  I  have  to  assume  your  mind  is  so  concise 
and so ordered that you can boil it down to a nice 5 minutes. 

Mr. KRAKOWSKI. Very good. OK. 
With  me  today  is  Tyler  Duvall,  the  Department  of  Transpor-
tation  Acting  Under  Secretary  for  Policy.  He  will  be  available  to 
answer questions relative to consumer issues and slots at congested 
airports. I’ll stay more on the operational side, which is what I do. 
I’d like to start with something Bobby Sturgell said to our people. 
This 4th of July, we saw a 30-percent dropoff in traffic—35 percent 
in IFR traffic. This is one of the biggest drops we’ve seen in a holi-
day  period  ever.  With  the  announcements  that  we’ve  already  seen 
from the airlines, we’re looking at a potential of a 10-percent reduc-
tion  of  operations  by  year’s  end.  If  you  look  at  the  small  airlines 
that have just gone out of business, we see 700 flights already com-
ing  out  of  the  system.  So,  we’re  really  seeing,  the  pressure  of  the 
system go down, overall. 

But,  unfortunately,  because  many  of  those  reductions  are  not 
happening  at  the  big  hubs,  like  Kennedy  Airport  and  Newark  and 
O’Hare,  you’re  going  to  see  less  of  an  effect,  in  terms  of  delay  im-
provement  when  the  weather  gets  bad,  because  that’s  where 
they’re  keeping  their  assets,  and  that’s  where  they’re  keeping  the 
operations  going.  And  that’s  what’s  happened  in  previous  reces-
sionary  times,  or  post-9/11;  the  big  hubs  tend  to  keep  the  traffic. 

But—— 
Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  So,  we’ll  need  to  discuss  America’s  pull-

Mr. KRAKOWSKI. Yes. I think all of this is something to consider. 
And,  you  know,  we,  at  FAA,  are  watching  this  very  carefully,  be-
cause as we try to figure out how to manage the system as the air-
lines redeploy their assets into their new route structures to accom-
modate  these  aircraft  pulldowns,  we  have  to  be  able  to  serve  that 
effectively for them. So, it’s of great interest to us, obviously. 

But,  in  actuality,  to  your  question,  70  percent  of  the  delays  do 
come  from  weather  and  are  driven  by  weather  in  the  system,  but 
we’re trying to do some things to help mitigate that. We have new 
routes  over  the  Atlantic,  particularly  from  the  Caribbean  up 

out, right? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Mar 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80048.TXT JACKIE

6 

through  Boston,  up  through  the  oceanic  airspace  into  Europe, 
which  is  helping  reduce  some  delay.  We  have  some  new  routes 
coming westbound out of New York, so we can now offload the air-
port  faster  when  the  weather  clears—again,  to  your  question. 
These  are  playbook  routes,  new  routes  that  we’ve  put  into  effect. 
We  think  we’ve  increased  our  collaboration  with  industry  in  our 
convective weather forecasting abilities as we work the tactical op-
eration  every  day.  And,  more  importantly,  we  have  new  tools,  so 
that  when  slots  become  open  because  airlines  cancel  flights,  more 
so  now  this  year  than  last  year,  we  can  actually  move  flights  into 
those  slots  much  faster,  much  more  effectively,  and  I  think  that 
benefits  everybody.  That  program’s  called  ‘‘adaptive  compression.’’ 
Probably the most significant improvement we’re looking forward 
to  this  year  are  three  new  runways—at  Chicago  O’Hare,  Seattle, 
and Washington/Dulles. Particularly at Chicago, which has a lot of 
crossing  runway  issues,  when  you  start  to  straighten  out  the  air-
ports and add parallel runways, that is a significant safety and ca-
pacity improvement that we’re looking forward to. 

Of  course,  there  is  NextGen,  the  modernization  program.  We’re 
going  to  be  deploying  the  ADS–B  technology  through  Florida  this 
year  as,  the  first  model,  the  first  laboratory  to  use  this  new  tech-
nology,  which  is  foundational  to  our  NextGen  program  going  for-
ward, and we thank the Committee’s help with supporting that, as 
well. 

And, of course, up in New York we have 77 initiatives that we’re 
working  on.  We  have  over  17  of  those  done  for  the  summer  travel 
period. As you pointed out, Mr. Chairman, we believe they’re effec-
tive.  We  actually  do  see  delay  reduction  at  New  York  Kennedy’s 
Airport  because  of  these,  also  at  Newark,  a  little  less  so  at 
LaGuardia. 

The  Department  of  Transportation  has  several  other  policy  ef-
forts  underway  in  the  New  York  region  related  to  the  congestion 
and the rulemaking. My colleague Mr. Duvall will be happy to ad-
dress those topics during the question-and-answer period. 

That concludes my remarks, sir. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Krakowski follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HENRY P. ‘‘HANK’’ KRAKOWSKI, CHIEF OPERATING OFFICER, 
AIR TRAFFIC ORGANIZATION,  FEDERAL AVIATION ADMINISTRATION;  ACCOMPANIED 
BY HON.  TYLER D.  DUVALL,  ASSISTANT SECRETARY FOR TRANSPORTATION POLICY 
AND ACTING UNDER SECRETARY FOR POLICY, DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION 
Chairman Rockefeller, Senator Hutchison, Members of the Subcommittee: 
Thank  you  for  inviting  me  here  to  testify  about  aviation  congestion  and  delays. 
With me today is Tyler D. Duvall, Assistant Secretary for Transportation Policy and 
Acting  Under  Secretary  for  Policy  from  the  Department  of  Transportation  (DOT). 
With the summer travel season upon us, the Federal Aviation Administration (FAA) 
and the DOT have a number of efforts underway to address aviation congestion and 
delays. 
State of the Industry 

In  order  to  frame  the  issues  properly,  we  must  first  take  a  look  at  the  state  of 
the  aviation  industry  today.  Record  oil  prices,  a  slowing  economy,  and  increased 
competition  are  just  a  few  factors  that  have  created  a  number  of  significant  chal-
lenges for airlines—challenges that certainly will change the face of the aviation in-
dustry in the years to come. 

To  meet  these  challenges,  many  carriers  are  raising  fares,  streamlining  oper-
ations,  and  reducing  service.  With  a  few  notable  exceptions—JFK,  Denver  and  San 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Mar 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80048.TXT JACKIE

7 

Francisco,  for  example—air  traffic  is  down.  General  aviation  operations  are  also 
down, due to fuel and insurance costs, further de-stressing the system. System-wide, 
FAA  data  shows  the  number  of  flights  have  decreased  just  over  2  percent,  com-
paring May 2008 to May 2007. 

While  airlines  are  announcing  reductions  in  service,  and  air  traffic  overall  is 
down,  it  is  likely  that  the  busiest  and  most  congested  airports,  particularly  in  the 
New  York/New  Jersey  region,  will  not  see  a  significant  reduction.  Even  if  they  do 
see  a  downturn  in  the  short  run,  history  tells  us  that  the  aviation  industry  is  very 
cyclical and that service will eventually return to—and exceed—the record levels we 
saw  last  year.  Of  the  current  delay  minutes,  32.9  percent  were  at  the  three  largest 
airports  in  the  New  York  area  (Newark  Liberty  International,  LaGuardia  Airport, 
and  John  F.  Kennedy  International  Airport),  as  compared  to  33.4  percent  from  last 
year.  Approximately  one-third  of  the  Nation’s  flights  and  one-sixth  of  the  world’s 
flights either start or traverse the airspace that supports the New York/New Jersey/ 
Philadelphia (NY/NJ/PHL) region. 

In  2007,  the  aviation  industry  recorded  the  second  worst  year  for  delays  since 
1995; 27 percent of flights were delayed or canceled in 2007. Both the frequency and 
the  severity  of  ground  delays  were  unprecedented.  The  costs  of  delays  are  huge— 
the  Senate  Joint  Economic  Committee  estimates  that  last  year  flight  delays  alone 
cost  passengers,  airlines,  and  the  U.S.  economy  over  $40  billion.  Additionally,  the 
Travel  Industry  Association  estimates  that  air  travelers  avoided  over  41  million 
trips last year—leading to lost revenues and taxes of over $26 billion. 

Even  if  carriers  reduce  flights  this  summer  enough  to  reduce  congestion,  we  still 
must  do  something  to  fix  the  problems  that  caused  last  summer’s  horrible  delays. 
We  continue  to  work  toward  developing  and  providing  solutions  for  all  of  the  users 
of the Nation’s airspace system. 

As  we  frame  the  problem,  we  should  note  that  we  are  living  in  the  safest  period 
in aviation history and we are constantly striving to make it safer still. In the past 
10  years,  the  commercial  fatal  accident  rate  has  dropped  57  percent.  General  avia-
tion  accidents  are  down.  Safety  is  and  will  always  be  the  primary  goal  of  the  FAA. 
Nothing  we  do  to  address  congestion  and  delays  will  compromise  the  FAA’s  safety 
mandate. 
Summer 2008 

A  snapshot  of  the  system  comparing  May  2008  to  May  2007  for  the  35  Oper-
ational Evolution Partnership airports is telling. As you know, we had far more se-
vere  weather  during  May  2008  than  we  had  in  May  2007,  particularly  in  the  Mid-
west. Previously, this would have caused major delays throughout the NAS, and had 
the FAA done nothing, we would have seen thousands of delayed and stranded pas-
sengers all over the country. Instead, our projected data estimates that the average 
minutes  of  delay  for  all  flights  decreased  slightly  (by  almost  1  percent),  while  the 
number of flights with more than 1 hour of delay decreased by 8 percent. Although 
the data from the Bureau of Transportation Statistics has not been finalized, we are 
expecting  to  see  that  cancellations  for  May  2008  have  decreased  approximately  8 
percent and on-time arrivals increased nearly 1 percent over May of last year. 

According to FAA data, bad weather causes 70 percent of all delays. The situation 
is  worse  during  the  summer,  unlike  winter  storms,  which  take  time  to  develop  and 
move  slowly,  summer  storms  can  form  quickly,  stretch  for  hundreds  of  miles  and 
travel  rapidly  over  large  portions  of  the  country,  grounding  flights  and  sending 
chain reaction delays throughout the NAS. While we cannot control the weather, we 
can  control  how  we  manage  the  delays.  With  new  dispersal  headings,  the  use  of 
Adaptive Airspace Flow Programs (detailed below), new westbound departure routes 
out  of  New  York,  and  other  improvements,  we  are  dealing  more  effectively  with 
delays, using people, procedures, and technology. 

In  1998,  the  FAA  initiated  Collaborative  Decision  Making  (CDM),  which  rep-
resented  a  change  in  how  the  FAA  communicates  with  the  airlines  in  order  to  re-
duce  delays.  Prior  to  CDM,  airlines  were  hesitant  to  share  certain  information  for 
competitive  reasons.  Airlines  now  share  schedule  information  with  the  FAA’s  Com-
mand  Center  in  Herndon,  VA,  including  flight  delays,  cancellations  and  newly  cre-
ated  flights.  The  Command  Center  uses  this  information  to  monitor  airport  arrival 
demand and take steps to reduce delays caused by heavy traffic and severe weather. 
Daily teleconferences are held every 2 hours between FAA air traffic managers, the 
airlines,  and  general  aviation  users,  to  discuss  problems  affecting  capacity  in  the 
system  and  decide  the  most  efficient,  and  collaborative  solution  as  these  situations 
arise. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Mar 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80048.TXT JACKIE

8 

For  2008,  the  FAA  is  implementing  a  number  of  new  procedures  and  tools  to  en-

hance this system and to help manage and reduce congestion, outlined below: 

Western Atlantic Route System 
This initiative will increase capacity along the East Coast over the Atlantic this 
summer  by  reducing  lateral  separation  from  90  miles  to  50  miles  for  aircraft 
with  avionics  that  provide  an  appropriate  level  of  accuracy.  The  area  includes 
parts  of  Miami  and  New  York  high  altitude  airspace,  as  well  as  the  San  Juan 
Center Radar Approach Control airspace. 
In  the  past,  lateral  separation  in  oceanic  airspace  has  been  set  at  90  miles  be-
tween  aircraft  to  maintain  safe  separation.  This  initiative  takes  advantage  of 
more  precise  aircraft  position  technology  to  allow  for  more  Atlantic  routes,  20 
more transition route fixes and ultimately more access to the available airspace. 
The procedures became fully operational on June 5, 2008. 
New Playbook Routes 
Playbook  routes  are  pre-coordinated  routes  that  are  developed  to  route  aircraft 
around  convective  weather.  New  playbook  routes  will  be  in  place  this  summer 
to  provide  alternate  route  options  during  periods  of  severe  weather.  Nineteen 
new  playbook  routes  will  be  available,  including  four  Virginia  Capes  Area 
(VACAPES)  routes  designed  for  use  in  military  airspace  when  it  is  available. 
Integrated Collaborative Rerouting Tool 
This  is  a  new  automated  tool  that  depicts  constrained  airspace  to  airlines  and 
other  users  of  the  NAS.  This  alleviates  the  need  for  the  FAA  to  implement  re-
quired  reroutes,  which  may  be  less  favorable  to  the  users.  It  gives  the  airlines 
scheduling options and a more efficient utilization of the available airspace. The 
tool  will  allow  pilots  to  provide  early  intent  of  their  preferred  routing  around 
constrained areas, such as storms-affected areas. 
Adaptive Airspace Flow Programs (AFPs) 
The  Airspace  Flow  Program  was  deployed  in  June  2006  and  enables  the  FAA 
to manage adjustments to changing weather patterns. This is crucial during the 
summer  convective  weather  season  when  storms  grow  rapidly  and  move  across 
large swaths of the country. Before the FAA developed the technology to imple-
ment  AFPs,  the  FAA’s  primary  tool  was  a  ground  delay  programs  to  prevent 
aircraft from taking off if they were headed for a delayed airport from any direc-
tion. Ground delay programs remain valuable under appropriate circumstances, 
but  sometimes  have  the  unintended  consequence  of  delaying  flights  that  would 
otherwise not encounter severe weather. 
Last  summer  from  May  2  through  August  30,  2007,  a  total  of  58  AFPs  were 
used.  Use  of  these  AFPs  provided  approximately  $68  million  in  savings  for  the 
airlines. AFPs, which focus on particular areas in the sky where severe weather 
is expected, generally are a more equitable and efficient way of handling flights 
during severe weather. 
The  Adaptive  Airspace  Flow  Program  is  an  enhancement  to  the  original  pro-
gram.  This  summer,  the  FAA  can  adjust  the  parameters  of  an  AFP  based  on 
changing  weather  intensity,  providing  a  more  effective  way  to  manage  traffic 
during severe summer storms that will minimize delays. 
Using  AFPs,  the  FAA  is  able  to  target  only  those  flights  that  are  expected  to 
encounter severe weather. The targeted flights are issued an Expect Departure 
Clearance  Time  (EDCT),  giving  the  airlines  the  option  to  accept  a  delayed,  but 
predictable  departure  time,  to  take  a  longer  route  to  fly  around  the  weather  or 
to make alternate plans. 
Adaptive Compression 
This  program,  launched  in  March  2007,  automatically  identifies  unused  arrival 
slots  at  airports  affected  by  AFP  or  ground  delays  and  moves  other  flights  into 
those slots. This means that maximum arrival rates will be maintained, easing 
congestion and delays. Adaptive Compression saved $27 million for the airlines 
and  1.1  million  delay  minutes  for  the  airlines  and  the  flying  public  in  its  first 
year of operation. 
Expanding Capacity 

Expanding capacity in the overall NAS is always our preference, both on land and 
in the air. Airport capacity is critical. Along with our partners in the airport commu-
nity,  we  have  achieved  significant  progress  in  increasing  capacity  and  we  intend  to 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Mar 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80048.TXT JACKIE

9 

continue  to  support  this  with  our  ongoing  airport  improvement  programs.  A  brief 
overview  of  the  status  of  recent  airport  projects  as  well  as  projects  in  the  planning 
stages might be helpful. 

The 35 airports included in the Operational Evolution Partnership (OEP) account 
for about 75 percent of all passenger enplanements. Much of the delay in air traffic 
can be traced to inadequate ‘‘throughput’’ (measured as arrival and departure rates) 
at  these  airports.  Airfield  construction  (new  runways,  runway  extensions,  new 
taxiways, end around perimeter taxiways, and airfield reconfigurations) is the most 
effective  method  of  increasing  throughput.  Consequently,  constructing  new  and/or 
extending  runways,  taxiways,  and  airfield  reconfiguration  are  solution  sets  of  the 
OEP’s Airport Development Domain. 

Arrival and departure rates at the Nation’s busiest airports are constrained by the 
limited  number  of  runways  that  can  be  in  active  use  simultaneously.  The  addition 
of  new  and  extended  runways  or  airfield  reconfigurations  will  expand  airport 
throughput at the target airports, and possibly for other airports in the same metro-
politan area. In most cases the airfield projects are sufficient to keep pace with fore-
casted  demand.  Since  FY  2000,  14  of  the  35  OEP  airports  have  opened  15  airfield 
projects  (including  13  new  runways  providing  20  miles  of  new  runway  pavement, 
1  end  around  taxiway,  and  1  airfield  reconfiguration).  The  projects  have  provided 
these airports with the potential to accommodate 1.6 million more annual operations 
and decrease average delay per operation at these airports by about 5 minutes, and 
reduce  the  potential  for  runway  incursions.  The  complete  listing  of  airfield  projects 
included in the OEP is shown in the table below. 

Airport 

Date Opened 

Philadelphia 
Phoenix 
Detroit 
Cleveland 

Denver 
Miami 
Houston 
Orlando 
Minneapolis-St. Paul 
Cincinnati/No. KY 
Lambert-St. Louis 
Atlanta Hartsfield 
Boston Logan 
Atlanta End Around Taxiway 
Los Angeles (Reconfiguration—Relocated 
Runway and Center Taxiway) 

December 1999 
October 2000 
December 2001 
December 2002 (Phase 1—1st 7,145 feet) 
August 2004 (1,775 runway extension) 
September 2003 
September 2003 
October 2003 
December 2003 
October 2005 
December 2005 
April 2006 
June 2006 
November 2006 
April 2007 
Relocated RW April 2007 
Center TW June 2008 

The  total  cost  of  these  projects  is  $5.6  billion  with  approximately  $1.9  billion  in 
Airport  Improvement  Program  (AIP)  grant  funding.  End  around  taxiways  provide 
another  means  to  decrease  delays  at  a  busy  airport  by  providing  an  alternative  to 
having aircraft cross an active runway. With the opening of the end around taxiway 
at  Atlanta  in  April  2007  about  612  runway  crossings  per  day  were  eliminated  at 
the busiest airport in the U.S. 

Currently,  seven  OEP  airports  have  airfield  projects  (3  new  runways,  1  airfield 
reconfiguration,  1  runway  extension,  and  2  taxiways)  under  construction.  The 
projects will be commissioned through 2012 and will provide these airports with the 
potential  to  accommodate  about  400,000  more  annual  operations,  decrease  average 
delay  per  operation  by  almost  2  minutes,  and  significantly  reducing  runway  cross-
ings.  The  cost  of  the  7  airfield  projects,  listed  below,  is  approximately  $3.9  billion 
with about $1.2 billion in AIP funding. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Mar 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80048.TXT JACKIE

10 

Airport 

Anticipated Opening Date 

Seattle-Tacoma 
Washington Dulles 
Chicago O’Hare Runway 

9R/27L extension 
Runway 10C/28C 

Philadelphia Runway Extension 
Dallas-Ft. Worth End Around Taxiway 
Boston Logan Centerfield Taxiway 
Charlotte 

November 2008 
November 2008 
November 2008 

September 2008 
Late 2011 
March 2009 
December 2008 
November 2009 
February 2010 

There are also ten other projects (3 airfield reconfigurations, 3 runway extensions, 
and  4  new  runways)  are  in  the  planning  or  environmental  stage  at  OEP  airports 
through 2017. 

Airport or 

Metropolitan Area 

Project 

Ft. Lauderdale 
Philadelphia 
Portland Int’l 
Houston Intercontinental 
Denver Int’l 
Chicago O’Hare 
Los Angeles 

Washington Dulles 
Salt Lake City 

Extension 
Reconfiguration 
Extension 
New Runway 
New Runway 
Reconfiguration—Phase 2 
Reconfiguration—North 
Runway Complex 
New Runway 
Runway Extension 

Tampa 

Runway 

Completion of 

Environmental Study 

(Estimated) 

2008 
2009 
2008 
TBD 
TBD 
2005 

TBD—Reconfiguration 
studies are in progress 

2005 

TBD—Planning will begin 

around 2010 

TBD—Planning will being 

around 2013 

In  addition,  four  communities  (Chicago,  Las  Vegas,  Atlanta  and  San  Francisco) 
have  planning  or  environmental  studies  underway  to  examine  how  their  metropoli-
tan area will accommodate future demand for aviation. 

Metro Area 

Study 

Sponsor 

Purpose 

Chicago 

New Airport  State of Illinois  EIS/Master  Plan  covering  development 

for the Inaugural Airport is on hold. 

Las Vegas 

New Airport  Clark County 

Atlanta 

Regional 

City of Atlanta 

San Francisco 

Regional 

San Francisco 
Metro 
Transportation 
Commission 

EIS  Notice  of  Intent  published  in  Sept. 

2006. 

Explore options for how commercial avia-
tion demand can be met in the Atlanta 
metropolitan  area.  The  study  will  be 
coordinated  with  all  levels  of  local/ 
state government and will take 2 years 
to complete. 

A  study  is  being  undertaken  to  examine 
aviation  demand  in  the  San  Francisco 
Metropolitan Area. 

AIP  program  planning  will  continue  to  reflect  a  special  emphasis  on  increasing 

capacity and improving the airport arrival efficiency rate. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Mar 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80048.TXT JACKIE

Controller Staffing 

11 

We  know  that  controller  staffing  and  how  it  affects  delays  are  issues  of  concern 
to  this  Committee.  The  FAA  is  its  workforce,  and  we  consider  controller  staffing 
issues  to  be  of  the  utmost  importance  to  maintaining  the  safest  aviation  system  in 
the world. To deal with the long-predicted retirement eligibility of today’s generation 
of  controllers,  the  FAA  began  a  large-scale  recruitment  and  selection  process  to  re-
build  the  controller  workforce.  By  1992,  the  controller  workforce  was  once  again 
fully  staffed.  However,  the  realities  were  that,  because  of  the  concentrated,  post- 
strike period of hiring, the FAA would have to once again begin a major recruitment 
effort as these controllers began to age out of the system. The vast numbers of con-
trollers  hired  in  the  1980s  were  long-predicted  to  retire  once  they  reached  retire-
ment eligibility after 25 years of service. 

To deal with this, the FAA initially developed a 10-year controller workforce staff-
ing  plan  in  2004,  which  we  refine  each  year.  In  2007,  the  anticipated  retirement 
wave  of  controllers  began,  and  we  project  that  retirements  will  continue  to  hit 
record numbers in 2008 and 2009. Our strategic hiring plan takes into account both 
projected  retirements  as  well  as  expected  attrition  in  new  hires.  From  2008–2017, 
we plan to hire approximately 17,000 new air traffic controllers. 

To  achieve  these  ambitious  goals,  the  FAA  has  been  recruiting  aggressively 
through a variety of traditional and non-traditional outlets. In an effort to diversify 
our workforce, we are actively recruiting more women and minorities, as well as dis-
abled veterans. And, in October 2007, the FAA chose an additional nine colleges and 
universities to be part of the Air Traffic Collegiate Training Initiative (AT–CTI) pro-
gram,  which  brings  the  number  of  schools  currently  in  the  program  to  23.  We  plan 
to continue to offer the opportunity to other schools to apply to the program. 

We have also been offering a recruitment bonus of up to $20,000 for qualified new 
hires  and  offering  retention  incentives  to  retirement-eligible  controllers  on  a  case- 
by-case  basis.  Retention  bonuses  are  typically  25  percent  of  an  individual’s  salary 
with  a  cap  of  $25,000.  Controllers  may  also  be  eligible  for  relocation  and  reassign-
ment  bonuses  for  certain  key  facilities.  Thus  far,  44  retention  bonuses  have  been 
accepted, and another 26 are pending consideration. 

Thus  far,  we  have  increased  our  controller  workforce  by  a  net  gain  of  256  in  FY 
2007, and we are on target to increase it an additional 256, to an end of year target 
of  15,130  for  FY  2008.  The  President’s  budget  for  FY  2009  calls  for  a  further  net 
increase  of  over  300  controllers.  Given  the  current  airline  reductions  and  current 
staffing statistics, we believe our staffing goals and plans are on target. 
NextGen 

In addition to ensuring sufficient controller staffing, we need to put the right tools 
into  our  controllers’  hands.  Our  long-term  plan  to  address  congestion  and  delays  is 
the  Next  Generation  Air  Transportation  System  (NextGen).  We  appreciate  this 
Committee’s  strong  support  for  the  NextGen  effort.  NextGen  will  transform  the 
aviation  system  and  how  we  control  air  traffic.  We  must  be  able  to  handle  the  de-
mands  of  the  future  for  aviation  travel—projected  to  be  one  billion  passengers  by 
2015—particularly  in  areas  (such  as  New  York/New  Jersey)  where  capacity  cannot 
be expanded. 

As  you  know,  NextGen  is  a  steady,  deliberate,  and  highly  collaborative  under-
taking,  which  focuses  on  leveraging  our  latest  technologies,  such  as  satellite-based 
navigation, surveillance and network-centric systems. It is designed to be flexible to 
take advantage of even newer and better technologies as they become available. We 
want to make sure that our air transportation system can accommodate innovations 
without  becoming  entrenched  in  technology  that  is  new  today  but  obsolete  tomor-
row. 

The  FAA  is  hard  at  work  bringing  new  technology  and  techniques  on-line  to 
unsnarl air traffic delays, and we appreciate the funding Congress has appropriated 
for these purposes. In recognition of these critical enhancements, the President’s FY 
2009  Budget  Request  would  more  than  triple  the  investment  in  NextGen  tech-
nology—providing  $688  million  for  key  research  and  technology  to  help  meet  the 
Nation’s  rapidly  growing  demand  for  air  travel,  including  the  transformation  from 
radar-based to satellite-based air traffic systems. 

The FAA will begin rolling out several elements of the NextGen system this sum-
mer.  This  rollout  will  include  the  national  debut  of  Automatic  Dependent  Surveil-
lance-Broadcast  (ADS–B)  technology,  the  cornerstone  of  NextGen.  We  are  particu-
larly proud that the ADS–B team, which includes the FAA, along with its industry, 
government, and university partners, recently won the Robert J. Collier Trophy, one 
of  the  most  prestigious  awards  in  aviation.  The  award  is  awarded  annually  by  the 
National Aeronautic Association ‘‘for the greatest achievement in aeronautics or as-
tronautics  in  America,  with  respect  to  improving  the  performance,  efficiency,  and 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Mar 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80048.TXT JACKIE

12 

safety of air or space vehicles, the value of which has been thoroughly demonstrated 
by  actual  use  during  the  preceding  year.’’  It  recognizes  the  development  team  that 
worked  for  more  than  a  decade  to  create  the  pioneering  systems  to  improve  effi-
ciency and safety in the national airspace. 

The FAA has chosen Miami as the key site for the installation and testing of Traf-
fic  Information  Services-Broadcast  (TIS–B)  and  Flight  Information  Services-Broad-
cast  (FIS–B).  These  broadcast  services  are  the  transmission  of  weather  and  traffic 
information to the cockpit of properly equipped aircraft. In order to provide the serv-
ices  in  roughly  the  southern  half  of  the  state,  the  contractor,  ITT  will  install  and 
test eleven ground stations in this area, including five at airports (Lakeland Linder 
Regional, Dade-Collier, Florida Keys Marathon Airport, Boca Raton Airport, and Se-
bastian Municipal). 

The  ITT  installed  equipment  is  currently  undergoing  a  Service  Acceptance  Test 
(SAT)  which  began  in  May.  In  November  2008,  the  agency  expects  to  commission 
(the  FAA  calls  this  an  In-Service  Decision  or  ISD)  these  broadcast  services  (TIS– 
B and FIS–B). Following the successful completion of ISD, the FAA can exercise an 
option in the ITT contract to deploy the services nationwide 

The transition to ADS–B technology will allow the Nation’s air traffic control sys-
tem to change from one that relies on radar technology to a system that uses precise 
location data from a global satellite network. Over the next few years, the FAA will 
also  install  and  test  ADS-B  for  use  in  Air  Traffic  Control  Separation  Services.  The 
key sites for this initiative are Louisville, Philadelphia, the Gulf of Mexico, and Ju-
neau.  The  FAA  plans  to  commission  the  ADS–B  services  in  September  2010  and 
complete a nationwide rollout by 2013. 
NY/NJ/PHL Airspace Redesign 

As  mentioned  above,  one-third  of  all  domestic  and  one-sixth  of  all  international 
air  traffic  pass  through  New  York  airspace.  Improvements  in  this  region  have  ef-
fects  throughout  the  system.  Likewise,  a  bad  storm  or  other  delays  in  this  region 
cascades throughout the system. In order to address these issues, the FAA is in the 
process of implementing the New York/New Jersey/Philadelphia Airspace Redesign. 
The  old,  inefficient  airspace  routes  and  procedures  pieced  together  over  the  past 
several  decades  were  overdue  to  be  reconfigured  to  make  them  more  efficient  and 
less  complicated.  In  addition  to  more  jet  routes  with  increased  and  better  access, 
the Airspace Redesign includes improved use of available runways, fanned headings 
for departures and parallel arrivals, and more flexibility to manage delays in severe 
weather. We project that under the Airspace Redesign, delays will be cut by 200,000 
hours  annually.  This  is  the  single  greatest  improvement  to  address  congestion  we 
see in the near future for the New York/New Jersey metropolitan area. 

We  also  project  that  this  will  save  $248  million  annually  in  operating  costs  for 
airlines. Additionally, the increased flexibility during severe weather is projected to 
save  another  $37  million  annually.  Finally,  the  environmental  advantages  include 
reduced  carbon  dioxide  emissions  of  a  projected  430  million  pounds  per  year,  and 
the residents affected by aviation noise will be reduced by more than 600,000. These 
are impressive gains. 

Reconfiguring  the  airspace  will  enable  the  FAA  to  take  several  direct  actions  to 
take  advantage  of  improved  aircraft  performance  and  emerging  ATC  technologies. 
Leveraging these technologies, the FAA can implement new and modified ATC pro-
cedures,  including  dispersal  headings,  multiple  departure  gates  and  simplified  ar-
rival procedures by 2011. The FAA will also use these technologies to employ noise 
mitigation  measures,  such  as  use  of  Continuous  Descent  Approaches  (CDA),  and 
raising arrival altitudes. 

Implementation of the Airspace Redesign Project will be able to make use of pro-
cedures like Area Navigation (RNAV) and Required Navigation Performance (RNP), 
which  collectively  result  in  improved  safety,  access,  predictability,  and  operational 
efficiency,  as  well  as  reduced  environmental  impacts.  RNAV  operations  remove  the 
requirement  for  a  direct  link  between  aircraft  navigation  and  a  ground-based  navi-
gational  aid  (i.e.,  flying  only  from  radar  beacon  to  radar  beacon),  thereby  allowing 
aircraft greater access to better routes and permitting flexibility of point-to-point op-
erations. By using more precise routes for take-offs and landings, RNAV enables re-
ductions in fuel burn and emissions and increases in efficiency. 

RNP  is  RNAV  with  the  addition  of  an  onboard  monitoring  and  alerting  function. 
This onboard capability enhances the pilot’s situational awareness providing greater 
access  to  airports  in  challenging  terrain.  RNP  takes  advantage  of  an  airplane’s  on-
board  navigation  capability  to  fly  a  more  precise  flight  path  into  an  airport.  It  in-
creases  access  during  marginal  weather,  thereby  reducing  diversions  to  alternate 
airports.  While  not  all  of  these  benefits  may  apply  to  every  community  affected  by 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Mar 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80048.TXT JACKIE

posed by the ARC; 

congestion at the local level; 

York Area Program Integration Office; 

• Completion by the end of this summer of 17 key operational improvements pro-
• Establishing  an  executive-level  Director  position  at  the  FAA  to  head  the  New 
• Amending  the  Airports  Rates  and  Charges  Policy,  allowing  airports  to  manage 
• Publishing a final rule on denied boarding compensation; 
• Creating a Tarmac Delay Task Force; 
• Publishing a final rule to enhance delay data reporting; 
• Publishing  an  Advance  Notice  of  Proposed  Rulemaking  to  enhance  consumer 
protections,  including  tarmac  delay  contingency  plans,  requiring  responses  to 
consumer complaints, and requiring publication of consumer data; and 
• Creating  a  chronically  delayed  flight  enforcement  regime  to  pursue  unrealistic 

13 

the  Airspace  Redesign  Project,  RNAV  and  RNP  may  prove  useful  in  helping  to  re-
duce overall noise and aggregate emissions. 

The Airspace Redesign Project is very large and complex and the implementation 
will  take  several  years.  There  will  be  four  stages  of  the  implementation,  distin-
guished by the degree of airspace realignment and facility changes required to sup-
port  each  of  the  overlying  operational  enhancements.  Implementation  is  estimated 
to take at least 5 years, with each stage taking approximately 12–18 months to com-
plete. The FAA is presently finalizing a detailed implementation plan that will cover 
all  elements  of  this  project’s  implementation  and  we  anticipate  completion  of  stage 
1 later this year. We have also begun additional operation validation of some of the 
key elements of stage 2. 
Additional DOT Efforts to Reduce Congestion 

In addition to the capacity enhancements, operational improvements, and ongoing 
efforts  in  the  NextGen  arena  that  have  already  been  discussed,  the  Department  is 
constantly searching for new ways to reduce congestion and improve customer satis-
faction. Given the record delays last summer, in July 2007, Secretary Peters formed 
an  internal  New  York  Air  Congestion  Working  Group  and  tasked  them  with  devel-
oping  an  action  plan  to  reduce  congestion  and  delays  at  airports  in  the  New  York 
City region and improve customer satisfaction. The working group developed a plan, 
which, among other things, included establishing a New York Aviation Rulemaking 
Committee (ARC), holding scheduling reduction meetings, implementing operational 
improvements,  and  enhancing  customer  satisfaction.  ARC  participants  included, 
among  others,  the  airlines  and  the  Port  Authority  of  New  York  and  New  Jersey. 
Since  forming  the  Working  Group,  the  Department  has  taken  a  number  of  actions 
to reduce congestion and increase customer satisfaction, including: 

scheduling. 

The  Department  has  also  set  forth  significant  rulemaking  proposals  aimed  di-
rectly  at  reducing  congestion  in  the  system.  As  mentioned,  one-third  of  all  U.S.  air 
traffic passes through New York airspace. This concentration of traffic has prompted 
the  Department  to  take  special  action  in  the  New  York  area.  Recently,  the  Depart-
ment  published  notices  of  proposed  rules  intended  to  manage  congestion  and  intro-
duce competition at LaGuardia Airport (LaGuardia), John F. Kennedy International 
Airport  (JFK),  and  Newark  Liberty  International  Airport  (Newark).  We  believe 
these  proposals  will  ultimately  provide  travelers  with  more  reliable  service  while 
maintaining  competition  among  the  many  carriers  in  a  vibrant  New  York  market. 
As  you  know,  the  three  New  York  airports  are  all  operating  under  a  cap.  Caps 
solve  the  problem  of  congestion  because  they  simply  freeze  capacity  and  stop  addi-
tional  flights  from  flooding  the  system.  Airlines  are  often  enthusiastic  in  their  sup-
port of caps at an airport they already serve. When a cap is established, incumbent 
airlines  are  protected  because  they  typically  maintain  their  market  share  and  the 
potential  for  new  competition  is  diminished.  The  incumbent  airlines’  support  for 
such a policy makes sense, because limited competition makes them more profitable 
and protects them from new entrants that might want to compete by offering lower 
fares.  This  limitation  on  capacity  and  competition  naturally  leads  to  fare  increases 
at an airport, because it creates a scarce commodity, and passengers pay a premium 
for that commodity. 

Unfortunately, straight caps without some mechanism to ensure an efficient allo-
cation  of  scarce  slot  resources  is  economically  inefficient  and  stifles  competition— 
leading  to  reduced  service  and  higher  fares  for  consumers.  Granting  slots  without 
market-based mechanisms creates a system where incumbent airlines fight to main-
tain  large  shares  of  the  airport  traffic  and  to  limit  the  ability  of  low-cost  carriers 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Mar 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80048.TXT JACKIE

14 

to  compete.  The  1996  DOT  report  Low  Cost  Airline  Service  Revolution  details  this 
anticompetitive  culture  at  capped  or  dominated  airports.  The  report  identifies  slot 
hoarding as one of the key characteristics of such a culture. Federal regulations re-
quire  airlines  to  use  their  slots  at  least  80  percent  of  the  time  in  order  to  retain 
possession of them. However, by splitting up larger flights into smaller ones (‘‘down- 
gauging’’) or by setting up a rotating schedule, airlines have unnecessarily taken up 
more  slots  than  they  would  require  to  competitively  serve  their  customers.  Slot 
hoarding  prevents  new  entrants  from  taking  available  slots  and  increases  airplane 
throughput  without  increasing  passenger  throughput,  adding  greatly  to  congestion. 
The report maintains that the high fares charged at these dominated airports create 
incentives  for  an  airline  to  use  anticompetitive  measures  to  discourage  new  en-
trants. 

Using  the  historical  backdrop  of  slots  as  a  guide,  we  believe  that  integration  of 
a  market-based  system  into  the  proposal  for  slot  caps  is  necessary  to  protect  con-
sumers  and  a  competitive  market.  Estimates  from  the  DOT’s  1996  report  valued 
savings from new entry competition at 35 percent for round-trip flights and 40 per-
cent  for  one-way  flights.  A  case-specific  study  on  the  effect  of  Southwest  Airlines 
noted  that  with  the  opening  of  just  one  route  between  Oakland  International  Air-
port and Ontario International Airport in Los Angeles, fares dropped 60 percent and 
traffic  tripled,  increasing  both  passenger  throughput  as  well  as  savings  for  con-
sumers.  Even  nearby  airports  not  directly  offered  service  experienced  a  decrease  in 
fare  costs  of  up  to  one-third.  Southwest  is  just  one  example  of  low-cost  carriers 
whose entry into the market drove down prices and increased passenger throughput 
at previously dominated airports. 

This  is  why  caps  alone  are  not  the  best  solution  for  improving  travel  options  for 
passengers and why caps must be combined with some mechanism to preserve com-
petitive  market  forces  to  benefit  aviation  consumers  or  the  airlines.  When  we  con-
sider economic regulatory issues, the Department has a statutory obligation to place 
maximum  reliance  on  competitive  market  forces  and  on  actual  and  potential  com-
petition.  We  know,  however,  that  caps  hinder  the  ability  of  air  carriers  to  initiate 
or  expand  service  at  capacity  constrained  airports.  Therefore,  when  seeking  a  solu-
tion  to  the  aviation  congestion  issues  that  we  currently  face  in  the  New  York  area, 
the  Department  must  act  to  both  promote  competition  by  permitting  access  to  new 
entrants,  and  to  recognize  the  long-term  investments  in  airports  made  by  existing 
carriers. 

Keeping  in  mind  the  need  to  reduce  congestion  while  simultaneously  promoting 
competition, we have set forth proposals for the New York area airports that we be-
lieve  would  reduce  congestion  the  smartest  way—by  using  market  incentives  to  as-
sist in the efficient allocation of airspace. Opponents of market incentives have sug-
gested  that  only  caps  will  reduce  congestion.  We  do  not  agree.  We  believe  market 
incentives  will  encourage  more  efficient  use  of  available  airspace  and  should  result 
in a greater throughput than under a system using pure caps. Consequently, we ex-
pect  fewer  delays  per  passenger.  For  example,  to  the  extent  that  airlines  choose  to 
absorb  costs  associated  with  our  proposed  market  incentives  by  ‘‘up-gauging’’  to 
larger  aircraft,  passenger  throughput  will  increase,  effectively  reducing  congestion 
for a greater percentage of the traveling public. 

Although  market-based  mechanisms  are  the  most  effective  way  to  allocate  scarce 
resources—like  slots—we  have  taken  a  very  conservative  approach  to  introducing 
these mechanisms with this proposal. The vast majority of hourly operations at the 
airport, as much as 90 percent or more, would be ‘‘grandfathered’’ and leased to the 
existing  operators  for  non-monetary  consideration.  The  market-based  aspect  of  our 
proposal  involves  auctioning  off  leases  for  only  a  limited  number  of  the  remaining 
slots and treats domestic and foreign carriers equally. 

We are firmly committed to the idea that any long-term solution to mitigate con-
gestion  in  the  Nation’s  airspace  must  include  a  market-based  mechanism.  Caps 
alone have proven to be insufficient, and perpetuating the kinds of delays we experi-
enced in the Summer of 2007 is not tolerable. 
Conclusion 

Chairman  Rockefeller,  Senator  Hutchison,  Members  of  the  Subcommittee,  this 
concludes  my  prepared  remarks  on  behalf  of  myself  and  Mr.  Duvall.  We  look  for-
ward to answering any of your questions. 

Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  Well,  that  was—well,  I  have  this  note  in 
front of me which just counteracts you, Mr. Krakowski. It says that 
Mr. Duvall is not going to give testimony. 

Mr. KRAKOWSKI. Question-and-answer is what I said, sir. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Mar 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80048.TXT JACKIE

15 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. OK. 
Mr. KRAKOWSKI. Yes. 
Senator ROCKEFELLER. Would you like to give testimony? 
Mr. DUVALL. I’m happy for the other colleagues to go first. 
Senator ROCKEFELLER. All right. 
In that case, our next person is Susan Fleming, who’s a Director 

at the Government Accountability Office. 

STATEMENT OF SUSAN FLEMING, DIRECTOR, 

PHYSICAL INFRASTRUCTURE ISSUES, 

U.S. GOVERNMENT ACCOUNTABILITY OFFICE 

Ms. FLEMING. Good morning, Mr. Chairman, Vice Chairman Ste-
vens. Thank you for the opportunity to discuss the Federal Govern-
ment’s  efforts  to  reduce  aviation  congestion  and  delays  for  this 
summer. 

Increasingly, the U.S. aviation system is plagued by flight delays 
and  cancellations.  In  2007,  more  than  one  in  four  flights  arrived 
late  or  were  canceled,  making  it  one  of  the  worst  years  for  delays. 
Delays  and  cancellations,  as  you  know,  are  particularly  evident 
in  the  New  York  region.  To  avoid  a  repeat  of  last  summer’s  prob-
lems,  DOT  and  FAA  have  worked  together  with  airlines  and  air-
ports  to  develop  and  implement  several  initiatives  to  reduce  con-
gestion and delay for this summer. 

My testimony today has three parts: trends in the extent of delay 
and  its  principal  sources,  status  of  Federal  Government  actions  to 
reduce  delay,  and  the  extent  to  which  these  actions  may  reduce 
delays for the summer. 

First,  since  1998  the  total  number  of  flight  delays  and  cancella-
tions nationwide has increased 62 percent, while the number of op-
erations  has  increased  about  38  percent.  The  numbers  are  even 
worse  for  New  York.  Specifically,  since  1998  the  number  of  delays 
and  cancellations  in  New  York  has  more  than  doubled,  while  the 
number of operations has increased by just 57 percent. 

The sources of delay across the system and in New York are var-
ied, but, unfortunately, DOT’s data does not provide a complete pic-
ture.  For  example,  in  2007,  late-arriving  aircraft  accounted  for  38 
percent of delays nationwide. However, this category indicates little 
about what caused the aircraft to arrive late, such as severe weath-
er or equipment problems. 

I’ll now turn to my second topic: status of initiatives and policies. 
Because of the particular problems in the New York area, DOT and 
FAA are implementing several actions intended to reduce delays at 
New York airports for this summer and beyond. Some of these are 
already  in  effect,  such  as  11  of  the  17  short-term  initiatives  de-
signed  to  improve  capacity  at  the  airport  or  system  level  and  the 
hourly schedule caps on operations at the New York area airports. 
The other actions are being developed or have just been issued and 
therefore are unlikely to be in effect this summer. FAA is currently 
soliciting  public  comments  on  the  proposed  rule  to  establish  slot 
auctions at JFK and Newark. 

Moving on to my last point, collectively DOT and FAA’s capacity- 
enhancing  initiatives  and  demand  management  policies  are  likely 
to  have  a  limited  effect  on  reducing  delays  this  summer  compared 
to  last  year.  For  example,  the  benefit  of  the  17  initiatives,  which 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Mar 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80048.TXT JACKIE

16 

range from efforts to reduce excessive spacing on final approach be-
fore  landing  to  new  procedures  for  handling  air  traffic  during  se-
vere weather conditions, is generally expected to come from the ini-
tiatives’ combined incremental improvements over time and in cer-
tain  situations.  The  demand  management  policies,  especially  the 
caps,  will  have  a  more  immediate,  but  limited,  effect  on  delays, 
since  the  caps  were  set  at  a  level  which  were  generally  designed 
to  avoid  future  delays  and  not  reduce  delays  from  the  2007  levels. 
More  uncertain  are  the  Department’s  proposals  to  auction  slots  at 
these airports and to allow congestion pricing at all airports. 

The Department has not demonstrated how these actions will re-
duce  delay,  and,  given  the  widespread  opposition  to  these  policies, 
may distract from necessary efforts to build capacity in the region. 
Finally,  other  interrelated  factors,  such  as  the  financial  state  of 
the  industry,  increasing  jet  fuel  prices,  and  the  effect  of  higher 
fares on passengers, could lead to fewer delays in 2008, but the ef-
fect  of  these  factors  on  aviation  congestion  and  delays  are  uncer-
tain. 

In closing, DOT and FAA are to be commended for working with 
stakeholders to develop initiatives that will enhance capacity in the 
New York region. It is vital that these be completed and that DOT 
and the stakeholders continue to work together to identify and im-
plement other initiatives to help reduce congestion. 

Mr. Chairman, this concludes my statement. I’d be pleased to an-
swer  any  questions  you  or  Members  of  the  Subcommittee  might 
have. 

[The prepared statement of Ms. Fleming follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF SUSAN FLEMING, DIRECTOR, PHYSICAL INFRASTRUCTURE 

ISSUES, U.S. GOVERNMENT ACCOUNTABILITY OFFICE 

Mr. Chairman and Members of the Subcommittee: 
I  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  testify  before  you  today  on  the  Federal  Govern-
ment’s efforts to reduce aviation congestion and delays for this summer’s travel sea-
son.  In  recent  years,  flight  delays  and  cancellations  have  plagued  the  U.S.  aviation 
system.  According  to  the  Department  of  Transportation  (DOT),  more  than  one  in 
four flights either arrived late or were canceled in 2007, affecting approximately 163 
million  passengers  and  making  it  one  of  the  worst  years  for  delays  in  the  last  dec-
ade.  A  recent  report  by  the  Senate  Joint  Economic  Committee  found  that  collec-
tively,  passengers  were  delayed  320  million  hours  in  2007  and  estimated  that  do-
mestic  flight  delays  last  year  cost  as  much  as  $41  billion  to  the  U.S.  economy.1 
Delays  were  particularly  evident  at  certain  airports,  especially  those  in  the  New 
York region. For the past 10 years, the three principal New York metropolitan com-
mercial  passenger  airports—Newark  Liberty  International  (Newark),  John  F.  Ken-
nedy International (JFK), and LaGuardia—have often ranked at or near the bottom 
of DOT’s lists of airport on-time arrivals and departures. Since one-third of aircraft 
in the national airspace system move through the New York area at some point dur-
ing a typical day, delays in this region can have a disproportionate impact on delays 
experienced throughout the rest of the system. 

Consumer  complaints  and  media  coverage  of  airline  service  problems,  combined 
with  congressional  hearings  on  these  issues,  have  recently  put  flight  delays  in  the 
spotlight.  Most  aviation  industry  experts  believe  that  substantial  gains  in  reducing 
aviation congestion and delays can be achieved in the long term through investment 
in  airport  infrastructure,  Next  Generation  Air  Transportation  System  (NextGen) 
technologies,2 and/or  more  efficient  pricing  of  the  Nation’s  aviation  infrastructure. 

1 Senate Joint Economic Committee, Your Flight Has Been Delayed Again: Flight Delays Cost 

Passengers, Airlines and the U.S. Economy Billions. (Washington, D.C.: May 2008). 

2 NextGen  represents  a  transformation  to  a  new  air  traffic  control  system  that  will  use  sat-
ellite-based technologies and new procedures to handle the increasing volume of air traffic while 
further improving safety and security. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Mar 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80048.TXT JACKIE

17 

However,  to  avoid  a  repeat  of  last  summer’s  delays,  DOT  and  its  operating  agency, 
the Federal Aviation Administration (FAA), have worked with the aviation industry 
since  the  fall  of  2007  in  an  effort  to  develop  and  implement  several  near-term  ac-
tions to reduce delays for the summer 2008 travel season. 

My  testimony  today  addresses:  (1)  the  trends  in  the  extent  and  principal  sources 
of  flight  delays  and  cancellations  over  the  last  10  years,  (2)  the  status  of  Federal 
Government  actions  to  reduce  flight  delays  and  cancellations  by  the  summer  of 
2008, and (3) the extent to which these actions may reduce delays and cancellations 
for  the  summer  2008  travel  season.  To  determine  trends  in  the  extent  and  sources 
of  delays,  we  analyzed  DOT  data  on  airline  on-time  performance,  including  sources 
of delays, by airport and for the entire airspace system, for 1998 to 2007.3 To assess 
the reliability of the data, we interviewed agency officials about data quality control 
procedures,  reviewed  relevant  documentation,  and  electronically  tested  the  data  to 
identify  obvious  problems  with  completeness  or  accuracy.  We  determined  that  the 
data were sufficiently reliable for the purposes of this report. We also reviewed rel-
evant documents and reports and interviewed DOT and FAA officials, airport opera-
tors in Boston, New York, and Chicago, major commercial airlines, and aviation in-
dustry  experts  and  associations  on  the  status  and  potential  impact  of  the  Federal 
Government’s  actions  to  reduce  delays.  Although  its  scope  covers  the  national  air-
space  system  as  a  whole,  our  work  especially  focuses  on  the  New  York  region  be-
cause of the New York area airports’ persistent problems with flight delays and can-
cellations  and  the  Federal  Government’s  actions  focused  on  reducing  delays  in  this 
region. We conducted our work from December 2007 to July 2008 in accordance with 
generally accepted government auditing standards. Those standards require that we 
plan  and  perform  the  study  to  obtain  sufficient,  appropriate  evidence  to  provide  a 
reasonable basis for our findings and conclusions based on our study objectives. We 
believe  that  the  evidence  obtained  provides  a  reasonable  basis  for  our  findings  and 
conclusions based on our audit objectives. 
Summary 

DOT data show that flight delays and cancellations have generally increased over 
the  last  decade,  but  the  data  provide  an  incomplete  picture  of  the  full  extent  and 
sources  of  delays.  Since  1998,  the  number  of  airline  flight  delays  and  cancellations 
has  increased  about  62  percent  nationwide,  while  the  number  of  scheduled  oper-
ations  has  increased  about  38  percent,  according  to  DOT  data.4 While  flight  delays 
occur throughout the entire national airspace system, the flight delay trends in New 
York area are even more pronounced. For example, since 1998, the number of flight 
delays  and  cancellations  in  the  New  York  region  has  increased  about  111  percent, 
while the number of operations has increased about 57 percent. Although DOT data 
provide  information  on  trends  in  flight  delays  and  cancellations,  they  do  not  show 
the  full  extent  of  delays  and  cancellations.  For  example,  DOT  data  do  not  reflect 
passengers’  experiences  with  missed  connections  resulting  from  delayed  or  oversold 
flights,  because  DOT  tracks  flight  delays,  not  passenger  delays.  Additionally,  DOT 
data  provide  some  information  on  the  source  of  delays,  but  they  do  not  provide  a 
complete picture. For example, according to DOT data, 38 percent of delays in 2007 
were assigned to the late arriving aircraft category, which means that the previous 
flight  using  the  same  aircraft  arrived  late,  and  caused  the  subsequent  flight  to  de-
part  late.  However,  this  category  does  not  provide  the  original  source  of  delay  for 
the  late  arriving  aircraft,  such  as  a  severe  weather  condition.  In  the  New  York  re-
gion,  the  data  for  2007  show  that  national  aviation  system  delays—a  category  that 
encompasses a broad set of circumstances, which are all attributed to FAA’s ability 
to  manage  traffic  at  the  airport  or  airspace  level—accounted  for  nearly  58  percent 
of all New York delays, as compared to approximately 28 percent systemwide. This 
disparity reflects the New York area’s greater level of congestion as compared to the 
rest of the country. 

To address delay and cancellation problems beginning in summer 2008, DOT and 
FAA  are  implementing  several  actions  intended  to  reduce  delays  that  we  have  cat-
egorized as capacity-enhancing initiatives and demand management policies. Capac-
ity-enhancing  initiatives  are  intended  to  increase  the  efficiency  of  existing  capacity 
by  reducing  delays  and  maximizing  the  number  of  takeoffs  and  landings  at  an  air-

3 14  C.F.R.  § 234.4,  ‘‘Reporting  on  on-time  performance,’’  requires  domestic  air  carriers  that 
account  for  at  least  1  percent  of  domestic  scheduled  passenger  revenues  to  submit  scheduled 
domestic flight performance data to DOT. See 14 C.F.R. §§ 234.2, 234.3. The number of reporting 
carriers  has  varied  from  10  in  1998  to  20  in  2007.  According  to  DOT,  the  data  represent  about 
70  percent  of  all  scheduled  departures  while  servicing  about  90  percent  of  all  domestic  pas-
sengers. 

4 DOT defines a delay as any flight that departs from or arrives at a gate 15 minutes or more 
after  its  scheduled  gate  departure  or  arrival  time  as  shown  in  the  airline’s  reservation  system. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Mar 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80048.TXT JACKIE

18 

port,  while  demand  management  policies  influence  demand  through  administrative 
measures or economic incentives. Under capacity-enhancing initiatives, FAA has im-
plemented 11 of its 17 short-term initiatives designed to better use existing capacity 
at  the  airport  or  system  level;  begun  working  to  improve  coordination  with  the  De-
partment of Defense (DOD) for the use of military airspace; initiated the first phase 
of the New York, New Jersey, and Philadelphia metropolitan area airspace redesign 
(New York-New Jersey-Philadelphia Airspace Redesign); and appointed a New York 
Airspace  ‘‘Czar’’  to  coordinate  regional  airspace  issues  and  projects.  DOT  and  FAA 
have  also  initiated  several  demand  management  policies—most  notably,  imposing 
new hourly schedule caps on operations at Newark and JFK, which join already ex-
isting  caps  at  LaGuardia.  Other  demand  management  policies  are  either  still  in 
draft  form  or  have  just  been  issued,  and  therefore,  are  unlikely  to  be  in  effect  by 
this summer. These policies include an amendment to the 1996 Policy Regarding the 
Establishment  of  Airport  Rates  and  Charges  (Rates  and  Charges  policy)—which, 
among  other  things,  clarifies  the  ability  of  airport  operators  to  establish  a  two-part 
landing  fee  structure  based  on  operations  and  aircraft  weight—and  proposed  rules 
on ‘‘slot auctions’’ that would lease the majority of New York area airport operations 
(slots) to incumbent airlines and then would help to develop a market for those slots 
by annually auctioning a limited number of slot leases.5 

Collectively,  DOT’s  and  FAA’s  capacity-enhancing  initiatives  and  demand  man-
agement  policies  will  likely  have  a  limited  effect  on  reducing  delays  this  summer 
compared to last year. DOT’s and FAA’s capacity-enhancing initiatives have the po-
tential  to  reduce  delays  by  improving  the  efficiency  of  existing  capacity,  but  the  ef-
fect  will  likely  be  fairly  small.  For  example,  the  benefit  of  the  17  operational  and 
procedural initiatives—which range from efforts to reduce excessive spacing on final 
approach  before  landing  to  new  procedures  for  handling  air  traffic  during  severe 
weather  conditions—is  generally  anticipated  to  come  from  the  initiatives’  combined 
incremental  improvements  over  time  and  in  certain  situations.  DOT  and  FAA  have 
not  analyzed  the  potential  near-term  delay  reduction  benefit  of  the  other  capacity- 
enhancing  initiatives,  but  airlines,  airport  operators,  and  aviation  associations  and 
experts that we spoke with expect these initiatives to have a fairly small impact on 
reducing  delays  for  this  summer.  DOT’s  demand  management  policies—specifically, 
the hourly schedule caps at LaGuardia, JFK, and Newark—may have a more imme-
diate, but still a limited, effect on reducing delays because the caps at Newark and 
LaGuardia  were  set  at  a  level  that  was  generally  intended  to  avoid  any  worsening 
of  delays  over  2007  levels  and  the  caps  at  JFK  were  set  to  get  a  15  percent  reduc-
tion in average departure delays over 2007 levels. For example, Newark’s cap of 81 
hourly  operations  was  set  at  a  level  to  avoid  delays  beyond  those  experienced  in 
2007  but  is  not  estimated  to  reduce  delays  from  2007  levels.  Finally,  other  inter-
related  factors  besides  government  actions,  such  as  the  financial  state  of  the  avia-
tion  industry,  increasing  jet  fuel  prices,  and  the  downturn  in  the  economy,  could 
lead  to  fewer  delays  in  2008,  but  the  effects  of  these  factors  on  aviation  congestion 
and delays are uncertain. DOT and FAA provided technical comments on the state-
ment which were incorporated as appropriate. 
Background 

The  national  airspace  system  is  a  complex,  interconnected,  and  interdependent 
network  of  systems,  procedures,  facilities,  aircraft,  and  people  that  must  work  to-
gether  to  ensure  safe  and  efficient  operations.  DOT,  FAA,  airlines,  and  airports  all 
affect  the  efficiency  of  national  airspace  system  operations.  DOT  works  with  FAA 
to  set  policy  and  operating  standards  for  all  aircrafts  and  airports.  As  the  agency 
responsible  for  managing  the  air  traffic  control  system,  FAA  has  the  lead  role  in 
developing  technological  and  other  solutions  to  airspace  issues.  FAA  also  provides 
funding to airports. The funding that major airports receive from FAA to make im-
provements  at  the  airports  is  conditioned  on  open  and  nondiscriminatory  access  to 
the airlines and other users,6 and the airlines are free to schedule operations at any 
time  throughout  the  day,  except  at  airports  that  are  subject  to  limits  on  scheduled 
operations.  The  airlines  can  also  affect  the  efficiency  of  the  airspace  system  by  the 
number and types of aircraft that they choose to operate. 

As  we  have  previously  reported,  measuring  the  capacity  of  the  airspace  system 
and  achieving  its  most  efficient  use  are  both  difficult  challenges  because  they  de-
pend  on  a  number  of  interrelated  factors.7 The  capacity  of  the  aviation  system  is 

5 A slot equates to one takeoff or landing at the airport. 
6 According  to  49  U.S.C.  § 47107,  an  airport  that  has  received  Federal  funding  is  required  to 

be available for public use on reasonable conditions and without unjust discrimination. 

7 GAO,  Air  Traffic  Control:  Role  of  FAA’s  Modernization  Program  in  Reducing  Delays  and 
Congestion,  GAO–01–725T  (Washington,  D.C.:  May  10,  2001),  and  National  Airspace  System: 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Mar 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80048.TXT JACKIE

19 

not  a  simple  measurable  element—in  addition  to  being  related  to  airports’  infra-
structure,  capacity  is  affected  at  any  given  time  by  such  factors  as  weather  condi-
tions and airline flight schedules. For example, because some airports have parallel 
runways that are too close together for simultaneous operations in bad weather, the 
number  of  aircraft  that  can  take  off  and  land  is  reduced  when  weather  conditions 
worsen.  Achieving  the  most  efficient  use  of  the  national  airspace  system  is  contin-
gent on a number of factors, among them the procedures that FAA uses to manage 
traffic, how well FAA’s air traffic control equipment performs, the proficiency of the 
controllers to efficiently use these procedures and equipment to manage traffic, and 
how much users are charged for the use of the airspace and airports. 

FAA has had a long history of attempting to address congestion by managing de-
mand  through  administrative  controls.  FAA  began  establishing  limits  on  the  num-
ber  of  takeoffs  and  landings  at  five  airports—Chicago  O’Hare  International,  New-
ark, JFK, LaGuardia, and Washington Reagan National—in 1968. The High Density 
Rule, as it was known, instituted limits, or caps, on the number of takeoff and land-
ings  of  the  incumbent  airlines  serving  each  of  the  these  airports.8 DOT  lifted  the 
restrictions  at  Newark  in  1970,  and  in  2000,  with  the  passage  of  the  Wendell  H. 
Ford  Aviation  Investment  and  Reform  Act  for  the  21st  Century  (AIR–21),  caps  on 
operations were to be eliminated at Chicago O’Hare by July 2002, and at LaGuardia 
and JFK by January 2007.9 AIR–21 also immediately exempted certain types of air-
craft  from  the  caps,  a  change  that  resulted  in  unanticipated  increases  in  demand, 
especially at LaGuardia. In 2000, airlines took advantage of AIR–21’s small regional 
jet  exemptions  and  rapidly  initiated  a  large  number  of  new  flights  to  and  from 
LaGuardia.  FAA  chose  to  impose  a  moratorium  on  additional  flights  at  LaGuardia 
in  November  2000  to  limit  delays  and  reduced  flights  at  LaGuardia  to  a  level  con-
sistent  with  the  airport’s  capacity  under  optimal  weather  conditions.  On  the  basis 
of  this  experience  and  FAA’s  inability  to  adopt  a  final  congestion  management  rule 
for LaGuardia,10 FAA issued a December 2006 order to maintain the cap of 75 hour-
ly  scheduled  operations  at  LaGuardia  until  a  final  rule  can  be  adopted.  Chicago 
O’Hare  also  experienced  increased  operations  after  its  caps  were  eliminated, 
prompting  FAA  to  again  limit  operations  at  the  airport  beginning  in  spring  2004 
through  a  series  of  voluntary  agreements  and  ending  with  a  new  rule  in  late  sum-
mer 2006. These caps on Chicago O’Hare’s operations are effective through October 
2008,  which  coincides  with  the  scheduled  opening  of  the  airport’s  new  runway  in 
November 2008. 

In response to the near-record delays in summer 2007, which followed the expira-
tion  of  the  High  Density  Rule  for  the  New  York  airports  and  increasing  volumes 
of domestic air traffic, DOT convened a special aviation rulemaking committee (New 
York ARC) in the fall of 2007 specifically to address delays and other airline service 
issues  in  the  New  York  metropolitan  area.  The  New  York  ARC,  which  consisted  of 
stakeholders representing government, airlines, airports, general aviation users, and 
aviation consumers, was tasked with identifying available options for changing cur-
rent  policy  and  assessing  the  potential  impacts  of  those  changes  on  airlines,  air-
ports, and the traveling public. The New York ARC had three specific objectives: (1) 
to reduce congestion, (2) to allocate efficiently the scarce capacity of New York area 
airports, and (3) to minimize the disruption associated with implementing any of the 
suggested improvements. The New York ARC issued its findings and options for re-
ducing congestion to the Secretary of Transportation in December 2007.11 One of the 
Committee’s working groups assessed 77 operational improvement initiatives for the 
New  York  area  and  identified  key  items  to  focus  on  within  the  list  of  77,  such  as 
reducing excess spacing on final approach when landing. 

Long-Term  Capacity  Planning  Needed  Despite  Recent  Reduction  in  Flight  Delays,  GAO–02–185 
(Washington, D.C.: Dec. 14, 2001). 

8 33 Fed. Reg. 17896 (Dec. 3, 1968), 14 C.F.R. part 93, subpart K. 
9 The  Wendell  H.  Ford  Aviation  Investment  and  Reform  Act  for  the  21st  Century  (AIR–21), 

Pub. L. No. 106–181, Section 231, 114 Stat. 108, Apr. 5, 2000. 

10 Since the High Density Rule at LaGuardia was set to expire on January 1, 2007, in August 
2006,  FAA  published  a  notice  of  proposed  rulemaking  proposing  the  continuation  of  the  cap  on 
hourly  operations  at  the  airport  as  well  as  a  new  method  for  allocating  capacity.  See  71  Fed. 
Reg.  51360  (August  29,  2006).  The  industry’s  response  to  the  proposed  new  allocation  method 
was universally negative, and FAA was unable to complete its rulemaking in time for the expi-
ration of the High Density Rule. 

11 Aviation  Rulemaking  Committee,  ‘‘New  York  Aviation  Committee  Report,’’  December  2007, 

available at http://www.dot.gov/affairs/FinalARCReport.pdf. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Mar 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80048.TXT JACKIE

20 

Data  Show  That  Delays  and  Cancellations  Are  Increasing,  But  Provide  an 

Incomplete Picture of the Extent and Sources of Delays 

Nationwide,  according  to  DOT  data  the  annual  number  of  domestic  airline  flight 
delays and cancellations has increased about 62 percent (from 1.2 million to 2.0 mil-
lion),  while  the  annual  number  of  scheduled  flights  has  increased  about  38  percent 
(from 5.4 million to 7.5 million) since 1998. In the New York area, the trend is even 
more  pronounced,  as  the  number  of  domestic  flight  delays  and  cancellations  at  the 
three main commercial airports has increased about 111 percent, while the number 
of domestic operations has increased about 57 percent since 1998. 

DOT  statistics  indicate  that  2007  was  the  second  worst  year  on  record  for  U.S. 
airlines’ on-time performance, and the trends in the percentage of flight delays and 
cancellations  appear  to  be  worsening.12 As  shown  in  figure  1,  about  20  percent  of 
flights in the system were delayed and nearly 3 percent were canceled in 1998, com-
pared  to  about  24  and  2  percent  in  2007,  respectively.13 The  data  also  show  that 
flight  delays  and  cancellations  have  been  steadily  increasing  since  2002,  although 
the percentage of cancellations in 2007 is still lower than it was from 1998 through 
2001.  However,  cancellations  have  become  more  problematic  in  recent  years  as  the 
airline industry is now operating with fewer empty seats on flights. As a result, pas-
sengers on canceled flights must wait longer to be rebooked, and in some cases may 
be forced to spend the night before resuming travel the next day. 

Source: DOT. 
Flights  delays  are  also  becoming  longer.  According  to  DOT  data,  the  average 
length  of  a  flight  delay  increased  from  more  than  49  minutes  in  1998  to  almost  56 

12 As  of  December  2007,  18  U.S.  airlines  with  at  least  1  percent  of  total  domestic  scheduled 
service  passenger  revenues  reported  on-time  performance  data  each  month  to  DOT’s  Bureau  of 
Transportation  Statistics;  two  additional  airlines  voluntarily  reported  this  information.  A  flight 
is counted as on time if it departed or arrived within 15 minutes of its scheduled gate departure 
or  arrival  times  as  shown  in  the  airlines  reservation  system.  All  canceled  and  diverted  flights 
count  against  the  airlines’  on-time  performance.  According  to  DOT,  the  on-time  performance 
rate  of  72.6  percent  in  2000  was  the  worst  rate  for  any  year  since  1995,  when  DOT  began  col-
lecting comparable data. 

13 In  addition,  a  small  percentage  of  domestic  flights  are  diverted  and  land  somewhere  other 
than  the  scheduled  destination.  Diversions  accounted  for  0.23  percent  of  all  flights  in  2007,  ac-
cording to DOT data. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Mar 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80048.TXT JACKIE

.

s
p
e
1
M
E
L
F
5
1
7

21 

minutes  in  2007,  an  increase  of  nearly  14  percent  throughout  the  system.  Despite 
this  relatively  small  increase  in  average  flight  delay  length,  far  more  flights  were 
affected  by  long  delays  in  2007  than  in  1998.  For  example,  the  number  of  flights 
delayed  by  180  minutes  or  more  increased  from  25,726  flights  in  1998  to  64,040 
flights in 2007, or about 150 percent. In addition, DOT’s data indicate that the num-
ber  of  flights  in  which  an  aircraft  has  departed  the  gate,  but  remained  for  an  hour 
or  more  on  the  ground  awaiting  departure,  has  increased  over  151  percent  since 
1998.14 

Because the entire airspace system is highly interdependent, delays at one airport 
may  lead  to  delays  rippling  across  the  system  and  throughout  the  day.  This  delay 
propagation appears to be increasing and leading to more delays in the system over-
all. For example, researchers at George Mason University’s Center for Air Transpor-
tation  Systems  have  found  that  46  percent  of  delays  in  the  system  in  2007  were 
caused  by  flight  delays  occurring  earlier  in  the  day.  Flight  delays  in  the  New  York 
metropolitan region also appear to have a disproportionate impact on delays experi-
enced  throughout  the  rest  of  the  airspace  system.  During  a  typical  day,  approxi-
mately  one-third  of  the  aircrafts  in  the  national  airspace  system  move  through  the 
New York airspace. According to preliminary research conducted by the MITRE Cor-
poration  for  FAA,  an  average  of  40  percent  of  the  flight  delays  in  the  system  are 
from delays that originate in the New York metropolitan area.15 

Compared  to  the  rest  of  the  country,  where  flight  delays  and  cancellations  have 
been  steadily  increasing,  the  magnitude  and  upward  trend  of  the  problem  in  the 
New York region is greater than the rest of the airspace system. For example, over 
a  third  of  all  flights  in  the  New  York  metropolitan  region  in  2007  were  delayed  or 
canceled,  according  to  DOT  statistics.16 Figure  2  shows  that  the  percentage  of  late 
arriving and canceled flights at each of the three major New York area airports was 
considerably  higher  than  the  systemwide  averages.  Since  2003,  the  percentage  of 
late  arriving  and  canceled  flights  has  been  increasing  faster  in  the  New  York  area 
than in the rest of the system. 

Source: GAO analysis of DOT data. 
Note:  In  this  figure,  the  percentage  of  delays  and  cancellations  has  been  combined.  The  sys-

tem data include the three New York area airports. 

14 Effective  October  1,  2008,  DOT  will  require  airlines  to  report  additional  data  elements  to 
provide consumers with a more accurate portrayal of arrival and tarmac delays. Currently, air-
lines  report  only  the  scheduled  departure  and  arrival  times  and  no  actual  times  for  canceled 
flights,  which  do  not  provide  a  complete  picture  of  tarmac  delays  for  flights  that  are  canceled, 
diverted, or experience gate returns. Under the new rule, airlines will be required to report ac-
tual  gate  departure,  total  time  away  from  the  gate,  and  the  longest  single  period  away  from 
the  gate  to  close  gaps  in  DOT’s  data.  See  73  Fed.  Reg.  29426  (May  21,  2008)  for  the  final  rule. 
15 According to the MITRE Corporation, the 40 percent figure was calculated using DOT data 

from January and July 2007 and FAA data from July 2007. 

16 Additionally, flight delays and cancellations have been problematic at other major airports, 
including Chicago O’Hare International Airport and Boston Logan International Airport, among 
others.  For  example,  according  to  DOT  data,  in  2007,  36  percent  of  flights  were  either  delayed 
or  canceled  at  Chicago  O’Hare,  while  31  percent  of  flights  were  either  delayed  or  canceled  at 
Boston Logan. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Mar 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80048.TXT JACKIE

.

s
p
e
2
M
E
L
F
5
1
7

22 

Since 1998, the New York area’s three major airports have often been among the 
airports  with  the  lowest  on-time  performance  records.  In  2007,  DOT  reported  that 
LaGuardia,  Newark,  and  JFK  had  the  lowest  on-time  performance  rates  among 
major domestic airports, followed by Chicago O’Hare International Airport, Philadel-
phia  International  Airport,  and  Boston  Logan  International  Airport.  Table  1  shows 
the  ranking  of  major  airports  by  the  lowest  on-time  arrival  performance  in  2007. 

Table 1.—Ranking of Major Airports by Lowest On-Time Arrival Performance (2007) 

Ranking 
1 
2 
3 
4 
5 
6 
7 
8 
9 
10 

Airport 
LaGuardia 
Newark 
JFK 
Chicago O’Hare International 
Philadelphia International 
Boston Logan International 
San Francisco International 
Miami International 
Charlotte Douglas International 
Seattle-Tacoma International 
All major airports average 

Percentage on Time 
58.48 
59.45 
62.84 
65.88 
66.54 
69.68 
69.75 
70.99 
71.30 
71.43 
73.03 

Source: DOT. 
Note:  ‘‘Major  airports,’’  as  defined  by  DOT,  consists  of  the  32  airports  serving  1  percent  or  more  of  the  air-

line industry’s domestic scheduled service passengers. 

While  DOT  data  show  that  the  trends  in  delays  and  cancellations  are  getting 
worse, current on-time performance data do not capture the full extent of delays and 
cancellations or the extent to which passengers’ average travel times have increased 
in recent years. For example, airlines have, in many cases, opted to lengthen sched-
uled  flight  times  to  enhance  on-time  results,  particularly  along  heavily  congested 
and  frequently  delayed  routes.  DOT  data  do  not  account  for  the  increased  average 
flight  times  that  are  masked  by  these  schedule  changes.  Also,  available  DOT  data 
may  not  necessarily  reflect  passengers’  experience  of  delay  because  DOT  tracks 
flights,  not  passengers.  Passengers  can  experience  delays  to  their  trips  because  of 
missed  connections  resulting  from  delayed  or  oversold  flights  or  lengthy  delays  due 
to flight cancellations—elements that are not measured in current statistics. Accord-
ing  to  a  recent  study  by  George  Mason  University,  roughly  one  in  four  passengers 
experienced a passenger trip delay in 2007 and the average duration of delay experi-
enced  by  these  passengers  was  1  hour  54  minutes,  an  increase  of  24  minutes  over 
2006.17 In  addition,  the  study  found  that  the  average  delay  for  passengers  on  can-
celed flights was 11 hours in 2007. Passenger delays are affected by record-level air-
line  load  factors  (percentage  of  seats  occupied  on  aircraft),  which  result  in  fewer 
available  empty  seats  on  subsequent  flights  for  those  passengers  who  experience 
canceled flights. According to DOT’s Air Consumer Report, flight problems involving 
cancellations,  delays,  or  missed  connections  were  the  number  one  consumer  com-
plaint in 2007. 
DOT Data Provide an Incomplete Picture of the Sources of Delays 

The  data  collected  by  DOT  on  the  sources  of  delays  provide  information  about 
where  delays  occur  and  what  causes  them,  but  the  data  are  incomplete.  The  pri-
mary purposes for collecting these causal data are to inform the traveling public and 
categorize  delays  and  cancellations  so  that  the  parties  most  capable  of  addressing 
the  causes  of  delays  and  cancellations  can  take  corrective  action.  Since  2003,  air-
lines  have  reported  the  cause  of  delay  to  DOT  in  one  of  five  broad  categories:  late 
arriving  aircraft,  airline,  national  aviation  system,  extreme  weather,  and  security. 

17 George  Mason  University’s  passenger  trip  statistics  are  estimates  based  on  DOT  data  and 
other sources, and represent the average amount of trip delay expected by passengers on a large 
sample  of  flights.  See  Lance  Sherry  and  George  Donahue,  ‘‘U.S.  Passenger  Trip  Delay  Report,’’ 
Center  for  Air  Transportation  Systems  Research,  George  Mason  University,  April  2008,  avail-
able at http://catsr.ite.gmu.edu. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Mar 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80048.TXT JACKIE

23 

• Late  arriving  aircraft  means  a  previous  flight  using  the  same  aircraft  arrived 
late,  causing  the  subsequent  flight  to  depart  late.  In  2007,  approximately  38 
percent of delays were assigned to this category. 
• Airline  delays  include  any  delay  or  cancellation  that  was  within  the  control  of 
the  airlines,  such  as  aircraft  cleaning,  baggage  loading,  crew  issues,  or  mainte-
nance.  Roughly  29  percent  of  the  delays  in  2007  were  attributed  to  airline 
delays. 
• National  aviation  system  delays  and  cancellations  refer  to  a  broad  set  of  cir-
cumstances  affecting  airport  operations,  heavy  traffic  volume,  and  air  traffic 
control.  This  category  also  includes  any  nonextreme  weather  condition  that 
slows  the  operation  of  the  system,  such  as  wind  or  fog,  but  does  not  prevent 
flying.  The  national  aviation  system  accounted  for  about  28  percent  of  delays 
in 2007. 
• Extreme weather includes serious weather conditions that prevent the operation 
of  a  flight.  Examples  of  this  kind  of  weather  include  tornadoes,  snow  storms, 
and  hurricanes.  In  2007,  nearly  6  percent  of  delays  were  assigned  to  extreme 
weather.18 
• Security accounted for less than 1 percent of delays in 2007. Examples of secu-
rity delays include evacuation of an airport, reboarding due to a security breach, 
and long lines at the passenger screening areas. 

Since  2003,  despite  the  increasing  number  of  delays,  there  have  been  no  signifi-
cant  changes  in  the  trends  of  these  sources  of  delay.  Figure  3  shows  the  DOT-re-
ported sources of delay in 2007. 

Source: DOT. 
Note: Total may not add up to 100 percent due to rounding. 
The  distribution  of  delay  by  source  is  very  different  in  New  York  than  for  the 
country as a whole and reflects the New York area’s greater level of congestion. For 
example, national aviation system delays account for nearly 58 percent of all delays 
in  New  York  as  compared  to  approximately  28  percent  for  the  country  as  a  whole 
in  2007  (see  fig.  4).  As  noted  earlier,  the  three  major  New  York  area  airports  have 
experienced more than a 50 percent increase in traffic levels since 1998, while run-
way  capacity  at  these  airports  has  not  changed.  As  a  result,  FAA  must  resort  to 
a  complement  of  traffic  management  initiatives,  such  as  ground  delay  or  flow  con-

18 Weather  delays  are  captured  in  several  categories,  and  according  to  DOT,  a  true  picture 
of total weather-related delays requires several steps. First, DOT combines the extreme weather 
delays with weather delays from the aviation system category. Second, DOT performs a calcula-
tion to determine the weather-related delays included in the late arriving aircraft category. Air-
lines  do  not  report  the  causes  of  the  late  arriving  aircraft,  but  DOT  makes  an  allocation  using 
the  proportion  of  weather-related  delays  and  total  flights  in  the  other  categories.  Adding  the 
weather-related  delays  to  the  extreme  weather  and  aviation  system  weather  categories  results 
in  weather’s  share  of  all  flight  delays.  DOT  estimates  that  about  44  percent  of  flights  were  de-
layed by weather in 2007. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Mar 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80048.TXT JACKIE

.

s
p
e
3
M
E
L
F
5
1
7

trol  programs,  which  are  used  to  restrict  the  flow  of  traffic  and,  accordingly,  lead 
to delays.19 

24 

Source: DOT. 
Note: Total may not add up to 100 percent due to rounding. 
For  several  reasons,  the  data  provide  an  incomplete  picture  of  the  underlying 
causes of delays. First, the DOT-reported categories are too broad to provide mean-
ingful  information  on  the  root  causes  of  delays.  For  example,  delays  attributed  to 
the airlines could consist of causes such as a late crew, aircraft maintenance, or bag-
gage  loading,  but  these  more  specific  causes  are  not  captured  in  DOT  data,20 Sec-
ond, the largest source of systemwide delay—late arriving aircraft, which represents 
38  percent  of  the  total  delay  sources  (as  fig.  3  shows)—masks  the  original  source 
of  delay.  For  example,  the  original  source  of  delay  for  a  late  arriving  aircraft  may 
be the result of other sources—such as a severe weather condition, the airline, secu-
rity,  or  the  national  airspace  system—or  a  combination  of  one  or  more  of  these 
sources.  Finally,  the  data  do  not  capture  what  many  economists  believe  is  the  fun-
damental  cause  of  much  of  the  flight  delay—a  mismatch  between  the  demand  for 
and  capacity  to  provide  aviation  services.  While  the  data  provide  airlines’  view  of 
the  reason  that  particular  flight  segments  were  delayed,  DOT  does  not  report  data 
on the extent to which flights are simply overscheduled in particular places at par-
ticular  times  relative  to  the  capacity  of  the  airports  and  air  traffic  control  system 
to  provide  aviation  services.  The  DOT  Inspector  General  analyzed  airline  schedules 
at  15  airports  and  found  that  6  of  the  airports  had  flights  scheduled  either  at  or 
over  maximum  airport  capacity  at  peak  hours  of  the  day  during  the  summer  of 
2007.21 When  this  is  the  case,  assigning  the  cause  of  delay  to  one  of  the  five  DOT 
categories  masks  that  the  fundamental  cause  is  this  mismatch  of  demand  for  and 
supply of these services. 

19 FAA  has  traditionally  used  ground  delay  programs  to  control  air  traffic  volume  to  airports 
where the projected traffic demand is expected to exceed the airport’s capacity for a lengthy pe-
riod  of  time.  Under  a  ground  delay  program,  FAA  decreases  the  rate  of  incoming  flights  into 
an airport by holding a set of flights destined for that airport on the ground. According to FAA, 
the  most  common  reason  for  the  implementation  of  a  ground  stop  or  ground  delay  program  is 
adverse weather. 

20 GAO  is  currently  conducting  an  analysis  of  crew  scheduling  problems  and  the  extent  to 

which they may lead to delayed or canceled flights. 

21 DOT  Inspector  General.  Status  Report  on  Actions  Underway  to  Address  Flight  Delays  and 

Improve Airline Customer Service. CC–2008–058. (Washington, D.C.: Apr. 9, 2008). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Mar 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80048.TXT JACKIE

.

s
p
e
4
M
E
L
F
5
1
7

25 

DOT and FAA Are Implementing Actions Intended to Reduce Delays 

DOT  and  FAA  are  implementing  several  actions  intended  to  reduce  flight  delays 
beginning  in  summer  2008.22 Due  to  the  high  proportion  of  delays  at  the  three 
major  New  York  area  airports  and  their  effect  on  the  rest  of  the  airspace  system, 
many  of  these  actions  are  specifically  designed  to  address  congestion  in  the  New 
York  area.  For  purposes  of  our  discussion,  we  grouped  the  various  actions  into  one 
of  two  categories—capacity-enhancing  initiatives  and  demand  management  poli-
cies—both  of  which  are  intended  to  reduce  flight  delays.  Capacity-enhancing  initia-
tives  are  intended  to  increase  the  efficiency  of  existing  capacity  by  reducing  delay 
and maximizing the number of takeoffs and landings at an airport. By contrast, de-
mand  management  policies  influence  demand  through  administrative  measures  or 
economic incentives. Some of these capacity-enhancing initiatives and demand man-
agement policies will be fully or partially implemented by summer 2008, but others 
will not be completed or even initiated until later this year or beyond. 

DOT  and  FAA  have  announced  multiple  capacity-enhancing  initiatives  designed 
to  reduce  delays  in  the  New  York  region  for  this  summer  and  beyond.  In  general, 
adding  substantial  new  airspace  system  capacity  is  costly  and  time  consuming.23 
Thus, in March 2007, DOT and FAA convened a workgroup that identified 17 short- 
term  initiatives  that  better  utilize  existing  capacity  at  the  airport  or  system  level 
through  procedural  and  other  changes  in  airport  and  airspace  operations  and  could 
be  completed  by  summer  2008.  Eleven  of  the  17  short-term  initiatives  have  been 
completed,  and  FAA  plans  to  implement  the  remaining  initiatives,  which  require 
more  planning  and  coordination,  by  September  2008.24 See  Appendix  I  for  a  list  of 
the 17 short-term initiatives and their status. The initiatives range from new proce-
dures  and  reroutes  for  handling  air  traffic  during  severe  weather  conditions  to  ef-
forts  to  reduce  excessive  spacing  on  final  approach  before  landing,  and  to  an  air-
space  flow  program  that  allows  New  York  departures  to  move  more  freely  while 
delays  are  redistributed  to  airports  within  the  region.  In  addition  to  the  17  short- 
term  initiatives,  other  capacity-enhancing  initiatives  are  under  way.  These  include 
improving  coordination  with  DOD  for  airlines’  use  of  military  airspace  and  rede-
signing the airspace around the New York, New Jersey and Philadelphia metropoli-
tan  area.25 FAA  is  in  the  process  of  drafting  letters  of  agreement  that  would  help 
establish more formal processes for communicating with DOD for the release of spe-
cific  portions  of  military  airspace  on  an  as-needed  basis.  In  December  2007,  FAA 
initiated the first phase of the planned 5-year implementation of the airspace rede-
sign, with new departure headings at Newark and Philadelphia airports.26 In April 
2008,  FAA  appointed  a  New  York  Airspace  ‘‘Czar’’—whose  official  title  is  Director 
for  the  New  York  Area  Program  Integration  Office—to  coordinate  regional  airspace 
issues and projects. Table 2 lists the capacity-enhancing initiatives and their status. 
More  detailed  information  on  the  actions—including  descriptions,  geographic  focus, 
and status—can be found in Appendix II. 

22 Other  efforts  are  currently  under  way  to  improve  the  air  travel  experience  for  customers. 
For  example,  airlines  and  airport  operators  are  working  to  develop  plans  to  better  coordinate 
procedures  for  responding  to  extended  tarmac  delays,  and  DOT  formed  a  task  force  to  explore 
these  issues.  Also,  a  new  bumping  rule  was  announced  in  April  2008.  See  73  Fed.  Reg.  21026 
(April 18, 2008). The rule is not designed to reduce cancellations or delays, but rather, requires 
airlines to double the maximum compensation to those who are involuntarily bumped from their 
flight. 

23 For example, NextGen improvements to the air traffic control system are estimated to cost 
$25 billion and will not be completed until 2025. Adding runway capacity at airports is also ex-
pensive  and  time  consuming—for  example,  the  third  runway  at  Seattle-Tacoma  International 
Airport  is  estimated  to  cost  $1.1  billion–$1.2  billion  and  is  scheduled  to  take  at  least  16  years 
to complete. 

24 In addition to the short-term initiatives, FAA is working to implement the list of 77 initia-
tives  adopted  by  the  New  York  ARC.  This  list  includes  most  of  the  17  short-term  initiatives. 
FAA  reported  that  to  date,  17  of  the  77  initiatives  have  been  completed,  30  are  expected  to  be 
completed by the end of Fiscal Year 2008, and 40 should be completed by the end of Fiscal Year 
2009. FAA noted that the remaining initiatives are longer term or are being analyzed for feasi-
bility and establishing priorities. 

25 GAO is currently conducting a review of the New York/New Jersey/Philadelphia Metropoli-
tan area airspace redesign and plans to issue a report in July 2008. According to FAA, the pur-
pose of the airspace redesign is to increase the efficiency and reliability of the airspace structure 
and air traffic control system, thereby accommodating growth while enhancing safety and reduc-
ing  delays  in  air  travel.  Thus,  the  airspace  redesign  is  intended  to  increase  the  efficiency  and 
reliability  of  the  air  traffic  system,  and  is  included  as  a  capacity-enhancing  initiative  for  the 
purpose of this discussion. 

26 FAA will increase the number of departure headings air traffic controllers can assign to air-
craft during takeoffs, and adjust the routes air traffic controllers can assign aircraft during their 
final approach to an airport. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Mar 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80048.TXT JACKIE

26 

Table 2.—Capacity-Enhancing Initiatives and Their Status 

Capacity-enhancing initiatives 

Action 
17 short-term initiatives 
Coordination for use of military airspace 
New York/New Jersey/Philadelphia airspace redesign 
New York Airspace Czar 

Status 
11 of 17 initiatives completed 
In progress 
Initiated, estimated completion 2012 
Appointed 

Source: GAO analysis of DOT and FAA actions. 

DOT and FAA have also introduced demand management policies—most notably, 
hourly  schedule  caps  on  takeoffs  and  landings  at  the  three  major  New  York  area 
airports—to  its  pool  of  delay  reduction  efforts.  DOT  and  FAA  believe  that  caps  on 
scheduled operations are necessary at some airports where available capacity cannot 
meet  demand.  The  caps  are  currently  in  place  to  limit  scheduled  operations  at  all 
three major New York area airports, with hourly scheduled operations capped at 81 
at  both  JFK  and  Newark,  and  at  75  at  LaGuardia.  The  most  recent  caps  at  JFK 
and Newark are scheduled to be in place until October 2009.27 At LaGuardia, a De-
cember 2006 order maintained caps that had been in place since November 2000.28 
The institution of caps, however, does not necessarily mean that total operations at 
each  of  the  three  airports  will  decrease.  For  example,  at  JFK,  the  total  number  of 
daily scheduled operations will increase by 50 flights per day over summer 2007 lev-
els, when no caps were in place, but scheduled operations will be spaced more even-
ly throughout the day in an attempt to minimize peak period congestion. 

Two other demand management policies under way include an amendment to the 
Rates  and  Charges  policy  and  proposed  rules  to  establish  slot  auctions  at  all  three 
New  York  area  airports.  The  amendment  to  the  Rates  and  Charges  policy  clarifies 
that  airport  operators  may  establish  a  two-part  landing  fee  structure,  consisting  of 
both  an  operation  charge  and  an  aircraft  weight-based  charge,  and  include  rule 
changes  that  would  expand  the  costs  congested  airports  could  recoup  through  air-
field  charges.29 The  proposed  slot  auctions  for  the  three  New  York  area  airports 
would lease the majority of operations (takeoffs and landings, or slots) to incumbent 
operators and help develop a market by annually auctioning off leases for a limited 
number of slots during the first 5 years of the rule.30 

These  two  demand  management  policies  are  being  developed,  but  it  is  unlikely 
that  they  will  be  in  effect  by  this  summer.  DOT  and  FAA  just  recently  announced 
the final Rates and Charges policy amendment, so it is unlikely the policy will have 
an  impact  this  summer.  Furthermore,  existing  use  and  lease  agreements  between 
airlines  and  airport  operators  could  prevent  any  changes  to  rates  and  charges  for 
many years, until existing lease agreements expire. DOT and FAA are currently re-
viewing comments for the proposed rule to establish slot auctions at LaGuardia and 
will  be  collecting  comments  on  the  proposed  rule  to  establish  slot  auctions  at  JFK 

27 See  73  Fed.  Reg.  3510  (January  18,  2008)  for  the  final  order  on  the  caps  at  JFK  and  73 
Fed. Reg. 8737 (February 14, 2008) for an amendment correcting technical errors in this order. 
See 73 Fed. Reg. 29550 (May 21, 2008) for the final order on the Newark caps. 

28 65 Fed. Reg. 69126 (Nov.15, 2000). This was extended through December 31, 2006. 70 Fed. 

Reg. 36998 (June 27, 2005). 71 Fed. Reg. 248 (Dec. 27, 2006). 

29 A  final  amendment  to  the  Rates  and  Charges  policy  was  issued  on  July  8,  2008,  but  as  of 
July  11,  2008,  it  has  not  been  published  in  the  Federal  Register.  The  proposed  amendment  can 
be  found  at  73  Fed.  Reg.  3310  (January  17,  2008).  The  amendment  to  the  Rates  and  Charges 
policy  adopts  a  definition  for  a  congested  airport  that  contains  two  categories  of  congested  air-
ports, one relating to existing congestion and the other to future congestion. In the amendment, 
DOT  defines  a  congested  airport  first  as  an  airport  that  accounted  for  at  least  1  percent  of  all 
delayed aircraft operations in the United States and at an airport listed in table 1 of the FAA’s 
Airport  Capacity  Benchmark  Report  2004,  in  accordance  with  49  U.S.C.  § 47175.  Second,  DOT 
will  consider  an  airport  congested  in  the  future  if  it  is  forecasted  to  meet  a  defined  threshold 
level of congestion in the Future Airport Capacity Task 2 study, with the exception of those air-
ports  congested  for  the  first  time  in  2025.  DOT  and  FAA  assert  that  airports  already  have  the 
authority to adopt a two-part landing fee and the Rates and Charges policy clarifies this author-
ity. 

30 See  73  Fed.  Reg.  20846  (April  17,  2008)  for  the  supplemental  rulemaking  on  slot  auctions 
at  LaGuardia.  See  73  Fed.  Reg.  29625  (May  21,  2008)  for  the  notice  for  proposed  rulemaking 
on slot auctions at JFK and Newark. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Mar 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80048.TXT JACKIE

27 

and  Newark  until  July  21,  2008;  thus  it  is  unlikely  the  final  rules  will  be  issued 
during the summer. Table 3 lists the demand management policies and their status. 
More  detailed  information  on  the  actions—including  descriptions,  geographic  focus, 
and status—can be found in Appendix II. 

Table 3.—Demand Management Policies and Their Status 

Demand management policies 
Action 
Order limiting scheduled operations at JFK 
Order limiting scheduled operations at Newark 
Orders limiting scheduled operations at LaGuardia 
Rulemaking on slot auctions—LaGuardia 
Rulemaking on slot auctions—Newark, JFK 
Amendment to Rates and Charges policy 

Source: GAO analysis of DOT and FAA actions. 

Status 
Caps in effect since March 30, 2008 
Caps in effect since June 20, 2008 
Caps in effect since December 2006 
DOT and FAA are reviewing comments 
DOT and FAA are seeking comments 
Final policy issued July 8, 2008 

DOT’s and FAA’s Actions May Help Reduce Delays, but the Extent of Delay 

Reduction in Summer 2008 Will Likely Be Limited 

DOT’s and FAA’s capacity-enhancing initiatives have the potential to reduce con-
gestion  and  thereby  avoid  delays,  according  to  FAA  and  stakeholders  we  consulted, 
but  the  effect  will  likely  be  limited  for  the  summer  2008  traveling  season.  DOT’s 
and  FAA’s  demand  management  policies—in  particular,  caps  on  scheduled  oper-
ations at all three New York area airports—are expected to have some delay avoid-
ance impact in the near term. DOT and FAA set the caps at Newark and LaGuardia 
at  a  level  intended  to  avoid  an  increase  in  delays  above  that  experienced  in  2007 
and  set  the  caps  at  JFK  to  generate  a  15  percent  reduction  in  average  departure 
delays  over  2007  levels.  The  projected  impact  of  the  various  actions  undertaken  by 
DOT and FAA is also expected to be muted because several will not be in place until 
next  year  or  beyond.  Finally,  other  mitigating  economic  factors  could  lead  to  fewer 
operations in 2008, which might also lead to fewer delays. 

Although DOT and FAA have not analyzed the potential near-term benefit of the 
capacity-enhancing  initiatives,  FAA  officials  and  stakeholders  that  we  spoke  with 
anticipate that the capacity-enhancing initiatives will generally have a positive, but 
fairly  small,  impact  on  reducing  delays  in  the  near  term.  For  example,  while  FAA 
has  not  analyzed  the  estimated  impact  of  the  17  short-term  initiatives,  aviation 
stakeholders,  including  airport  operators,  airlines,  and  aviation  industry  associa-
tions,  believe  that  these  initiatives  will  have  a  positive  impact  in  summer  of  2008. 
However, most think the initiatives—when taken together—will result only in incre-
mental improvements and in certain situations and alone will not provide sufficient 
near-term gains to accommodate the peak hour schedules at the New York area air-
ports’  current  or  forecast  levels  of  demand.  Furthermore,  given  that  the  final  plan 
for coordinating the use of military airspace is still under development, the potential 
impact of this effort remains unknown. However, airlines agree that increasing use 
of  military  airspace  through  advanced  coordination  holds  promise,  and  the  release 
of military airspace over recent holiday weekends has been beneficial.31 Finally, al-
though  the  impact  of  the  newly  appointed  aviation  czar  is  also  unknown,  some  air-
lines and New York airport operators have supported the appointment of a czar, but 
also  expressed  concern  that  the  czar,  who  is  currently  lacking  a  dedicated  budget 
or  staff,  will  not  have  sufficient  authority  to  direct  and  coordinate  delay  reduction 
efforts across FAA and DOT offices. 

Of  the  capacity-enhancing  initiatives,  FAA  has  estimated  the  potential  future 
delay  reduction  benefits  of  one—the  New  York/New  Jersey/Philadelphia  Airspace 
Redesign.  FAA  estimates  that  the  airspace  redesign  will  result  in  a  20  percent  re-
duction  in  national  airspace  system  delays  for  the  New  York/New  Jersey/Philadel-
phia  study  area  airports  as  compared  to  taking  no  action.  According  to  FAA,  esti-
mated delay reduction will vary by airport and will be achieved only once the rede-
sign  has  been  fully  implemented.  The  airspace  redesign,  scheduled  to  be  completed 

31 FAA can currently use sections of military airspace on an as-needed basis and has had ad-
vanced coordination with DOD for use of military airspace over the Christmas and Thanksgiving 
travel  season  in  2007  and  again  over  the  Memorial  Day  and  Fourth  of  July  weekends  in  2008. 
The current efforts under way are to further establish processes and procedures for advance co-
ordination on a more regular basis. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Mar 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80048.TXT JACKIE

28 

in 2012, is highly controversial because residents living in affected areas have raised 
concerns about potential increases in aircraft noise and other environmental effects. 
Demand  management  policies,  which  do  not  require  long-term  investments,  will 
likely  have  a  more  immediate  but  similarly  limited  effect  on  relieving  congestion 
and  reducing  delays.  Because  of  increasing  congestion  at  JFK  and  Newark,  in  the 
fall of 2007, FAA used models to analyze the airlines’ proposed 2008 summer sched-
ules and determine potential future delays at these airports and the effect of caps.32 
The  proposed  summer  schedules  submitted  by  the  airlines  for  these  airports  would 
have  constituted  substantial  scheduling  increases  over  summer  2007.  On  the  basis 
of  these  proposed  schedules,  DOT  and  FAA  set  the  caps  at  JFK  at  a  level  that  is 
projected to decrease average departure delays by 15 percent over 2007 levels. How-
ever,  the  caps  at  LaGuardia  and  Newark  are  set  at  a  level  to  avoid  an  increase  in 
delays over 2007 levels. For example, at Newark, FAA estimates about a 23 percent 
reduction  in  the  average  delay  per  operation  relative  to  a  situation  with  no  cap. 
Newark’s  caps  were  designed  to  ensure  that  delays  did  not  get  significantly  worse 
in  2008  based  on  the  airlines’  proposed  summer  schedules  and  the  potential  for  in-
creased  operations  diverted  from  JFK.  Thus,  the  caps  at  Newark  are  not  expected 
to  bring  a  delay  reduction  benefit  as  compared  to  delays  experienced  in  2007.  At 
LaGuardia, which already had caps in 2007, FAA estimated that the long-term im-
plementation of caps would reduce delays by 32 percent as compared to no cap. 

Caps  at  the  New  York  area  airports  will  help  the  region  avoid  additional  delays 
in  the  near  term,  but  there  are  also  policy  trade-offs  to  consider.  In  general,  FAA, 
airlines, and aviation experts have stated that when available capacity cannot meet 
demand, managing operations at the airport level is necessary to reduce congestion 
and limit delays in the short run. FAA noted that imposing caps is an effective, but 
not  efficient,  way  to  reduce  delays.  Airlines  generally  support  caps  as  a  short-term 
solution  for  addressing  congestion  at  the  New  York  airports  because  of  the  wors-
ening  delays  at  these  airports.  FAA  stated  that  some  airlines  may  support  caps  at 
airports  they  already  serve  because  caps  generally  protect  incumbent  airlines  and 
limit competition from airlines that are interested in beginning service at these air-
ports (or new entrants). However, some airport operators strongly oppose flight caps 
because they state that caps could constrain the economic growth of the surrounding 
region.  In  addition,  some  airport  operators  and  aviation  experts  are  concerned  that 
using  caps  as  a  long-term  solution  can  mask  the  need  for  capacity  enhancements 
and  shift  the  focus  away  from  important  long-term  solutions  that  may  provide  a 
more lasting solution to the delay problem. 

The  proposed  slot  auction  rules  for  the  three  major  New  York  area  airports  are 
currently  out  for  comment  and  will  not  be  implemented  by  this  summer,  but  even 
if  they  were  in  place,  they  would  not  directly  reduce  delays.  DOT  and  FAA  intend 
the slot auctions to help create a market for slots in the New York area that allows 
new  entrants  better  access  to  the  airports  and  encourage  airlines  currently  holding 
slots  to  place  a  greater  value  on  the  use  of  their  slots.  By  itself,  a  slot  auction  will 
not reduce delays. But DOT and FAA believe that by helping to reveal the economic 
value  of  slots,  the  policy  may  help  to  develop  a  more  robust  secondary  market  for 
slots, which will, in turn, lead to greater efficiency in their allocation and use. DOT 
and FAA believe that doing so may increase the size of aircraft used at the airports 
and  thereby  increase  the  number  of  passengers  served.  The  proposed  rules  for  the 
three New York area airports include different slot auction options. Only one of the 
two options for LaGuardia would have a direct delay reduction impact. Specifically, 
this  option  would  require  approximately  18  slots  to  be  retired  over  5  years,  and 
would result in an estimated 1 minute of delay reduction for each takeoff and land-
ing at the airport.33 One slot auction proposal for Newark and JFK would reallocate 
10 percent of eligible capacity via annual auctions over 5 years, and FAA would re-
tain  the  net  auction  proceeds  for  use  on  unspecified  capacity  improvements  in  the 
New  York  area.  The  second  slot  auction  option  at  JFK  would  reallocate  20  percent 
of  eligible  slots  over  5  years,  and  the  net  auction  proceeds  would  be  granted  to  the 
carrier  whose  previously  held  slots  were  auctioned.  Under  this  option,  carriers 
whose slots are returned for auction would not be allowed to bid on their own slots. 
Some airline officials and airport operators stated that airlines have made substan-

32 FAA  worked  with  the  MITRE  Corporation  to  develop  models  and  capacity  analyses  to  set 
capacity limits at each of the three major New York area airports. Since the expected delay re-
duction  impact  of  a  cap  is  dependent  upon  the  level  at  which  a  cap  is  set,  when  setting  a  cap, 
policymakers face a tradeoff between how much delay they are willing to accept and the number 
of  operations  the  airlines  are  allowed.  For  example,  higher  constraint  levels  allow  more  oper-
ations during good weather, but may significantly increase delays during inclement weather. 

33 The second option for the LaGuardia slot auction does not retire any slots. As a result, this 

option does not result in a direct delay improvement. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Mar 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80048.TXT JACKIE

29 

tial  investments  at  these  airports  that  would  be  diminished  if  they  lose  operating 
rights.  Airlines  and  New  York  airport  operators  strongly  oppose  the  proposed  slot 
auctions  because  they  do  not  think  that  FAA  has  the  legal  authority  to  implement 
these auctions. 

The  potential  impact  of  the  Rates  and  Charges  policy—a  policy  that  is  unlikely 
to be implemented by this summer because the final notice was only announced on 
July  8,  2008—was  not  analyzed  by  DOT  and  FAA.  However,  DOT  and  FAA  assert 
that,  if  implemented,  the  amendment  to  the  Rates  and  Charges  policy  may  help  to 
reduce congestion, and thus delay, by encouraging airlines to use larger aircraft and 
schedule fewer operations during peak usage hours. Some airport operators support 
this policy because it provides them with more flexibility in setting landing fees and 
another  option  for  addressing  delays,  but  the  extent  to  which  airports  can  or  will 
implement the policy is unknown. Some airlines, airport operators, and aviation ex-
perts  assert  that  an  airport’s  implementation  of  a  two-part  landing  fee  under  the 
Rates  and  Charges  policy  may  not  reduce  delays  because  the  policy  requires  these 
fees  to  remain  revenue  neutral.34 In  other  words,  for  congested  airports,  the  policy 
will not enable the differential between peak and off-peak prices to be large enough 
to  change  airline  behavior  while  adhering  to  revenue  neutrality.  Some  airlines  and 
airport operators opposed the amendment because they think that it could discrimi-
nate against airlines whose fleets include mostly small aircraft because the amend-
ment  creates  a  fee  differential  for  small  to  medium-sized  aircraft  while  having  a 
negligible  effect  on  larger  aircraft.  Airlines  and  certain  airport  operators  also  ex-
pressed  concern  that  under  such  a  policy,  service  to  small  cities  would  be  dropped 
because carriers would favor using larger aircraft to serve larger cities. Several air-
lines stated that the Rates and Charges policy does not address the bigger problem 
of lack of capacity in the airspace system. 

Finally,  other  interrelated  factors  beyond  government  initiatives,  such  as  the  fi-
nancial  state  of  the  aviation  industry,  increasing  jet  fuel  prices,  and  the  downturn 
in  the  economy,  may  also  result  in  fewer  delays  during  2008,  but  their  impact  is 
uncertain. The Air Transport Association expects a 1 percent reduction in the num-
ber of passengers for the summer 2008 travel season as compared to the 2007 sum-
mer  travel  season,  and  many  airlines  are  planning  more  substantial  reductions  in 
capacity  and  schedules  for  the  fall  and  winter  2008  seasons.  Economic  conditions, 
rising fuel costs, and airline initiated capacity cuts could affect demand for air trav-
el  or  available  capacity  in  the  coming  months.  These  factors  also  reduce  congestion 
and,  accordingly,  delays  and  could  make  it  difficult  to  determine  how  much  of  the 
delay reductions, if any, might be attributed to the capacity-enhancing initiatives or 
demand management policies planned for summer 2008. 

In closing, DOT and FAA should be commended for taking steps to reduce mount-
ing  flight  delays  and  cancellations  for  the  2008  summer  travel  season.  However, 
delays  and  cancellations  this  summer  could  still  be  significant  given  the  likely  lim-
ited  impact  of  DOT’s  and  FAA’s  actions.  Capacity-enhancing  initiatives  can  provide 
some limited benefit in the near term, but they do not fundamentally expand capac-
ity.  Demand  management  policies,  especially  those  that  artificially  restrict  de-
mand—like schedule caps—may limit increases in delays, but should not be viewed 
as a meaningful or enduring solution to addressing the fundamental imbalances be-
tween  the  underlying  demand  for  and  supply  of  airspace  capacity.  The  growing  air 
traffic  congestion  and  delay  problem  that  we  face  in  this  country  is  the  result  of 
many  factors,  including  airline  practices,  inadequate  investment  in  airport  and  air 
traffic  control  infrastructure,  and  how  aviation  infrastructure  is  priced.  Addressing 
this  problem  involves  difficult  choices,  which  affect  the  interests  of  passengers,  air-
lines, airports, and local economies. If not addressed, congestion problems will inten-
sify as the growth in demand is expected to increase over the next 10 years. 

Mr.  Chairman,  this  concludes  my  prepared  statement.  I  would  be  pleased  to  re-
spond  to  any  questions  that  you  or  other  Members  of  the  Subcommittee  may  have. 

34 The  amendment  to  the  Rates  and  Charges  policy  states  that  the  revenue  generated  from 
the  two-part  landing  fee  structure  is  not  to  exceed  the  allowable  costs  of  the  airfield.  In  other 
words, any airport that implements the two-part landing fee would be required to structure the 
fees  such  that  the  total  revenue  raised  is  no  more  than  the  level  of  revenue  that  would  have 
been  raised  under  a  simple  weight-based  landing  fee.  That  is,  the  landing  fee  structure  must 
be ‘‘revenue neutral.’’ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Mar 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80048.TXT JACKIE

30 

Appendix I: New York Short-Term Initiatives 

17 Short-Term Initiatives to Enhance Capacity in the New York Area 

Action 

Description 

Status 

1.  John  F.  Kennedy  International  Airport 
(JFK)—Port Authority of New York and 
New  Jersey  (PANYNJ)  Daily  Planning 
Teleconferences 

2.  Simultaneous  Approaches  to  Runways 

31L/R at JFK 

3.  Accessing  J134/J149  from  Eliot  Inter-
section  (for  use  during  Severe  Weather 
Avoidance Programs) 

4.  Pass  Back  Departure  Restrictions–700 

mile restriction 

5. Excessive Spacing on Final Approach 

6. Conditional Holding Patterns 

7.  NY  Area  Severe  Weather  Avoidance 
Procedure  Action  Team  Items—Route 
Availability Planning Tool (RAPT) 

8. Second J80 Airway 

9.  Resectorizing  of  New  York  ARTCC 

(ZNY) Sector 73 

Daily  planning  teleconferences  to  provide 
a  common  situational  awareness  for 
customers—such as airlines, airport op-
erators,  the  military,  and  general  avia-
tion—on  the  planned  daily  operations 
at JFK. 

Simultaneous  runway  approaches  to  31L/ 
R  will  allow  approximately  4  to  6  more 
aircraft to land on this runway configu-
ration  when  weather  conditions  are 
classified  as  instrument  meteorological 
conditions (IMC). 

When  thunderstorms  affect  the  west  de-
parture routes, aircraft will be rerouted 
using  the  Eliot  departure  fix.  Benefits 
have  not  been  identified,  but  are  avail-
able for use as weather events dictate. 

Pass  back  restrictions  were  removed  on 
October  11,  2007,  beyond  700  miles  for 
traffic  destined  for  the  New  York  air-
ports. Departure restrictions to airports 
often  lead  to  delays  as  controllers  have 
to  wait  to  release  aircraft.  Eliminating 
this  airport  restriction  and  allowing  en 
route controllers to build in the spacing 
improves airport efficiency. 

Briefings and trainings at major facilities 
are planned to speed implementation of 
changes  associated  with  the  ‘‘proximity 
event’’  category.  Intent  is  to  help  edu-
cate  controllers  that  reducing  excessive 
spacing  between  aircraft  on  final  ap-
proach  can  help  reduce  delay  and 
should  not  be  considered  an  error,  be-
cause it does not pose a safety risk. 

Under  certain  conditions,  control  of  the 
holding  pattern  airspace  will  transfer 
from  the  New  York  Air  Route  Traffic 
Control  Center  (ZNY)  to  the  New  York 
TRACON  (N90).  This  allows  aircraft  to 
transition  out  of  the  holding  pattern 
using  terminal  separation  standards  (3 
miles)  as  opposed  to  the  en  route  sepa-
ration standards (5 miles).a 

When  affected  by  thunderstorms,  control-
lers  and  traffic  flow  managers  will  use 
a  weather  forecasting  technology  to 
identify  the  availability  of  departure 
routes, and provide traffic management 
specialists  with  the  ability  to  more 
quickly open and close routes and to re-
route aircraft. 

Creating  another  westbound  departure 
route  parallel  to  J80  has  the  potential 
to  mitigate  westbound  delays 
from 
JFK. 

A  reallocation  of  the  lower  part  of  sector 
73  at  the  New  York  Air  Route  Traffic 
Control  Center  will  allow  the  remain-
ing sector to focus on aircraft departing 
Philadelphia and New York. 

Completed 

Completed 

Completed 

Completed 

In progress 

In progress 

In progress 

Completed 

Completed 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Mar 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80048.TXT JACKIE

17 Short-Term Initiatives to Enhance Capacity in the New York Area—Continued 

Action 

Description 

Status 

31 

10.  Moving  J79  Boston  (Logan  Airport 

[BOS] Arrivals to the East) 

11. Moving Overflights in ZNY34 

12. Airspace Flow Program (AFP) for New 

York Departures 

13.  Severe  Weather  Avoidance  Procedure 

(SWAP) Escape Routes 

14.  Deconflict  Newark  Airport  (EWR)  Ar-

rivals Over SHAFF Intersection 

15.  Simultaneous  Visual  Approaches  to 

Runway 4L at EWR 

16. Caribbean Tactical Reroutes to EWR 

17. EWR Runways 4R/29 Waiver 

Move current BOS arrivals via J79 to the 
east  and  reduce  congestion  at  the 
MERIT departure fix. 

Moving crossing traffic, or overflights, out 
of  the  way  of  New  York  departures,  al-
lowing  for  unrestricted  climbs  to  re-
quested altitude, and reducing delay by 
decreasing  miles  in  trail  for  New  York 
departures. 

Apply  AFP  technology  to  manage  depar-
tures  from  the  NY  airports,  such  that 
NY  airport  departures  would  be  al-
lowed to freely flow and delayed flights 
would  be  redistributed  to  other  periph-
eral airports. 

SWAP  escape  routes  in  Canadian  air-
space  are  used  and  coordinated  daily 
with Canada’s civil air navigation serv-
ices  provider  (NAV  CANADA).  Used 
mostly  during  the  summer  because  of 
thunderstorms and winds in the United 
States. 

Allows for more efficient arrivals from the 
north  into  Newark  by  moving  or  elimi-
nating crossing traffic. No added capac-
ity  benefits  are  expected.  Do  expect  to 
get  some  added  operational  efficiency 
for  aircraft  while  in  the  en  route  por-
tion of flight. 

A  procedure  that  allows  for  simultaneous 
arrivals  on  runways  4L  and  4R,  when 
weather permits. 

Traffic  management  procedure  to  allow 
EWR arrival aircraft to fly at higher al-
titudes  and  in  a  less  circuitous  route. 
No  added  capacity  benefits  are  ex-
pected. 

Procedures  currently  allow  for  these  run-
way configurations to be used in Visual 
Meteorological 
(VMC). 
Waiver  has  been  signed  to  allow  arriv-
als to land on Runway 29 while landing 
on Runway 4R. 

Conditions 

In progress 

In progress 

In progress 

Completed 

Completed 

Completed 

Completed 

Completed 

a Terminal  Radar  Approach  Control  (TRACON)  is  an  FAA  air  traffic  control  facility  which  uses  radar  and  two  way  radio  commu-

nication  to  provide  separation  of  air  traffic  within  a  specific  geographic  area  in  the  vicinity  of  one  or  more  large  airports. 

Source:  GAO  analysis  based  on  DOT  and  FAA  actions. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Mar 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80048.TXT JACKIE

Appendix  II:  Status  and  Reported  Benefits  of  Capacity-Enhancing 

Initiatives and Demand Management Policies 

32 

Capacity-Enhancing Initiatives 

Action 

Description 

Focus 

Status 

17 short-term 
initiatives 

Coordination with the 
Department of Defense 
(DOD) for use of 
military airspace 

New York/New Jersey/ 
Philadelphia (NY/NJ/ 
PHL) Airspace 
Redesign 

New York Airspace 
Czar 

The New York Aviation 
Rulemaking Committee 
(ARC) recommended a list 
of 77 items for consider-
ation and implementation 
in the New York area. 
From these, FAA identi-
fied 17 short-term initia-
tives for immediate ac-
tion. 
FAA is working with DOD 
to explore the current use 
of special use airspace, de-
velop proposals for in-
creased civil use of mili-
tary airspace, and evalu-
ate letters of agreement 
that provide operational 
direction for the shared 
uses of special use air-
space 
The Airspace Redesign of 
the NY/NJ/PHL metro-
politan area involves 
changes to airspace con-
figurations and air traffic 
management procedures. 
The selected alternative 
(Integrated Airspace Al-
ternative with Integrated 
Control Complex) inte-
grates the entire airspace 
with a common automa-
tion platform. Air traffic 
controllers can reduce air-
craft separation rules 
from 5 to 3 nautical miles 
over a larger geographical 
area than the current air-
space structure allows 
ARC participants agreed 
that appointing a New 
York aviation czar to co-
ordinate regional airspace 
issues and all projects and 
initiatives addressing 
problems of congestion 
and delays in New York 
would be beneficial. As a 
result, the Director of the 
New York Integration Of-
fice position was created 

Reported delay reduction 
benefit a 

Not analyzed but like-
ly to be small. 

NY region

Eleven of the 17 
short-term initia-
tives are currently 
complete. The oth-
ers are planned 
for completion by 
the end of Fiscal 
Year 2008.

East Coast  FAA’s efforts to 

standardize use of 
military airspace 
with DOD are on-
going and the out-
come is uncertain.

Final plan unknown, 
therefore benefit un-
known. 

NY region

When the redesign is 
fully implemented in 
2012, FAA estimated 
a 20 percent reduction 
in national airspace 
system delay in the 
study area as com-
pared to taking no ac-
tion. Estimated ar-
rival and departure 
delay reduction varies 
between airports. 

Implementation 
began on Decem-
ber 19, 2007, with 
the introduction of 
additional depar-
ture headings at 
Philadelphia 
International and 
Newark Inter-
national airports. 
FAA has stated 
that it does not be-
lieve there will be 
additional changes 
implemented until 
fall 2008. Final 
implementation by 
2012.

NY region Marie Kennington- 
Gardiner has been 
appointed Director 
of the New York 
Integration Office.

Unknown. 

Demand Management Policies 
Order limiting 
scheduled operations 
at John F. Kennedy 
International airport 

In January 2008, FAA 
issued an order setting a 
cap on the number of 
hourly operations at JFK. 
The order took effect 
March 30, 2008, and will 
expire October 24, 2009 

NY region

Operations are 
capped at 81 per 
hour.

FAA estimates that 
caps would reduce av-
erage departure 
delays by 5.5 minutes, 
or 15 percent. The 
number of departure 
delays of 60 minutes 
or more would de-
crease 31 percent. 
Based on proposed 
summer 2008 sched-
ules, estimated delays 
could have increased 
by up to 150 percent. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Mar 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80048.TXT JACKIE

Capacity-Enhancing Initiatives—Continued 

33 

Action 

Description 

Focus 

Status 

Order limiting 
scheduled operations 
at Newark 
International airport 

In March 2008, FAA pro-
posed an order to cap 
flights at Newark. The 
final order was issued on 
May 21, 2008, and takes 
effect on June 20, 2008, 
and expires October 24, 
2009 

NY region

Scheduled oper-
ations capped at 
81 per hour by 
summer 2008.

Orders limiting 
scheduled operations 
at LaGuardia (LGA) 

Supplemental 
rulemaking on slot 
auctions at LGA 

Proposed rulemaking 
on slot auctions at 
JFK and Newark 

In December 2006, FAA 
published a temporary 
order maintaining the 
same caps and exemptions 
in place since November 
2000. In April 2008, FAA 
also published an order 
limiting unscheduled op-
erations to 3 per hour 
In April 2008, FAA issued 
a supplemental rule-
making to lease the ma-
jority of slots at the air-
port to the incumbent op-
erators and to develop a 
market by annually auc-
tioning off leases for a 
limited number of slots 
during the first 5 years of 
the rule. Two options to 
annually auction these 
slots were proposed 

In May 2008, FAA issued 
a notice of proposed rule-
making to assign to exist-
ing operators the majority 
of slots at Newark and 
JFK, and create a market 
by annually auctioning off 
a limited number of slots 
in each of the first 5 years 

NY region

Scheduled oper-
ations will be 
capped at 75 per 
hour during sum-
mer 2008.

NY region

Comment period 
ended June 16, 
2008. DOT is re-
viewing comments.

NY region

In comment period 
until July 21, 2008.

Reported delay reduction 
benefit a 

Slight reduction in ar-
rival delays offset by 
slight increase in de-
parture delays with no 
estimated net change 
in average delay be-
tween 2007 and 2008. 
The purpose is to keep 
delays from worsening 
at Newark in 2008 be-
cause of caps at. 
Based on proposed 
summer 2008 sched-
ules, estimated arrival 
delays would increase 
by as much 50 percent 
in 2008 without the 
limits. 
FAA estimates 32 per-
cent reduction in aver-
age delay as compared 
to no cap. As the caps 
were already in place, 
no new benefit is ex-
pected in summer 
2008. 

Will depend on the op-
tion selected. Option 1 
(slot retirement of 1.5 
slots per year) esti-
mated to result in 1 
minute of average 
delay reduction. Op-
tion 2 does not retire 
slots. DOT believes 
the proposal will help 
reveal the economic 
value of slots, and 
may increase the size 
of aircraft used at the 
airports, and thereby 
increase the number 
of passengers served. 
FAA states that the 
immediate impact will 
be to prevent a return 
to, or worsening of, 
the conditions and 
delay experienced dur-
ing summer 2007. By 
itself, a slot auction 
will not reduce delays. 
However, DOT be-
lieves the proposal 
will help reveal the 
economic value of 
slots, and may in-
crease the size of air-
craft used at the air-
ports, and thereby in-
crease the number of 
passengers served. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Mar 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80048.TXT JACKIE

34 

Focus 

U.S. 

Status 

Final policy issued 
July 8, 2008.

Reported delay reduction 
benefit a 

Not assessed, it is un-
known to what extent 
airports can or will 
implement this policy 
or the airlines’ re-
sponse if it is imple-
mented. 

Capacity-Enhancing Initiatives—Continued 

Action 

Description 

Amendment to the 
Airport Rates and 
Charges policy 

Announced in July 2008, 
the policy clarifies the 
ability of airport operators 
to establish a two-part 
landing fee structure con-
sisting of both an oper-
ation charge and a 
weight-based charge, giv-
ing airports the flexibility 
to vary charges based on 
the time of day and the 
volume of traffic. It also 
permits the operator of a 
congested airport to 
charge users a portion of 
the cost of airfield projects 
under construction and 
expands the authority of 
an operator of a congested 
airport to include in the 
airfield fees of congested 
airports a portion of the 
airfield fees of other un-
derutilized airports owned 
and operated by the same 
proprietor 

Source:  GAO  analysis  based  on  DOT  and  FAA  actions. 
a For  some  actions,  DOT  has  stated  additional  benefits  unrelated  to  delay  reduction. 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. Thank you, Ms. Fleming. 
And now, Mr. Meenan. 

STATEMENT  OF  JOHN  M.  MEENAN,  EXECUTIVE  VICE 
PRESIDENT  AND  COO,  AIR  TRANSPORT  ASSOCIATION  OF 
AMERICA, INC. 
Mr. MEENAN. Mr. Chairman, thank you very much. 
To  briefly  summarize  my  written  statement,  I  wanted  to  make 
just  a  few  quick  points  about  the  state  of  aviation  and  the  delay/ 
congestion situation we’re dealing with. And I have to tell you, it’s 
not very good news. 

The airline industry, as you know, is literally being decimated by 
the  current  fuel  price  situation.  We  are  looking  at  a  loss  in  the 
range of $10 billion this year. We’ve already lost 31,000 jobs in the 
industry. We’re parking hundreds of airplanes every day. We’re fac-
ing air service cuts across the country that are going to undermine 
local economies and the Nation’s economy at the same time. 

We  anticipate  that  we  are  likely  to  lose  the  equivalent  of  one  of 
our  largest  airlines  in  the  United  States  because  of  reductions  in 
service.  And  with  the  fuel  bill  up  $20  billion  just  since  last  year, 
we’re now pushing a $62-billion figure for our annual fuel bill. 

It’s  easy  to  understand  why  we’re  so  focused  on  improving  air 
traffic management. Every minute, every second saved in transit is 
fuel  savings  that  amount  to  huge  potential  returns  to  the  bottom 
line. 

Redesign  of  our  badly  outdated  airspace  system  combined  with 
improved  operations  will  significantly  improve  system  agility. 
Smarter,  more  efficient  aircraft  departures,  routings,  and  landing 
sequences will all help us to eliminate and reduce fuel burn. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Mar 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80048.TXT JACKIE

35 

When  it  comes  to  dealing  with  delays,  the  East  Coast  airspace, 
centered  in  New  York,  is  a  critical  place  to  focus.  Although  New 
York  has  only  12  percent  of  operations,  systemwide,  it  has  45  per-
cent  of  the  flight  delays.  There’s  no  question  that  the  ripple  effect 
from  New  York  will  be  significant  throughout  the  country,  and, 
handled correctly, relief in the New York airspace will help unglue 
the rest of the system. 

So,  you  might  ask  yourself  what  the  Department  of  Transpor-
tation  is  doing  with  the  ever-increasing  congestion  to  make  sure 
that passengers, shippers, and airlines can get where they want to 
go  on  time.  The  answer  is:  not  much.  Instead  of  moving  forward 
with  capacity  enhancements  and  airspace  redesign  with  every 
available  resource  and  with  all  deliberate  speed,  the  DOT  is,  in-
credibly,  pushing  congestion  pricing  and  slot  auctions,  completely 
unproven  textbook  experiments  that  some  graduate  student  might 
love  to  pursue,  but  not  one  that  anyone  in  the  aviation  world  be-
lieves in. 

In  the  next  few  months,  DOT  seems  intent  on  leaving  a  legacy 
of  failed,  but  extremely  costly,  experiments  that  do  nothing  to  re-
duce  congestion  and  flight  delays  in  New  York  or  anywhere  else. 
Auctions  and  congestion  pricing  rob  the  airlines  of  years  of  stra-
tegic investment and planning. And, as we make clear in our writ-
ten  statement,  congestion  pricing  and  slot  auctions  are  unlawful, 
unfair, and incredibly costly to passengers and airlines at a critical 
time in the industry’s meltdown—current meltdown. 

We  believe  that  these  proposals  have  been  tried  and  they  will 
fail.  Our  prescription,  however,  is  simple.  We  need  to  stop  talking 
about  ideology  and  experiments,  and  start  leaving  a  legacy  that 
will  help,  not  hurt,  the  country.  We  need  to  devote  the  resources 
necessary,  right  now,  to  implement  New  York  airspace  redesign 
and  related  initiatives.  We  need  to  work  with  the  Port  Authority 
and  the  air  traffic  controllers  to  implement  the  near-term  capacity 
enhancements identified last year by the New York ARC. We need 
to  work  with  the  Department  of  Defense  and  Congress,  if  nec-
essary, to open up new airways. We need to accelerate the develop-
ment  and  implementation  of  technologies  that  bring  NextGen  Air 
Transportation  System  online,  and  we  need  to  deploy  the  world-
wide scheduling guidelines, where necessary. 

More  broadly,  with  regard  to  fuel  prices,  we  must  move  aggres-
sively, in our view, to address both supply and demand issues, and, 
as  this  Committee  has  heard  previously,  to  address  the  unhealthy 
level of speculation currently going on in the fuel market. 

That  concludes  my  statement.  I’d  be  happy  to  respond  to  ques-

tions. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Meenan follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF JOHN M. MEENAN, EXECUTIVE VICE PRESIDENT AND COO, 

AIR TRANSPORT ASSOCIATION OF AMERICA, INC. 

Introduction 

We  are  well  into  the  summer  travel  season  now  and  it  is  apparent  that  many  of 
the  conditions  that  led  to  record  delays  in  2007,  particularly  in  the  New  York  re-
gion, are present today and at times cause material delays in the National Airspace 
System. For this reason, the Air Transport Association (ATA) continues to urge the 
Federal Aviation Administration (FAA) to focus its resources on accelerating deploy-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Mar 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80048.TXT JACKIE

36 

ment  of  the  technologies  and  measures  that  will  bring  meaningful  improvement  to 
airspace capacity and efficiency, especially in New York. 

The  real  solution  to  congestion  lies  in  FAA  pushing  ahead  with  the  tools  it  does 
have.  Instead  of  trying  to  manipulate  airline  scheduling  through  artificial  means, 
FAA (and DOT) should manage the airspace and the air traffic control system more 
effectively and efficiently: implement airspace redesign and related initiatives; work 
with  the  Department  of  Defense  and  Congress,  as  necessary,  to  open  up  new  air-
ways on a permanent basis; accelerate development and implementation of the tech-
nologies that will bring us NextGen; and work with the Port Authority of New York 
and  New  Jersey,  Philadelphia  International  Airport  and  the  airlines  to  implement 
the numerous near-term capacity enhancement measures that were identified by the 
New  York  Aviation  Rulemaking  Committee  last  year.  Where  operations  have  been 
capped,  DOT  should  adopt  fully  the  Worldwide  Scheduling  Guidelines,  which  con-
tain  a  well-established  and  accepted  slot  allocation  process,  and  establish  a  vibrant 
and transparent secondary slot market. 

ATA  member  airlines,  which  carry  more  than  90  percent  of  domestic  passenger 
and  cargo  traffic,  reflect  the  changing  and  diverse  nature  of  commercial  aviation 
today.  Our  membership  includes  the  leading  network  passenger  and  low-cost  car-
riers, and both large and small cargo carriers.1 The significance of this point is that 
our  membership  is  unified  in  its  opposition  to  the  Department  of  Transportation 
(DOT) 2 proposed congestion management proposals. 

ATA  also  is  aligned  with  the  airport  community,  including  the  Port  Authority  of 
New York and New Jersey, in opposing the DOT auction proposal. Perhaps an even 
rarer state of affairs. 

DOT  proposals  to  ‘‘manage’’  congestion  in  New  York  airspace—slot  auctions  and 
congestion  pricing—reflect  a  manifestly  poor  policy  judgment  about  how  to  address 
delays in the New York area. It is a poor policy choice because these proposals con-
ceal the root problem underlying delays. 

Congestion  and  delays  in  New  York  result  from  several  factors,  but  the  primary, 
driving  factor  is  DOT  failure  to  supply  the  airspace  and  air  traffic  management  in-
frastructure  this  country  needs.  The  commerce  of  the  United  States—indeed  of  the 
world—drives  airline  scheduling  and  by  seeking  to  curb  artificially  the  demand  for 
airspace  and  air  traffic  services,  DOT  proposals  harm  U.S.  commerce  and  the  na-
tional economy, the local economy of New York City, and the competitiveness of U.S. 
airlines in the global aviation marketplace. Simply put, these proposals are a confes-
sion of failure. 

Equally  important,  DOT  lacks  statutory  authority  for  its  congestion  management 
proposals.  The  fees  associated  with  the  proposed  auctions  are  new  user  fees  that 
Congress  has  prohibited.3 Furthermore,  when  Congress  wants  to  grant  an  agency 
authority  to  conduct  auctions,  it  knows  how  to  do  so.  It  has  not  done  so  here.  In-
deed,  DOT  has  acknowledged  on  more  than  one  occasion  that  it  does  not  have  au-
thority to mandate congestion management measures.4 This leads inexorably to the 
question  of  why  does  DOT  continue  to  waste  valuable  taxpayer  dollars  pursing  un-
lawful measures that will not work? 

Finally,  DOT  has  lost  sight  of  the  ancient  maxim,  primum  non  nocere,  ‘‘first,  do 
no  harm.’’  The  U.S.  airline  industry  is  reeling  from  oil  shock  like  no  other  U.S.  in-
dustry and faces an uncertain future. We project that U.S. airlines will spend rough-
ly $61 billion on jet fuel in 2008, $20 billion more than in 2007. Consequently, U.S. 
airlines will lose $7–$13 billion in 2008. Already, eight U.S. airlines have ceased op-
erating  since  the  end  of  2007  and  two  other  airlines  are  operating  under  Chapter 
11  protection.  Instead  of  experimenting  with  illegal  and  ill-conceived  plans  to  sup-

1 ATA  is  the  principal  trade  and  service  organization  of  the  U.S.  scheduled  airline  industry. 
The  members  of  the  association  are:  ABX  Air,  Inc.;  AirTran  Airways;  Alaska  Airlines,  Inc.; 
American Airlines, Inc.; ASTAR Air Cargo, Inc.; Atlas Air, Inc.; Continental Airlines, Inc.; Delta 
Air  Lines,  Inc.;  Evergreen  International  Airlines,  Inc.;  Federal  Express  Corporation;  Hawaiian 
Airlines; JetBlue Airways Corp.; Midwest Airlines; Northwest Airlines, Inc.; Southwest Airlines 
Co.; United Airlines, Inc.; UPS Airlines; and U.S. Airways, Inc. Associate members are: Air Can-
ada; Air Jamaica; and Mexicana. 

2 References to DOT include the Federal Aviation Administration (FAA). 
3 ‘‘[N]one  of  the  funds  in  this  Act  shall  be  available  for  the  Federal  Aviation  Administration 
to  finalize  or  implement  any  regulation  that  would  promulgate  new  aviation  user  fees  not  spe-
cifically  authorized  by  law  after  the  date  of  the  enactment  of  this  Act  . . .’’  2008  DOT  Appro-
priations Act, Pub. L. 110–161, 121 Stat. 2379, and prior annual appropriations acts. 

4 For  example:  ‘‘In  the  [2006  LGA]  NPRM,  the  FAA  stated  that  it  did  not  have  the  authority 
to reallocate Operating Authorizations via a market-based mechanism. . . . The FAA continues 
to  believe  that  it  cannot  rely  on  a  market-based  allocation  method  under  a  purely  regulatory 
approach,  which  is  why  it  explicitly  sought  legislation  on  this  matter.’’  Supplemental  Notice  of 
Proposed Rulemaking, 73 Fed. Reg. 20852 (April 17, 2008). See Section III, for further discussion 
of this point. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Mar 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80048.TXT JACKIE

37 

press  demand  for  air  transportation  services,  the  Department  should  assess  what 
it can do to relieve the industry of unnecessary costs and regulatory burdens. 

Congress  can  help,  too,  by  addressing  some  of  the  pressures  driving  oil  prices  to 
ever-increasing new highs. We believe legislation that brings transparency to the oil 
futures  markets  and  restores  reasonable  regulatory  measures  to  prevent  excessive 
speculation  by  purely  financial  interests,  as  opposed  to  those  who  use  petroleum 
products, will have an immediate beneficial impact. In addition, we strongly support 
efforts  to  increase  our  domestic  supply  of  crude  oil  and  refined  products.  ATA  sup-
ports  domestic  exploration  and  environmentally  sound  expansion  of  energy  produc-
tion  here  at  home.  In  the  long  run,  energy  supply  must  be  enhanced.  That  is  why 
we also support expanding other sources of domestic energy supplies, including nu-
clear,  wind,  solar,  coal,  biofuels  and  other  sources.  Both  problems—excessive,  un-
regulated speculation and energy supply—must be fixed. 
DOT Congestion Management Proposals Ignore Reality 
DOT Congestion Management Proposals 

DOT has proposed two measures to ‘‘manage’’ congestion in the New York region. 
The  first  proposal  would  modify  the  joint  FAA/DOT  formal  policy  on  airport  rates 
and charges to permit—indeed encourage—airports to increase the costs they charge 
to  airlines  for  operating  during  congested  time  periods.  Because  airport  charges 
must,  as  a  matter  of  law,  be  cost-based,  DOT  has  proposed  measures  that  would 
allow airports to artificially increase the costs that can be passed on to airlines. 

The second proposal is an experiment to auction slots at each of the three primary 
New  York  City  airports.  Each  year  for  the  next  5  years,  FAA  will  confiscate  slots 
from carriers and then auction them off to the highest bidder.5 In 10 years, all slots 
would automatically terminate and revert back to the FAA, leaving carriers without 
any idea of their ability to operate their schedules. This feature is absolutely incon-
sistent  with  encouraging  carriers  to  invest  in  the  operations,  facilities,  aircraft  and 
employees necessary to compete at these airports. 

As discussed in the DOT Auction and Congestion Pricing Proposals Are Unlawful 
section  that  follows,  both  of  these  proposals  are  legally  deficient  and,  for  that  rea-
son, cannot be implemented. However, they are also the outcome of poor policy judg-
ments because they ignore operational reality. 
Weather, Not Air Carrier Schedules, Causes Delay 

In the FAA’s own words: 

Bad  weather  causes  70  percent  of  all  delays.  The  situation  is  worse  during  the 
summer:  unlike  winter  storms,  which  take  time  to  develop  and  move  slowly, 
summer storms can form quickly, stretch for hundreds of miles and travel rap-
idly  over  large  portions  of  the  country,  grounding  flights  and  sending  chain-re-
action  delays  throughout  the  Nation’s  airspace  system.  FAA  Fact  Sheet, 
May 22, 2008.6 

Little can or need be added to this revealing statement. When it comes to airline 
delays,  the  chief  culprit  is  weather.  It  is  obvious,  of  course,  that  the  impact  of  bad 
weather  is  greatest  where  air  traffic  is  heaviest,  such  as  in  the  New  York  region. 
But  that  is  not  justification  for  DOT  experimental  proposals,  especially  when  other 
contributing factors—discussed below—are considered. 
New  York  Airspace  Has  Significant  Non-Air  Carrier  Jet  Traffic  That  Contributes  to 

Congestion 

We  have  testified  on  several  occasions  that  business  jet  operations  are  a  signifi-
cant  contributor  to  congestion  and  delays  in  the  New  York  region.  We  pointed  out 
last September, for example, that air carrier and air taxi (primarily regional airline) 
operations  combined  accounted  for  just  53  percent  of  the  New  York  City  activity 
based  on  July  2007  data.7 In  the  future,  this  number  is  likely  to  decrease  further 
given the schedule reductions airlines have announced.8 

5 DOT  proposes  two  options  for  how  the  proceeds  will  used.  Under  Option  1,  DOT  claims  the 
proceeds  will  be  used  to  mitigate  congestion  in  the  New  York  region;  under  Option  2,  the  pro-
ceeds  would  be  paid  to  the  air  carriers  from  whom  the  slots  were  taken.  But  under  Option  2, 
more slots would be confiscated—20 percent instead of 10 percent. 

6 http://www.faa.gov/news/factlsheets/newslstory.cfm?newsId=10227. 
7 The  multiple  factors  affecting  congestion  and  delays  are  addressed  at  length  in  our  written 
statement  before  the  House  Aviation  Subcommittee  on  the  subject  of  Airline  Delays  and  Con-
sumer Issues, September 26, 2007, available at http://www.airlines.org/government/testimony/ 
ATA+Testimony+-+Airline+Delays+and+Consumer+Issues.htm. 

8 See pp. [44–45] below. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Mar 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80048.TXT JACKIE

38 

Source: Federal Aviation Administration (FAA) OPSNET
Remarkably,  this  fundamental  fact  is  ignored  by  DOT  demand  management  pro-
posals.  In  light  of  recent  findings  by  the  DOT  Inspector  General,  this  oversight  is 
puzzling and should be a serious concern to this Committee. 

*Air Carrier + Air Taxi. 

In  March  2008,  the  DOT  Inspector  General  released  a  report  on  use  of  the  Na-
tional  Airspace  System  (NAS).9 In  his  report,  the  Inspector  General  found  that 
‘‘business jets’ NAS usage is considerable,’’ with ‘‘[n]on-air carrier jets accounting for 
12 percent of tower and 13 percent of terminal area control services in 2005.’’ 10 The 
Inspector  General  added:  ‘‘To  put  this  in  perspective,  . . .  business  jets’  tower  and 
terminal area control services in FY 2005 was about one-third of air carrier jets.’’ 11 

Regarding the New York City region, the Inspector General noted: 

The New York TRACON facility handles three large primary airports, [footnote 
omitted]  primarily  serving  air  carriers,  and  12  outlying  towered  airports,  pri-
marily  serving  non-air  carriers.  Non-air  carriers  accounted  for  20  percent  to  30 
percent  of  the  peak  level  of  instrument  approach  operations  at  the  New  York 
TRACON. (emphasis added). 
[B]oth air carriers and non-air carriers were competing for terminal area control 
services during the same busy, congested time periods. For example, at the New 
York  TRACON,  non-air  carriers  exhibited  the  same  time  of  day  peaking  in  de-
mand for terminal services as did air carriers (see figure 5).12 

9 Report No. CR–2008–28, March 3, 2008. 
10 Id. at 10, 11. 
11 Id. at 12. 
12 Id. at 13–14. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Mar 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80048.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e
.
1
N
E
E
M
5
1
7

39 

Source: OIG Analysis of FAA Data. 
Likewise,  the  Inspector  General  found  that  non-air  carrier  use  of  the  New  York 
Terminal Control Area peaks during the afternoon hours and contributes to conges-
tion.13 

These findings by the Inspector General further highlight a significant policy defi-
ciency of DOT congestion management proposals: DOT has ignored the very serious 
and  significant  contribution  to  delays  and  congestion  in  New  York  airspace  from 
business  jet  and  high-performance  general  aviation  operations.  DOT  auction  and 
congestion pricing proposals cannot succeed if they ignore these operations. 

The  obvious  related  point,  of  course,  is  that  by  ignoring  non-air  carrier  jet  oper-
ations  in  New  York  airspace,  the  proposals—particularly  the  auction  proposals— 
shift  the  entire  cost  of  reducing  congestion  and  delays  (financial  and  operational) 
onto air carriers and their passengers and shipping customers. Rather than seeking 
a  fair  and  balanced  solution,  DOT’s  proposals  amount  to  yet  another  subsidy  for 
business  jet  owners  and  other  non-air  carrier  jet  operators.  Such  a  burden  on  com-
mercial air carriers and their customers is patently unfair. 
DOT Aucton and Congestion Pricing Proposals Are Unlawful 

The  FAA’s  own  clear  and  unqualified  words  in  2006  condemn  its  current  auction 

and congestion pricing proposals: 

[A]  legislative  proposal  to  Congress  . . .  will  seek  authority  to  utilize  market- 
based  mechanisms  at  LaGuardia  in  the  future.  Such  legislation  would  be  nec-
essary  to  employ  market-based  approaches  such  as  auctions  or  congestion  pric-
ing  at  LaGuardia  because  the  FAA  currently  does  not  have  the  statutory  au-
thority  to  assess  market-clearing  charges  for  a  landing  or  departure  authoriza-
tion.  If  Congress  approves  the  use  of  market-based  mechanisms  as  we  plan  to 
propose, a new rulemaking would be necessary to implement such measures at 
LaGuardia. FAA Notice of Proposed Rulemaking—Congestion Management Rule 
for LaGuardia Airport, 71 Fed. Reg. 51360, 51362 (Aug. 29, 2006). 

FAA  could  not  have  been  more  direct:  We  do  not  have  the  authority  to  impose 
so-called ‘‘market-based approaches,’’ so we will ask Congress to give us that author-
ity.  True  to  its  word,  the  administration’s  FAA  reauthorization  bill  included  provi-
sions to give FAA authority to implement market mechanisms to allocate slots. But, 
as  we  all  know,  that  bill  has  not  passed  yet.  Consequently,  by  its  own  admission, 
FAA  lacks  statutory  authority  for  the  auction  and  congestion  pricing  rulemakings. 
That  should  be  the  end  of  the  story,  but  it  is  not.  FAA  now  attempts  to  qualify 
its  2006  admission  by  stating  that  it  analyzed  the  issue  of  statutory  authority  too 
narrowly.  While  still  acknowledging  that  it  lacks  regulatory  authority  to  impose 
market-based mechanisms because of the annual appropriations prohibition against 

13 Id. at 13. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Mar 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80048.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e
.
2
N
E
E
M
5
1
7

40 

promulgating or collecting new user fees,14 it claims it has now determined, conven-
iently, that it can work around that limitation by exercising procurement and trans-
action  authority 15 to  auction  slots  at  the  three  primary  New  York  area  airports. 
That view of the law is incorrect for several reasons, which are discussed at length 
in  ATA  comments  in  response  to  the  FAA  supplemental  notice  of  proposed  rule-
making (the ‘‘SNPRM’’).16 

Briefly,  the  FAA  does  not  have  authority  to  auction  slots  using  its  procurement 

and transaction authority because: 

• It  cannot  do  indirectly  what  it  is  prohibited  from  doing  directly.  The  ‘‘trans-
action authority’’ that the FAA argues is independent of its regulatory authority 
(which  it  cites  as  the  basis  for  auctioning  and  leasing  slots)  is,  in  fact,  linked 
to  its  regulatory  authority  because  the  FAA  may  engage  in  transactions  only 
if  they  are  ‘‘necessary  to  carry  out  the  functions  of  the  Administrator  and  the 
Administration.’’  Thus,  in  this  instance,  the  ‘‘function  of  the  Administrator’’ 
being  exercised  is  the  function  of  managing  the  navigable  airspace,  which  is  a 
regulatory  function  required  by  49  U.S.C.  § 40103(b)  (‘‘The  Administrator  shall 
. . .  assign  by  regulation  or  order  the  use  of  the  airspace  . . .’’).  But,  as  even 
the  FAA  acknowledges,  the  appropriations  prohibition  on  new  user  fees  dis-
cussed  previously  prevents  it  from  using  its  regulatory  authority  for  market 
mechanisms. Therefore, FAA cannot use its transaction authority to implement 
a prohibited regulatory action. 
• 49 U.S.C. § 40103(b), on which FAA relies to promulgate the auction rules, pro-
vides  specific  but  limited  authority  for  the  FAA  to  regulate  the  airspace  to  en-
sure  the  safety  of  aircraft  and  the  efficient  use  of  airspace  and  to  prescribe  air 
traffic regulations on the flight of aircraft. This language does not remotely sug-
gest  that  the  FAA  is  authorized  to  auction  off  the  right  to  conduct  operations 
in navigable airspace. When Congress wants an agency to conduct such an auc-
tion,  it  is  explicit.  Congress  knows  how  to  authorize  auctions  when  it  chooses 
to  do  so,  as  it  did  in  great  detail  and  at  great  length  when  it  authorized  the 
Federal  Communications  Commission  to  conduct  spectrum  auctions.  47  U.S.C. 
§ 309(j). It has not done so here. 
• Auctioning  slots  effectively  amounts  to  the  imposition  of  a  tax  designed  to  dis-
courage airlines from using the navigable airspace at congested airports during 
peak  periods.  Since  only  Congress  can  levy  taxes,  the  FAA  cannot  impose 
charges  that  amount  to  a  tax  unless  Congress  has  clearly  expressed  its  inten-
tion  to  delegate  such  authority  to  the  agency  and  articulated  intelligible  guide-
lines for making the assessments. 49 U.S.C. § 40103(b) cannot be read as consti-
tuting such a delegation. 
• The  slots  that  FAA  would  create  under  the  SNPRM,  which  FAA  describes  as 
‘‘reservations  of  airspace,’’  are  not  ‘‘property’’  in  the  hands  of  the  FAA  that  the 
agency can dispose of using its property-management authority under 49 U.S.C. 
§§ 106(l)(6)  and  106(n)  and  49  U.S.C.  § 40110(a).  Those  provisions  apply  to  the 
acquisition  and  disposition  of  the  FAA’s  real  and  personal  property.  A  slot—in 
essence a license or permission to use navigable airspace—is the product of reg-
ulatory action by FAA in capping hourly operations at an airport. The resulting 
permission  to  use  what  has  become  constrained  navigable  airspace  is  not  real 
or  personal  ‘‘property’’  of  the  FAA—just  as  other  licenses  or  permits  issued  by 
governmental  authorities  are  not  ‘‘property’’  of  the  issuing  agency.17 The  awk-
wardness  of  the  FAA  proposed  lease  form  for  slots  underscores  the  fiction  of 
characterizing slots as property of the FAA that it can dispose of by lease. 
• Because the auction price for slots would not be cost-based, it would violate the 
requirements  of  the  Independent  Offices  Appropriations  Act  (the  ‘‘IOAA’’),  31 
U.S.C.  § 9701,  which  allows  agencies  to  charge  recipients  of  special  govern-
mental  services  for  the  cost  to  the  agency  of  providing  those  services.  Here,  the 
cost  to  the  FAA  would  be  its  actual  costs  incurred  to  allocate  slots  by  auction. 

14 See, for example, Pub. L. 109–115 and Pub. L. 110–161. 
15 ‘‘[T]he FAA’s authority is not limited to regulatory action. The agency has independent au-
thority  to  dispose  of  property  (footnote  omitted),  and  regulatory  action  is  not  required  prior  to 
the lease of property.’’ 73 Fed. Reg. 20852. 

16 See  Comments  of  Air  Transport  Association  of  America,  Inc.,  June  16,  2008,  Docket  No. 

FAA–2006–25709. 

17 In  contrast  to  the  FAA,  which  creates  the  slots  by  regulatory  action  but  has  no  property 
interest  in  them,  airlines  to  which  slots  are  issued  do  have  a  property  interest  in  slots.  That 
property interest is recognized by third parties (including lenders to whom slots may be pledged 
as  collateral)  and  by  the  FAA  itself  (which  allows  slots  to  be  bought  and  sold  in  a  secondary 
market). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Mar 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80048.TXT JACKIE

41 

The  slot  auction  prices  that  are  contemplated  under  the  SNPRM,  however, 
would not be related to those costs as they would result from a bidding process. 
• The  FAA  has  no  authority  to  determine  how  auction  proceeds  would  be  used. 
Nothing  in  the  Transportation  Code  or  the  IOAA  authorizes  the  FAA  to  retain 
the  auction  proceeds  and  expend  them  on  ‘‘congestion  management  in  the  New 
York City area,’’ as the agency proposes to do under SNPRM Option 1. Instead, 
the auction proceeds under that option (assuming a market-based auction were 
otherwise  lawful)  would  have  to  be  deposited  into  the  general  fund  of  the  U.S. 
Treasury  pursuant  to  the  Miscellaneous  Receipts  Statute,  31  U.S.C.  § 3302(b). 
The  FAA’s  expenditure  of  auction  proceeds  without  a  congressional  appropria-
tion also could violate the Anti-Deficiency Act, 31 U.S.C. § 1341(a)(1). 
• Likewise, SNPRM Option 2 (where the original slot holder would be allowed to 
keep  the  proceeds  net  of  the  FAA’s  auction-related  expenses)  is  not  authorized. 
Option  2  amounts  to  the  forced  sale  of  slots  by  unwilling  sellers,  rather  than 
a  transfer  from  the  FAA  to  a  carrier.  There  is  no  transfer  from  the  FAA  to  a 
carrier,  required  by  the  FAA  transaction  authority  construct  under  49  U.S.C. 
§§ 106(l)(6)  and  106(n).  Nor  could  the  FAA  rely  on  the  IOAA  as  authority  for 
Option 2 because the auction proceeds, which are being retained by the original 
slot  holder,  do  not  constitute  a  charge  made  to  recoup  the  cost  of  special  serv-
ices being provided by the agency. 

Likewise,  the  proposed  rates  and  charges  policy  change  is  illegal.  Airports  are 
bound by the principle of ‘‘revenue neutrality,’’ which means that the total fees and 
charges collected from airlines must approximate an airport’s cost of providing facili-
ties  and  services.  To  the  extent  the  policy  change  purports  to  allow  airports  to  vio-
late this principle, it is illegal. Moreover, each of the three individual policy changes 
DOT proposes is legally deficient. Taken as a whole, the congestion pricing proposal, 
if adopted, is unlawful and will only inject uncertainty for both airlines and airports 
regarding  airport  charges,  thereby  causing  controversy  and  disputes.  Such  con-
troversies undermine the DOT policy promoting negotiated agreements between air-
lines  and  airports  because  airports  will  be  able  to  unilaterally  impose  conditions 
that  otherwise  would  be  subject  to  negotiation.  Airport  proprietary  powers  are  lim-
ited,  and  it  is  our  view  that  airports  are  preempted  by  Federal  law  from  seeking 
to  affect  airline  routes  and  services  by  means  of  unilaterally  imposed  pricing 
schemes.18 
Auctions  and  Congestion  Pricing  Will  Not  Reduce  Congestion  or  Delays 

and Are Fraught with Problems 

At  the  most  fundamental  level,  auctions  and  congestion  pricing  have  nothing  to 
do with reducing congestion or delays. They are simply a means of allocating limited 
airport access. Capping operations, as the FAA has done at the three New York area 
airports,  is  the  mechanism  that  reduces  delays  by  limiting  the  number  of  oper-
ations. This fundamental point cannot be overstated. The DOT proposals do not ad-
dress, and will not impact, congestion or delays. 
Auctions 

No airport or government agency auctions access to airports. DOT seeks to break 
new  ground  by  its  auction  proposal.  But  auctioning  airport  access  is  fraught  with 
technical and operational problems and will not work. 

The DOT auction proposal requires DOT to design, implement and maintain a slot 
auction  mechanism  that  accommodates  the  complexities  and  interdependencies  of 
airline  schedules.  Airline  schedules  at  one  airport  are  highly  interdependent  with 
schedules and operations at other airports across an airline’s system and across the 
entire day, and limitations imposed by slot holdings at other airports, as well as op-
erating  limitations  (voluntary  curfews,  connecting  schedules),  add  layers  of  com-
plexity. The ability to submit and accept package bids (bids conditioned on winning 
matched pairs of slots at different airports or sets of slots at the same airport) likely 
will  be  a  critical  factor  in  an  auction  system.  There  is  little  experience  in  any  con-
text, and none in the airline system context, to serve as a model for developing and 
operating  an  efficient  auction  mechanism  that  deals  with  these  levels  of  complex-
ities. It is not clear at all that DOT is capable of developing such a complex auction 
system on its own or with outside assistance. 

Notwithstanding  these  complexities,  DOT  anticipates  that  it  will  be  able  to  issue 
a  request  for  proposals,  select  an  auction  design  vendor,  resolve  numerous  out-

18 ‘‘a State . . . or political authority of at least 2 states may not enact or enforce a law, regu-
lation, or other provision having the force and effect of a law related to a price, route, or service 
of an air carrier.’’ 49 U.S.C. § 41713(b)(1). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Mar 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80048.TXT JACKIE

42 

standing  questions  about  the  auction  process  and  determine  the  auction  design, 
rules  and  procedures,  obtain  and  test  the  auction  software,  train  FAA  and  carrier 
personnel,  and  then  implement  an  auction  by  December  2008—in  less  than  6 
months. DOT aspirations are wholly unrealistic and should be cause for concern. 
Congestion Pricing 

Congestion  pricing  has  proven  to  be  an  utter  failure  wherever  it  has  been  tried. 
A 2005 survey of the literature addressing congestion pricing along with an analysis 
of  peak  pricing  schemes  in  Boston,  New  York  and  London  concluded  that  institu-
tional  barriers  prevent  peak  pricing  from  being  used  effectively  in  the  airport  con-
text.19 At several airports, including Toronto and London Stansted, congestion pric-
ing programs (perhaps better described as peak-hour charges) simply have been in-
effective  in  reducing  demand  for  airport  access.  Congestion  during  peak  hours  re-
mains a problem and there is a waiting list for access and/or more slots. 

At  other  locations,  including  the  Cayman  Islands  and  Haiti,  so-called  congestion 
charges  are  merely  excess  charges  to  raise  revenue.  Although  characterized  as  con-
gestion  charges,  demand  at  these  airports  does  not  exceed  capacity  and  there  is  no 
congestion problem. 

From  a  policy  perspective,  congestion  pricing  will  not  work  in  the  airline  context 
because, unlike toll roads where commuters have a choice of routes (secondary sur-
face  roads,  primary  surface  arteries  or  interstate  highways),  typically  no  choice  ex-
ists  for  airlines  and  their  customers.  Passengers  will  continue  to  demand  flights  at 
particular times and in particular markets, and airlines will respond with schedules 
to meet that demand. 

Also, unlike the roadway and variably priced electricity examples, where the driv-
er  or  electricity  customer  pay  the  fee  directly,  congestion  fees  would  be  imposed  on 
airlines  and  not  the  consumer  who  drives  airline  scheduling.  This  means  the  ulti-
mate  consumer  is  shielded,  either  partially  or  completely,  from  the  congestion  fee, 
thereby making it ineffectual at changing consumer behavior. 

Finally,  congestion  fees  ignore  the  investment  by  airlines  in  routes,  equipment, 
facilities  and  personnel.  Those  investments,  in  most  cases,  have  been  substantial 
and,  for  this  reason,  airlines  will  be  unwilling  and/or  unable  to  alter  their  service 
patterns  in  response  to  congestion  fees.  Airlines  will  be  forced  to  try  to  pass  them 
on to consumers, which will be difficult in the industry’s highly competitive environ-
ment,  or  to  simply  absorb  them,  an  alternative  that  cannot  be  sustained  in  today’s 
cost environment. 
FAA Has the Tools: Airspace Redesign, NextGen and the ARC Capacity En-

hancing Measures 

As we have said before, the solution to delays lies not in suppressing demand, but 
in  expanding  capacity  to  satisfy  that  demand,  thereby  fostering  the  health  of  not 
just  the  airline  industry,  but  the  entire  U.S.  economy.  All  stakeholders,  but  espe-
cially  FAA,  must  be  relentless  in  their  efforts  to  enhance  capacity.  It  is  well  docu-
mented  that  delays  in  New  York  impact  the  entire  National  Airspace  System.  Ac-
cordingly, FAA should devote whatever resources are necessary to enhance capacity 
and operational efficiency in the New York area. 

19 Joshua  L.  Schank,  ‘‘Solving  airside  airport  congestion:  Why  peak  runway  pricing  is  not 

working,’’ Journal of Air Transport Management 11 (2005) 417–425. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Mar 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80048.TXT JACKIE

43 

* Share of OEP 35 total. 
Source: ATA analysis of FAA OPSNET. 
One  measure  that  we  recommended  last  September,  and  that  we  continue  to 
press, is accelerating implementation of the New York/New Jersey/Philadelphia air-
space  redesign  project.  This  project  will  enhance  both  capacity  and  the  efficiency  of 
operations  in  the  Northeast,  while  reducing  the  overall  number  of  people  exposed 
to  aircraft  noise.  It  is  a  win-win.  Although  FAA  is  moving  forward  on  this  project, 
more  can  be  done  to  accelerate  its  implementation,  and  this  committee  can  assist 
that effort by keeping the FAA focused on achieving results. 

Another  measure  that  we  recommended  was  the  appointment  of  a  single  person 
to  be  responsible  for  managing  and  implementing  all  of  the  capacity  enhancement 
measures in the New York region—a ‘‘New York Czar.’’ Marie Kennington-Gardiner 
was appointed recently as Director of the New York Program Integration Office. Al-
though this position was not given the authority and reporting seniority we had an-
ticipated,  we  look  forward  to  working  closely  with  her  to  affect  positive  change  in 
New  York.  This  committee  can  assist  this  process  by  holding  the  FAA  accountable 
for establishing clear objectives and metrics to measure performance to those objec-
tives, and by requiring regular reports. 

Getting  to  NextGen,  the  FAA  Next  Generation  Air  Traffic  Management  System, 
is  of  critical  importance.  It  is  a  massive  undertaking  with  many  moving  parts,  and 
FAA  must  avoid  the  failures  of  past  large-scale  development  and  acquisition 
projects. All of the agencies that have a role in this effort, but particularly the FAA 
as lead agency, must stay focused and devote the resources necessary to get it done 
as quickly as possible. Again, oversight by this committee will assist this effort. 

Last  fall,  ATA  participated  on  the  DOT  New  York  Aviation  Rulemaking  Com-
mittee,  and  was  instrumental  in  helping  to  develop  a  list  of  77  delay  reduction  ini-
tiatives  for  the  New  York  area  airports.  As  of  this  date,  FAA  lists  17  measures  as 
having been completed and 14 more in process. We and our members will work with 
the FAA to assist these efforts and push for their early completion, and we look for-
ward to working with this committee to assure the success of these efforts. 

In addition to the critical measures noted above, ATA has urged the FAA to move 

forward as quickly as possible on the following recommendations: 

achieve maximum operational efficiency. 

• Ensure real-time access to military airspace. 
• Repair its relationship with the controller workforce. 
• Increase the controller workforce at any/all New York area facilities in order to 
• Take advantage of new RNP routes in the West Atlantic and leverage new auto-
• Use Airspace Flow Programs to filter business jets out of congested chokepoints 
• Utilize multiple runways, including converging runway operations where appro-
• Assign scheduled operations a higher priority than other system users. 

mation tools that reroute flights around weather. 

during peak periods—especially afternoon peaks. 

priate. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Mar 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80048.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e
.
3
N
E
E
M
5
1
7

44 

• Improve  surface  management  systems  (traffic  flows  between  runways  and 

gates)—in particular continue accelerated deployment of ASDE–X. 

• Eliminate  miles-in-trail  departure  restrictions  to  airports  greater  than  500 

• Expand  use  of  low-altitude  arrival  and  departure  routes  (‘‘capping’’  and  ‘‘tun-

miles away. 

neling’’). 

• Realign/relocate  arrival,  departure  and  overflight  routes  to  avoid  conflicts  that 

drive inefficient routings. 

Now, More than Ever, Do No Harm 

Last  September,  we  were  optimistic  that  the  industry  finally  had  turned  the  cor-

ner from the deep, post-9/11 downturn. We stated then: 

It  is  safe  to  say  that  the  U.S.  airline  industry  is  in  a  recovery  period  from  the 
extreme downturn experienced between 2001 and 2005, when the industry sus-
tained over $35 billion in net losses. In 2006 the industry earned $3 billion net 
profit, and we project a $5 billion net profit for 2007. Airline employment is on 
the rise, as is capital spending, which is good news for airlines and their share-
holders, employees and the many local economies that depend on a healthy air-
line industry to drive commercial activity, jobs and tourism.20 

Unfortunately, our optimism for a continued recovery has been crushed under the 
weight  of  skyrocketing  fuel  prices  that  could  not  have  been  predicted.  Today,  just 
9  months  later,  the  U.S.  airline  industry  faces  losses  that  will  rival,  if  not  exceed, 
the losses from the 2001–2005 period. The meteoric rise in jet fuel prices—to prices 
never  imagined  in  anyone’s  worst  nightmare  business  case—is  driving  the  industry 
to the brink of imploding. The numbers tell the story: 

• Crude  oil  hit  an  all-time  high  of  $145.66  per  barrel  on  Friday,  July  11,  2008— 

a 97 percent increase over 1 year ago. 

• Several  analysts  predict  that  oil  will  hit  $150  per  barrel  in  July,  and  some  are 

predicting even higher prices by year-end. 

• From January 1, 2008 through July 8, 2008: 

» Crude oil spot prices averaged $112.29 per barrel, compared to $61.94 during 

the same period in 2007. 

» Jet  fuel  prices  averaged  $139.52  per  barrel,  versus  $81.94  during  the  same 

period in 2007. 

» Jet fuel prices averaged $27.23 per barrel more than crude oil and $17.70 per 

barrel more than gasoline. 

• Year-over-year,  jet  fuel  prices  have  risen  70  percent;  in  contrast,  air  fares  have 

increased just 7 percent. 

• The  portion  of  an  airline  ticket  needed  to  pay  for  fuel  is  now  more  than  40  per-

cent, up from 15 percent in 2000. 

• U.S. airlines effectively pay 57 percent more for fuel than European airlines be-
cause  of  the  relative  weakness  of  the  U.S.  dollar  and  because  fuel  transactions 
are denominated in U.S. dollars. 

As a result of this situation: 
• Scheduled air service has been, or will be, eliminated from 96 communities na-

tionwide. 

• Mainline domestic capacity is being slashed. Some examples: 

» Continental  will  reduce  domestic  mainline  capacity  by  11  percent  in  the 

fourth quarter. 

» U.S.  Airways  will  reduce  domestic  mainline  capacity  by  6  to  8  percent  in  the 

fourth quarter 2008, followed by an additional 7 to 9 percent in 2009. 

» United  will  reduce  domestic  mainline  capacity  by  14  percent  in  the  fourth 
quarter  2008,  with  additional  reductions  planned  for  2009,  and  just  an-
nounced plans to furlough more than 900 pilots. 

» American  will  reduce  domestic  mainline  capacity  by  11  to  12  percent  in  the 

fourth quarter of 2008. 

20 See:  http://www.airlines.org/government/testimony/ATA+Testimony+-+Airline+Delays+and 

+Consumer+Issues.htm. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Mar 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80048.TXT JACKIE

» AirTran has gone from a 20 percent growth plan for 2008 to announcing that 

it will reduce capacity later this year. 

45 

» Northwest  will  reduce  domestic  mainline  capacity  by  7  to  8  percent  in  the 
fourth  quarter  of  2008  and  eliminate  more  than  40  aircraft  from  its  fleet  by 
year-end. 

more are operating in bankruptcy Chapter 11. 

• The industry is rapidly approaching 30,000 job cuts and early-out offers. 
• Eight  U.S.  airlines  have  gone  out  of  business  since  the  end  of  2007  and  two 
• U.S.  airlines  are  projected  to  spend  $61  billion  on  fuel  this  year,  $20  billion 
more than in 2007—an increase equivalent to the compensation and benefits of 
267,000 airline workers or the acquisition of 286 new jets. 
• ATA forecasts a full-year industry loss of $7 to $13 billion for 2008, and absent 
a  dramatic  drop  in  the  price  of  fuel,  a  multi-billion  dollar  loss  again  in  2009. 
JP Morgan projects an operating loss of $7.2 billion in 2008 and an even higher 
operating loss in 2009. 

Under  these  circumstances,  the  government’s  first  reaction  should  be  ‘‘do  no 
harm’’—avoid adding unnecessary costs and regulatory burdens. Simply put, the in-
dustry needs the government to apply a degree of critical analysis to its own actions 
to determine what needs to be done to ensure public safety and security, what needs 
to  be  done  to  improve  operations  and  efficiency,  and  then  take  only  those  actions 
that  are  necessary  at  this  time.  Experimenting  with  demand  management  in  New 
York is not needed now, regardless of ones views on its merits. Now is not the time 
to conduct an experiment that will add out-of-pocket expense for airlines and create 
greater uncertainty about schedules and aircraft utilization. 

Furthermore,  in  light  of  dramatic  schedule  changes  and  service  reductions  that 
airlines have announced and which become effective later this year, it is likely that 
the  New  York  region  will  see  a  noticeable  improvement  in  delays.  Although  the 
schedule  changes  will  not  impact  the  level  of  delays  this  summer,  it  is  likely  that 
delays will be positively impacted next summer. This is another reason DOT should 
not advance its proposals now. 
Conclusion 

Instead  of  advancing  illegal  and  ill-conceived  notions  intended  to  suppress  de-
mand  at  a  time  when  airlines  are  attempting  to  survive  previously  unheard  of  fuel 
prices—coupled with consumer demand that is falling because of a weak U.S. econ-
omy—DOT and the FAA should be focusing on fixing the underlying problem: insuf-
ficient  airspace  capacity  in  the  New  York  region  and  an  aged  and  inadequate  air 
traffic  control  system.  Stifling  demand  will  have  serious  adverse  consequences  for 
airlines,  consumers  and  New  York  area  residents  who  rely  on  passenger  and  cargo 
air transportation services and a vibrant tourism industry. We urge Congress to put 
a stop to DOT’s misguided efforts. 

We also urge Congress to move quickly in a bipartisan manner to address the oil 
price  crisis  that  is  quickly  overtaking  our  industry.  Congress  can  rein  in  excessive, 
unregulated  speculation  in  the  oil  futures  markets  and  adopt  measures  to  expand, 
in  an  environmentally  sound  way,  our  domestic  energy  supply,  both  carbon-based 
and from alternative sources. We urge Congress to act now. 

Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  Thank  you  very  much.  I’d  just—in  com-
ment  to  that,  I  don’t  know  anybody  who  thinks  that  that’s  going 
to  happen  very  quickly,  this  abundance—increased  abundance  of 
fuel—jet fuel or otherwise. And that’s what we’re wrestling with in 
Congress now, in probably the most important thing we will do this 
year in—over the next 2 years. I mean, this is one, if we don’t solve 
it, we’ll just decline as a Nation. 

Mr. Krakowski, I want to go right back to you. Pretend that you 
never  gave  your  statement,  and  talk  about,  again,  this  interaction 
of how you do it. 

O’Hare has added a new runway. We had an all-day hearing out 
there,  and  we—it  was  agreed  that  those  original  eight  runways 
that were put in place in 1962, when there was only about a couple 
of  thousand  people  using  the  place—that  they  all  had  to  be  recon-
figured. And if that were to happen, it could do as much as reduce 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Mar 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80048.TXT JACKIE

46 

30 percent of the congestion in the air—in the skies, 36,000 planes 
at any given moment. And just so this new runway which has been 
put in does not disturb that reconfiguration process, which still has 
to take place, at a very large cost. 

Mr.  KRAKOWSKI.  Yes,  sir,  I’d  like  to  point  out  that  I  just  spent 
33  years  of  my  life  flying  in  and  out  of  that  airport,  so  I’m  keenly 
familiar with it. 

If  you  look  at  airports  like  Denver  and  Dallas-Fort  Worth,  At-
lanta, they, too, are impacted by weather. But, their ability to han-
dle the weather, and, more importantly, their ability to get back on 
their  feet  after  the  weather  clears,  is  dramatically  improved  be-
cause  of  the  runway  configuration.  That’s  what  we’re  trying  to  do 
at O’Hare. If you look at the end game, where you have six parallel 
runways  as  primary  runways  for  arrival  and  departure  there, 
you’re  going  to  have  very  similar  cadence  of  operation  as  Atlanta, 
Dallas,  Denver  do,  which  all  operate  much  better  than  O’Hare 
does. The crossing runways not only create inefficiencies in the sys-
tem, but they also challenge safety. 

Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  Answer  my  question,  which  wasn’t  my 

original question—— 

Mr. KRAKOWSKI. OK. 
Senator  ROCKEFELLER.—and  that  is,  will  the  additional  runway 
interfere with the reconfiguration of the remaining eight that have 
to  work,  you  know,  efficiently,  in  order  to  have  that  airport  do  its 
part to clear up inefficiencies? 

Mr. KRAKOWSKI. Right. So, that new runway, which will be com-
missioned  in  November,  will  be  the  first  of  three  additional  run-
ways which will—— 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. So, it’s—— 
Mr. KRAKOWSKI.—be built. 
Senator ROCKEFELLER.—part of the total plan. 
Mr.  KRAKOWSKI.  That’s  correct,  sir,  yes.  And  I  believe  the  total 
plan goes out to 2016 before all the runways are configured. So—— 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. Right. 
Mr. KRAKOWSKI.—this airport’s going to be in the—— 
Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  Now  could  you  take  me  back  through 
what  I  originally  asked  you,  and  that  is,  how  these  things  depend 
upon—how they ripple to each other, the various centers of conges-
tion,  and  what  is  to  be  done  about  that?  Part  of  that,  obviously,  is 
what  you’re  doing  in  New  York,  and  this  2,000-to-1,000  system  of 
being  able  to  land,  which  is  a  very,  very  big  help.  But,  explain  to 
me how the—the interaction. 

People don’t understand that if they’re in Atlanta or if they’re in 
New  York  and  they’re  being  delayed,  the  fault  may  not  be  there, 
it  may  be  in  Chicago  or  some  other  place.  Help  me  to  understand 
that. 

Mr.  KRAKOWSKI.  Yes,  sir.  It’s  always  been  vexing  to  the  pas-
senger,  even,  at  times,  as  an  airline  pilot,  like  myself,  but  if  you 
were to look at the live traffic, which you can pull up on the Inter-
net or see on some of the screens, you’ll notice that the traffic flows 
kind  of  in  highways  or  on  streams  to  the  major  destinations.  No 
different,  really,  than  a  major  highway  going  into  a  city  center. 
One  major  delay—thunderstorms  or,  in  the  case  of  a  highway,  a 
road  accident,  construction—begins  to  put  constraints  on  that 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Mar 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80048.TXT JACKIE

47 

stream. So, you either have to slow the stream down to allow traf-
fic  to  merge  in  from  other  lanes,  or  work  traffic  around  on  side 
streets. All of that creates a slowing of the system, very much like 
a metropolitan traffic area, as well, for automobiles. 

So,  quite  frankly,  it’s  almost  that  simple.  When  you  start  to  re-
strict the airspace, you have to meter it in, you have to slow traffic 
down or make gaps in traffic. If you’ve got a flight coming from San 
Francisco  to  New  York,  and  New  York’s  constrained,  yet  you  have 
to  get  an  airplane  off  of  O’Hare  to  get  up  into  that  stream,  you 
have  to  create  a  gap  so  that  airplane  can  climb  into  it.  All  of  that 
interrelates, so a delay or some weather problems in New York has 
a ripple effect, sometimes all the way back as far as Denver or even 
the West Coast, just from those effects, sir. 

Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  If  you  had  a  digitalized  GPS  air  traffic 
control system, what would be the effect of that on diminishing air 
congestion,  even  assuming  the  enormous  growth  in  traffic,  pas-
sengers, and airlines over the next 10 years? 

Mr.  KRAKOWSKI.  The  promise  of  GPS  and  NextGen  and  what 
we’re proposing under that proposal is to be able to actually fly air-
craft closer together, so you basically create—— 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. And land them closer—— 
Mr.  KRAKOWSKI.  And  land  them  closer  together,  and  deconflict 
them,  and  that’s  really  important.  So,  where  you  have  airports 
really  close  together,  like  Midway  and  O’Hare  in  Chicago  or  the 
three big airports in New York or Dallas-Love and Dallas, that new 
technology  will  better  isolate  the  interaction  of  traffic  between  the 
airports,  and  that  creates  a  much  better  flow,  much  more  fluidity 
of  the  traffic.  And  we’re  actually  going  to  be  experimenting  with 
that  with  some  of  the  carriers  down  between  Houston  and  Dallas 
next year, as well. So, we’re working on it. 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. Thank you. My time is up. 
Senator Stevens? 
Senator  STEVENS.  I  understand  this  next  generation  will  have 
narrower space between landing aircraft. Now, what happens when 
you  have  a  weekend  like  we  just  had,  with  all  these  thunder-
storms?  You  have  more  planes  in  the  same  area,  and  it  increases 
the problem, doesn’t it? 

Mr.  KRAKOWSKI.  Well,  where  you  have  the  weather  affecting  it, 
you can’t do much about the immediate area, because no pilot will 
fly  in  certain  weather.  I  certainly  would  not  have.  But,  where  I 
think the real benefit comes from is, once the weather clears or you 
do  have  pathways,  NextGen  will  create  the  ability  to  flow  more 
traffic  through  the  available  airspace,  so  you  should  be  able  to 
move the traffic faster with the same degree of safety than the cur-
rent system allows. 

Senator STEVENS. Well, I just went home this past weekend and 
spent  about  an  hour  and  a  half  circling  around  trying  to  get  into 
Chicago  in  order  to  make  a  connection  to  go  further  west.  Now, 
that  meant  we  were  at  least  2  hours  late,  and  they  delayed  the 
plane  that  we  were  going  to  get  on.  But,  by  the  time  we  got 
through,  we  arrived  in  Seattle  about  3  to  4  hours  late.  Now,  the 
whole  concept  of  weather,  to  me,  as  a  pilot,  too,  is  contrary  to  the 
concept  of  closer  spacing  between  planes,  in  terms  of  inclement 
weather. Will you adjust that? Will you adjust for the weather? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Mar 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80048.TXT JACKIE

48 

Mr.  KRAKOWSKI.  Where  I’m  coming  from  is,  if  you’re  landing  in 
bad weather conditions at the airport, you do have to maintain IFR 
spacing,  which  I’m  sure  you’re  familiar  with.  Where  you  really  get 
the  benefit  is  the  ability  to  create  more  usable  airspace  under 
NextGen  to  work  more  traffic  faster  when  the  weather  clears,  and 
hopefully  avoid  holding  delays  like  you  experienced,  or  minimize 
the holding delays. 

Senator  STEVENS.  All  right.  Well,  let  me  come  to  Ms.  Fleming. 
I’ve raised this before, but one of the interesting things about being 
a transcontinental flyer, as I am—probably fly more than any other 
Senator in history, I think, really, we’re so far away. I travel more 
in  my  state  after  I  get  home  than  most  Senators  fly  to  get  home. 
Now,  when  you  look  at  this  concept,  the  major  delay  is  not  weath-
er,  it’s  available  pilots  and  crew  to  fly  the  airplanes.  Too  often,  if 
we  arrive  an  hour  late,  we  have  a  problem  of  finding  pilots  and 
finding  crew.  Have  you  looked  into  the  question  of  how  the  crews 
and pilots are dispersed throughout the country? 

Ms.  FLEMING.  Yes,  sir.  In  fact,  we  have  some  ongoing  but  pre-
liminary  work  for  you  that  will  be  issued,  probably  at  the  end  of 
September. 

The first point I’d like to raise is that DOT’s data, unfortunately, 
only  provide  information  on  the  responsible  party,  so  they  do  pro-
vide the original source of delay. To get the information that you’re 
interested in, how often late-arriving crews impacts delays, we had 
to  talk  to  academics  and  experts  on  airlines.  We  also  interviewed 
12  airlines.  What  we  found  from  these  folks  is  that  maintenance 
problems  and  getting  passengers  on  and  off  planes  is  a  bigger 
source of delay than late arriving crews. 

One  of  the  best  practices  that  the  airlines  have  for  trying  to  get 
crews out there is using reserve crews. If there’s a problem because 
of weather, they’ll have reserves come in to assume that duty post, 
or they will actually get the crew to a certain position a day early— 
again,  anticipating  bad  weather.  So,  there  are  some  best  practices 
that  are  out  there.  But,  the  more  important  point  is,  DOT’s  data 
does  not  provide  that  information,  so  we’ve  had  to  go  out  to  some 
of the airlines to get it. 

Senator  STEVENS.  Mr.  Meenan,  I’ve  flown  on  some  planes  lately 
that  have  less  than  50  percent  of  the  seats  filled.  And  I  think 
that’s,  to  a  great  extent,  caused  by  the  problems  of  the  increased 
cost  of  flying  and  also  the  scheduling  of  some  of  these  aircraft.  Is 
the  industry  trying  to  consolidate  flights  in  order  to  maximize  the 
seat passenger miles? 

Mr. MEENAN. Senator, the industry is trying to sell every seat it 
possibly  can.  The  load  factors  we’re  seeing,  in  general,  are  up. 
They’re up in the high 70s, low 80s. So, a flight that’s only 50 per-
cent full is a fairly rare occurrence—— 

Senator  STEVENS.  Are  they  consolidating  to  bring  that  about? 

That’s what I’m asking. 

Mr.  MEENAN.  Yes.  As  I  mentioned,  we  are  in  the  process  of  put-
ting  hundreds  of  airplanes  on  the  ground.  That’s  going  to  mean 
fewer seats in the air, in general, which means that customers will 
be  buying,  in  effect,  a  smaller  number  of  seats,  which  should  lead 
to an increase in load factors. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Mar 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80048.TXT JACKIE

49 

Senator STEVENS. How is the customer going to know that in ad-
vance?  How  am  I  going  to  know,  when  I’m  scheduled  to  leave  at 
8, that I’m really not going to leave until 11:30? 

Mr.  MEENAN.  We  have  a  number  of  different  processes  in  place 
to  advise  customers,  in  a  real-time  way,  when  flights  are,  unfortu-
nately,  delayed.  There  are  Internet  contacts,  there  are  contacts  by 
telephone.  Obviously,  you’re  encouraged  to  check  online,  as  well. 
But,  the  fact  is  that  we  do  have  a  number  of  processes  to  get  the 
word out to people when flights are delayed. 

Senator STEVENS. You’re implying that the airlines are not inten-
tionally  trying  to  consolidate  flights  by  a  delay  of  one  flight  into  a 
next one. Is that not going on? 

Mr. MEENAN. That—if we—are you talking about what has been 

referred to as ‘‘economic cancellations,’’ where you have—— 

Senator STEVENS. Yes. 
Mr.  MEENAN.  That,  to  our  knowledge,  is  not  going  on.  What  is 
happening are intentional alterations to a schedule, advising people 
in advance that we’re simply not going to operate—we used to have 
five flights a day to Chicago, we’re not going to operate five flights 
in the future, we’re only going to sell three. And, as a result, there 
would  be  fewer  flights,  but  people  will  know  what  those  three 
flights  are.  We  hopefully  will  see  a  rise  in  the  level  of  both  fares, 
which  the  industry  needs,  and  in  the  consumption  of  seats,  in  the 
load factors on those airplanes. 

Senator  STEVENS.  To  what  extent  has  the  current  crisis  de-

creased the number of people flying? 

Mr.  MEENAN.  This  summer,  it  has  not  had  much  of  an  impact. 
As  we  go  into  the  fall,  obviously  we’re  going  to  be  pulling  down 
more aircraft, more airplanes are going to be leaving service, cities 
are  going  to  face  the  reductions,  and,  in  some  cases,  the  elimi-
nation,  of  air  service.  And  we  think  we’re  probably  going  to  see 
fewer  people  flying,  perhaps,  than  we  would  have  in  the  past,  be-
cause  of  the  state  the  economy  is  in.  But  fares  are  going  to  go  up, 
because  there  are  going  to  be  fewer  seats—our  costs  are  going  to 
go down to an extent, by reducing crew, reducing aircraft, reducing 
fuel,  but  we’re  going  to  be  able  to,  hopefully,  sell  the  service  that 
is out there at a slightly higher fare, which should help the bottom 
line of the entire industry. 

Senator  STEVENS.  I’ve  exceeded  my  time.  I’d  like  to  ask  just  one 

more question, if I might. 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. Please. 
Senator  STEVENS.  We  discussed,  several  of  us,  this  morning,  the 
problem  of  speculation  and  the  letter  that’s  come  to  all  of  us  from 
the airline industry. Has your association taken a position of what 
will be necessary to end that speculation? 

Mr.  MEENAN.  Yes,  we  have,  Senator.  We  have  been  very  clear 
that  we  think  that  more  transparency  in  the  market,  more  disclo-
sure  of  what  trading  is  going  on,  limits  on  some  of  the  loopholes 
that  exist  in  the  current  trading  system,  and  just  a  general  mes-
sage  from  Congress  and  the  Government  that,  ‘‘We’re  watching, 
we’re  looking  at  what’s  going  on  in  these  market—this  speculative 
oil  market.’’  There  is  a  proper  role  for  speculation,  but  we  think 
that the evidence is clear that there is an unhealthy level of specu-
lation going on right now, and that’s what we’re very eager to work 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Mar 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80048.TXT JACKIE

50 

with  Congress,  particularly  with  both  the  Chairman  and  Vice 
Chairman, to address those issues, going forward. 

Senator  STEVENS.  Well,  I  think  you  should  get  tougher.  I  think 
it  should  be  criminal  for  the  institutional  fund  managers  to  con-
spire  to  raise  the  prices.  And  the  sooner  we  make  it  a  crime,  the 
sooner they will stop it. 
Thank you very much. 
Senator ROCKEFELLER. I agree with that. 
Senator Klobuchar? 

STATEMENT OF HON. AMY KLOBUCHAR, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM MINNESOTA 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  Thank  you.  Thank  you  very  much,  Mr. 

Chairman. And thank you, to our witnesses. 

As  you  know,  I’m  from  Minnesota,  which  is  the  home  of—right 
now, of Northwest Airlines, and also the many—I think we’re ninth 
in the country for Fortune 500 countries, so we have a lot of airline 
travel  with  our  hub.  And  I’d  say,  just  briefly,  that,  one,  we  need 
to  get  the  FAA  reauthorization  done,  and  I  appreciated  the  Chair-
man’s work on this, and also share his frustration that we haven’t 
been  able  to  get  that  done.  We  need  to  do  it  immediately.  When 
you  hear  about  some  of  the  technologies  that  are  used  in  other 
places that we don’t have in place yet, it’s just wrong. 

Second,  that  we  need  to  ensure  that  the  FAA  has  hired  and  re-
tained  a  sufficient  number  of  air  traffic  controllers  as  we  look  at 
some of these safety incidents. 

And  then,  third,  which  Senator  Stevens  just  raised,  is  this  issue 
of  the  jet  fuel  and  the  effect  that  it’s  having  on  the  entire  system, 
and the need to take prompt action. 

And  I  was  listening  as  you—Senator  Stevens  talked  to  you,  Mr. 
Meenan,  about  this  issue,  and  I  was  thinking,  as  you  have  less 
planes, having had a similar experience this weekend because of a 
storm, being diverted to Sioux Falls, South Dakota, and then going 
to  Minneapolis  and  having  a  lot  of  the  passengers  who  were  con-
necting  through  Minneapolis  lose  their  flights—as  that—as  you 
have  less  people  flying,  because  of  the  expense,  you  have  less 
flights.  And  I’ve  noticed  that  you  have  increased  the  load  factor, 
that  the—a  lot  of  the  flights  have  been  very  full.  Then,  when  the 
flights get delayed because of weather or other reasons, it’s harder 
for  people  to  catch  up.  Is  this  correct?  Because  you  have  less 
flights.  So,  you  see  an  individual  passenger  being  even  more  de-
layed.  And  I’m  not  faulting  anyone.  This—it’s  just  a  fact,  because 
you have less flights going. Would that be right? 

Mr.  MEENAN.  Senator,  that  is,  in  fact,  correct.  And  the  bottom 
line  for  us  is,  we  believe  that  an  economically  vibrant  airline  sys-
tem is absolutely essential to the United States’ best interests, best 
interests  of  consumers,  best  interests  of  everybody  involved.  The 
problem we’ve got right now, as I said in my statement, is, the in-
dustry  has  been  absolutely  decimated.  It  is  beyond  belief  what  is 
going on today. We’ve got to address that problem. We’ve got to get 
at the speculation, we’ve got to get at oil supply and demand, other 
energy  issues,  to  try  to  increase  other  energy  sources.  We  need  to 
address  these  things  very  seriously  and  boost  this  industry,  be-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Mar 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80048.TXT JACKIE

51 

cause it drives so much more of the economy, and we are very con-
cerned with where things are headed right now. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. Well, and back to the speculation issue, we 
need your help. I appreciate that you’ve been raising this and have 
been willing to come forward on this. We need to push some people 
to  act  in  the  Congress.  And  I  know—I  think  Northwest  is  sending 
e-mails or notices to their passengers. Are a lot of the other airlines 
doing  this,  as  well,  to  try  to  get  people—frustrated  airline  pas-
sengers, on a grassroots basis? Sounds like a good idea to me. 

Mr.  MEENAN.  Senator,  the  letter  you  referred  to  has  gone  out, 
and is going out to virtually every frequent flier in the country. We 
have, I believe, seen well over a million messages sent to Congress 
already, and that program is going to continue. 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  Well,  I  appreciate  that.  And  you  talked 
about some of the things that you support on the speculation issue. 
Do you want to be a little more specific about the—you know, how 
far  you  go  on  the  margin  requirements  or  on  the—closing  some  of 
these  loopholes  that  allow  for  the  offshore  trading,  and  things  like 
that? 

Mr.  MEENAN.  We  know  that  many  of  those  issues  are  quite  con-
troversial,  and  we  know  that  there’s  a  lot  of  discussion  going  on 
right  now.  We  have  made  some  broad  points  about  closing  the 
Enron  loophole,  closing  the  swaps  loophole,  increasing  margin  re-
quirements,  increasing  scrutiny  on  the  market.  We  think  that  the 
details  of  that  are  best  worked  out  in  conversations  with  the  ex-
perts  up  here  and  experts  in  the  industry,  and  we’re  looking  for-
ward to continuing those discussions. 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  But,  your  point  is  that  you  don’t  want  to 

wait, that you want some action—— 

Mr. MEENAN. It has—— 
Senator KLOBUCHAR.—now. 
Mr.  MEENAN.  It  can’t  happen  soon  enough.  I  mean,  we  are  lit-

erally seeing the industry melting down in front of our eyes. 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  And  I  remember  the—Doug  Steenland,  the 
CEO  of  Northwest  Airlines,  telling  me  that—how  much—that  the 
year  before,  when  oil  was  less  expensive,  how  it—the  effect  that  it 
had on their profits. But, this year, with the way it is now, it basi-
cally  eats  into  the  profits  of  every  airline  in  the  country.  Is  that 
right? Like, it eliminates them from—— 

Mr.  MEENAN.  Our  fuel  bill  is  going  to  be  up  about  $20  billion 
more  than  it  was  last  year.  No  business  can  sustain  the  kind  of 
fluctuation  in  prices  that  we  are  dealing  with,  without  totally  re-
vamping itself. And that’s what we’re in the process of seeing. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. OK, thank you. 
Some specific questions—and I, again, appreciate it. I think peo-
ple need to know this, they need to start working on the grassroots 
level to push this speculation issue, because it’s one thing, in addi-
tion to the Strategic Petroleum Reserve, that we’ve done there, that 
we could do immediately, in addition to long-term plans that we’ve 
been  talking  about  in  Congress—the  specific  questions  that  I  had 
here about the air traffic controllers and what’s going on there, Mr. 
Krakowski,  is—you  know,  the—earlier  this  year,  our  Committee 
evaluated  the  revelations  about  Southwest’s  decision  to  continue 
flying  aircraft  despite  safety  lapses.  At  that  time,  we  learned  that 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Mar 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80048.TXT JACKIE

52 

some FAA inspectors felt that their concerns regarding safety were 
regularly dismissed by their direct supervisors. Is it the same kind 
of  culture  there  with  the  air  traffic  controllers?  Do  you  think  we 
need to look at that, if they have concerns about safety? 

It  sounds  as  though,  you  know,  Ms.  Fleming,  with  the  numbers, 
we don’t quite have a sense of how many near-misses that we have, 
but  we  know  there  are  some.  Do  you  think  that  there  are  things 
that can be done to review the safety culture among the air traffic 
controllers,  just  as  you  have  been  doing  with  the  FAA  inspectors? 
Mr. KRAKOWSKI. Senator, thank you for that question. Just to re-
mind the Committee, I was Chief Safety Officer for one of the larg-
est  airlines  for  almost  5  years,  so  it’s  in  my  DNA  to  take  care  in 
these areas. 

I just hired a new vice president of safety for the Air Traffic Or-
ganization,  a  brigadier  general  in  the  Air  Force,  and  also  a  former 
airline  pilot.  He  is  currently  reforming  the  safety  effort  within  the 
ATO.  We  just  hired  him,  about  a  month  ago,  to  look  at  issues  like 
the ones that occurred down in Dallas, which were part of the con-
cerns on the whistleblower issue down there, to make sure we don’t 
have any systemic issues. At this point, it looks like it was isolated 
to  the  Dallas  area  with  this  type  of  an  event,  but  we  actually  are 
moving  forward  and  treating  it  as  a  systemic  issue,  to  make  sure 
that we don’t have it elsewhere. So, he’s focused, like a laser beam 
on that. 

The  other  thing  that  we’re  starting,  literally  within  the  next  2 
weeks,  is—the  airlines  have  had  a  Safety  Action  Program,  where 
the employees can report safety issues voluntarily without any fear 
of  retribution  from  the  agency.  And  there  are  a  lot  of  protections 
for the employees around that program. At my airline, I considered 
that  the  premier  safety  program  for  the  company,  and  I  think  it 
really  had  real,  significant  benefits  for  us.  We’re  starting  that  in 
Chicago for the controllers. We hope to have that, nationwide, after 
we get it up and running, within the next 12 to 18 months. I think 
that’s going to be very, very helpful. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. OK. 
Mr.  KRAKOWSKI.  And  NATCA’s  deeply  involved  in  that,  by  the 

way. The controllers are partners on that with us. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. And are you doing work to improve the mo-

rale and retention? I know there’s been some issues there. 

Mr.  KRAKOWSKI.  I’m  doing  everything  I  can.  You  know,  what 
we’re trying to do is incentivize controllers, experienced controllers, 
to move to those locations where I really need them. And there are 
some  places,  like  St.  Louis,  others,  where  I  actually  have  an  over-
staff.  So,  it’s  a  good  business  process  to  try  to  move,  where  you 
have  excesses,  into  the  areas  that  need  them.  It’s  just  good  busi-
ness. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. Thank you very much. 
Senator ROCKEFELLER. All right. 
The—Senator  Stevens  mentioned,  in  his  opening  question,  the 
fact  of  the  dispersion  across  this  country  of  adequate  pilots  and 
technicians  and  others,  flight  attendants,  et  cetera,  to  be  able  to 
make  up  for  some  of  the  problems.  Now,  that  goes  against  the 
grain  of  common  sense  at  the  present  time,  and  that  is  that  the— 
particularly,  the  legacy  airlines  are  losing  enormous  amounts  of 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Mar 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80048.TXT JACKIE

53 

money. I think all of our views about what their situation could be 
in these next few weeks—next few years—I noticed that Sturgell— 
acting  FAA  Administrator  Sturgell,  is  quoted—said  that  there  will 
be  a  ‘‘reprieve  of  2  years’’  on—because  of  cutbacks,  in  reaction  to 
high  fuel  costs—that’ll  give  the  FAA  a  reprieve  of  2  years  on  con-
gestion. I don’t understand that at all. 

But, if you—if the airlines are losing money, and if fewer people 
are  flying  right  now  because  of  that,  and  you’ve  seen  this  30-per-
cent dropoff over the holidays, that means that the money, in order 
to  put  those  people  out  there  in  some  of  these  rural  airlines,  isn’t 
going to be there. It’s just not going to be there. 

All of the delays that I’ve had—and there have been many—have 
been due to mechanical problems—not explained, but, nevertheless, 
mechanics aren’t there to fix them. And you have to have a reason-
ably  robust  airline  situation  in  order  to  be  able  to  take  care  of 
those  problems.  And  I  don’t  see  that  happening  under  the  present 
circumstance.  In  fact,  my  worries  are  quite  the  contrary,  and  that 
is  that  places  like  West  Virginia  and  even  large  urban  coastal 
states, like Arkansas, will suffer, because we are always at the end 
of  the  food  chain.  And  if  you’re  at  the  end  of  the  food  chain,  there 
really  isn’t  much  you  can  do  about  it  if  people  can’t  afford  to  have 
technicians  and  others  on  the  ground  or  to  have  pilots  and  flight 
attendants  to  talk  about  what  Senator  Stevens  was  talking  about, 
and  that  is,  to  make  up  for  delays  because  there  are  people  there. 
So,  I  really  don’t  understand  the  economics  of  your  argument 
that this will be a possible thing to do, and that you’re trying your 
best  to  disperse  people  to  make  up  for  this  situation  at  the  same 
time as you’re paying 40 percent of all of your costs for fuel. I want 
to  go  on  this  bill  with  Senator  Stevens  on  speculators,  because  I 
think  people  who  inconvenience  the  American  people  like  that  de-
serve  criminal  prosecution,  at  the  very  least.  Nevertheless,  that’s 
not going to solve the problem. It’s going to solve part of the prob-
lem, but it’s not going to solve the availability of jet fuel and gaso-
line to drivers, and diesel for truckers. It’s not going to solve it, be-
cause those problems are going to take a number of years, because 
of  our  lack  of  refineries  and  the  time  to  do  all  this  drilling,  to  set 
that all up. 

So, how does this work out, that you can solve Senator Stevens’s 

problem when you’re in such economic stress? 

Mr.  MEENAN.  Senator,  we  are  not  suggesting  that  the  airlines 
can  solve  all  of  these  problems.  What  we  are  suggesting  is  that 
there is a complex array of problems facing the United States. One 
of them, we believe, is the unhealthy level of speculation in the oil 
market,  which  we  believe  can  be  addressed  by  some  of  the 
ideas—— 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. And we agree—— 
Mr. MEENAN.—that have been put forward. 
Senator ROCKEFELLER.—but that’s not my question. 
Mr.  MEENAN.  At  the  same  time,  the  airlines,  individually,  are 
doing  whatever  they  can  do  within  their  own  corporate  worlds  to 
adjust both their costs and the service they provide, to try to match 
up with what we see in the market at this point. So, by taking air-
planes  out  of  service,  particularly  older,  high-fuel-consuming  air-
craft, we’re saving money on that side of things. We, unfortunately, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Mar 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80048.TXT JACKIE

54 

are  also  having  to  let  go  of  a  number  of  employees  in  the  process, 
also essential to save costs—— 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. Adding on to the problem that—— 
Mr. MEENAN.—and—— 
Senator ROCKEFELLER.—I’m discussing. 
Mr. MEENAN. In some sense, adding to the problem, but, the net 
effect  will  be  fewer  seats  in  the  market,  which,  over  time,  should 
help  raise  the  price  of  those  seats.  Because  one  of  the  problems 
we’re  suffering  from  in  the  United  States  is  that  we  have  condi-
tioned  the  public  to  expect  that  air  service  will  be  very  cheap.  We 
don’t  necessarily  think  that—unfortunately,  we  have  focused  so 
much  on  price  that  we  have  really  undermined  the  industry.  We 
don’t  have  an  economically  viable  airline  industry  in  the  United 
States  at  this  point.  And  what  we’re  trying  to  do  is  re-establish  a 
robust,  viable  industry  that  will  be  able  to  provide  service  to  large 
communities, to small communities, to states, as you say, that don’t 
have the level of service that they’d like to see. But, in order to do 
that,  we  need  to  have  economically  strong  airlines.  And  we  don’t. 
And it’s a whole complex of issues that have affected us over dec-
ades,  at  this  point,  and  it’s  going  to  take  a  long  time  to  dig  out  of 
the  situation  that  we’re  in.  But,  we  think  the  place  to  start,  from 
our  perspective,  is  at  least  to  try  to  get  at  this  fuel  speculation 
problem, sooner rather than later, to send the message to the mar-
kets, as well, that more supply can be developed, will be developed, 
and that other energy sources are being pursued. All of that should 
help  to  tamp  down  the  unhealthy  level  of  speculation  in  the  mar-
ket,  because,  frankly,  we  don’t  see  demand  having  changed  dra-
matically  in  the  last  year  to  year  and  a  half  in  the  United  States, 
and yet, price has gone up tremendously. 

So,  there’s  a  disconnect  between  supply-and-demand  and  the 
price of the product at this point, and we think speculation is part 
of that problem. 

Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  And  I  agree  with  that.  I  agree  with  that. 
I  haven’t  heard  your  passion  about  it,  the  new  air  traffic  control 
system, digitalized. I’d like to hear it. 

Mr.  MEENAN.  We  have  a  great  passion  for  that,  Senator.  As  you 
know, ATA has been in the forefront of efforts to push that agenda 
along.  We  very  much  appreciate  working  with  both  you  and  Sen-
ator  Stevens  on  it.  We  are  absolutely  there.  It’s  essential  to  fuel 
savings  in  the  future.  It’s  essential  to  the  traffic  we  see  coming  in 
the  next  several  years.  There’s  no  question  we  want  to  get  that 
done.  But,  I  will  say  that,  in  the  current  environment,  we  are  dis-
tracted. Survival is the first instinct, I think, that we’re seeing the 
airlines  focus  on  at  this  point,  but  we  are—we  are  right  there  on 
the  need  for  air  traffic  modernization,  and  we  will  not  let  up  on 
that until it gets done. 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. I thank you. 
And, Senator Stevens? 
Senator STEVENS. I really don’t have any further questions. 
Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  Well,  think  one  up,  because  you’re  good 

at it. 

Senator  STEVENS.  No,  I’m  interested  in  the  future  generation, 
too,  but  I  think  we  need  money  before  we  can  do  that,  and  I  don’t 
think  we  can  get  the  money  to  fight  this  current  fuel  crisis  and 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Mar 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80048.TXT JACKIE

55 

modernization  at  the  same  time.  So,  it  has  to  be  something  that’s 
put  off.  I  do  think  that  we  ought  to  find  some  way  right  now  to 
reassure  the  public  that  the  increasing  numbers  of  planes  is  not 
going—is not going to strain and stress this current system. I think 
the  current  system  can  handle  it  for  a  few  years.  But,  the  main 
thing to do is find some way to deal with this fuel price. That’s my 
comment. 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. OK, so be it. 
Senator STEVENS. Senator Pryor is here. 
Senator ROCKEFELLER. Senator Pryor? 

STATEMENT OF HON. MARK PRYOR, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM ARKANSAS 

Senator  PRYOR.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  And  thank  you  for 

doing this. And thank both of you for your leadership on this. 

Mr. Krakowski, let me ask you, if I may, and that is—a little bit 
of  a  follow-up  on  Senator  Rockefeller’s  questions  a  few  moments 
ago, where he talked about—the perception is—by the flying public, 
is  that  a  lot  of  these  delays  are  caused  by  mechanical  issues  and 
crew  issues  with  the  airlines.  How  good  are  we  about  keeping  up 
with those statistics, where we can actually pinpoint why we’re see-
ing so many delays today? 

Mr.  KRAKOWSKI.  Yes,  the  Air  Traffic  Organization  concentrates 
mostly  on  the  air  traffic-related  delays  due  to  weather  or  airport 
capacity  issues,  things  like  that.  We  typically  don’t  track  crew, 
flight attendant, mechanical issues for the airlines. 

Senator  PRYOR.  And  so,  as  an  example,  you  know,  there’s  been 
some  announcements—and,  again,  some  of  this  is  based  on  just 
general  perception—that  the  airlines  have  gone  through  staffing 
cuts  in  order  to  become  lean  and  trim  down  their  workforce.  And, 
I  think,  when  you  go  to  that  lean-type  system,  you’re  just  one  em-
ployee  away  from  not—from  having  to  cancel  a  flight  or  having  to 
delay a flight substantially. But, you all do not track that all? 

Mr. KRAKOWSKI. No, sir. 
Senator PRYOR. Does anyone track that, as far as we know? 
Mr.  DUVALL.  Yes,  Senator,  the—obviously,  the  Bureau  of  Trans-
portation  Statistics  at  the  Department  collects  data  on  delays  in 
this  area.  As  was  noted  by  GAO,  there  are  some  data  gaps  associ-
ated  with  that,  that  we’re  working  to  fill  now.  But,  I  think  we’ve 
got  more  granularity  today  than  we’ve  ever  had,  but  GAO’s  com-
ments are well taken, that we need to keep improving the tracking 
of the source of the delays. 

Senator  PRYOR.  Do  you  know—do  you  have  those  stats  handy?  I 
mean, do you have a sense of—in terms of percentages, of what has 
caused this? 

Mr. DUVALL. We can get you that. And they’re putting out, basi-
cally,  monthly  data  on  this  that—we  can  get  you  the  most  up-to- 
date on that. I do not have that handy—— 

Senator  PRYOR.  OK.  I  would  like,  if  you  could,  to  follow  up  with 

the Committee on that. 

[The information referred to follows:] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Mar 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80048.TXT JACKIE

U.S.  Department  of  Transportation/Research  and  Innovative  Technology 

Administration—Bureau of Transportation Statistics 

56 

Source:  Bureau  of  Transportation  Statistics,  Airline  Service  Quality  Per-
formance 234. 
A  flight  is  considered  delayed  when  it  arrived  15  or  more  minutes  later 
than  the  schedule.  Delayed  minutes  are  calculated  for  delayed  flights  only. 
When multiple causes are assigned to one delayed flight, each cause is pro-
rated based on delayed minutes it is responsible for. The displayed numbers 
are rounded and may not add up to the total. 
Air  Carrier  Delay:  The  cause  of  the  cancellation  or  delay  was  due  to  cir-
cumstances within the airline’s control (e.g., maintenance or crew problems, 
aircraft cleaning, baggage loading, fueling. etc.). 
Aircraft  Arriving  Late:  A  previous  flight  with  same  aircraft  arrived  late. 
causing the present flight to depart late. 
Security  Delay:  Delays  or  cancellations  caused  by  evacuation  of  a  terminal 
or concourse, re-boarding of aircraft because of security breach, inoperative 
screening equipment and/or long lines in excess of 29 minutes at screening 
areas. 
National  Aviation  System  (NAS)  Delay:  Delays  and  cancellations  attrib-
utable  to  the  national  aviation  system  that  refer  to  a  broad  set  of  condi-
tions,  such  as  non-extreme  weather  conditions,  airport  operations,  heavy 
traffic volume, and air traffic control. 
Extreme  Weather:  Significant  meteorological  conditions  (actual  or  fore-
casted)  that,  in  the  judgment  of  the  carrier,  delays  or  prevents  the  oper-
ation of a flight such as tornado, blizzard or hurricane. 

Senator  PRYOR.  And,  Mr.  Reynolds,  let  me  ask  about  Essential 
Air Service. This is something that I’ve heard Senator Stevens talk 
about  many  times—and  others  on  this  Committee  talk  about  Es-
sential  Air  Service  and  how  important  it  is  to  rural  communities. 
And what’s happened in our state is, basically, we have one Essen-
tial  Air  Service  carrier  who’s  announced  that  they’re  going  to  dis-
continue  all  their  service  to  our  EAS  airports.  I  guess  I  would  like 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Mar 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80048.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e
.
1
A
T
R
5
1
7

I

57 

to  hear  your  thoughts  on  how  we  can  improve  the  Essential  Air 
Service program and how we can make sure it’s viable into the fu-
ture, especially given this fuel environment we’re in right now. 

Mr. DUVALL. Thanks, Senator. Mr. Reynolds is out sick today, so 

I’m his substitute. 

There’s  no  question  the  EAS  program  is  undergoing  serious 
strain right now and there are a lot of communities that have been 
impacted.  I  think  our  view  has  been—prior  to  talking  about  addi-
tional  funding,  which  is  always,  kind  of,  where  the  conversation 
goes, we need to talk about the structure of the program and really 
identify  what  it  is  that  we’re  trying  to  achieve.  And  I  think—first 
and  foremost,  I  think  it’s  access  for  the  most  remote  communities. 
And we need to be clear about which of the—you know, who those 
communities  are.  Obviously,  there  are  some  communities,  in  our 
view,  that  are  closer  to  major  airports  than  others,  and,  frankly, 
have  better  access  than  others.  And  I  think,  given  the  scarcity  of 
resources  under  any  dollar  amount,  we  need  to  be  clear,  kind  of, 
about which communities we want to serve. 

I  think  the  other  thing  is,  we  need  some  flexibility  in  the  pro-
gram  to  alter  aircraft  types.  The  type  of  aircraft  that’s  been  used 
in  the  EAS  program  to  date  is  an  increasingly  scarce  kind  of  air-
craft,  19-seaters.  There  are  more  that—those  are  not  frequently 
made  anymore.  There’s  a  lot  of  international  competition  for  those 
planes.  And  so,  I  think  the  program  structure  needs  to  be  a  little 
more  accommodating  to  allow,  I’d  say,  more  flexible  types  of  serv-
ices. Obviously, all—on all air service, but obviously smaller planes 
may  be  cheaper  to  acquire.  We  don’t  want  to  be  flying  planes,  you 
know,  with  two  and  three  people  on,  you  know,  20-seaters  if  we 
could accommodate it with smaller, more effective planes. 

I  guess  the  basic  view  is  that  there  are  some  fundamental 
changes  about  the  policy  of  the  program  that  we’d  like  to  talk  to 
you  about.  We  recognize  that  there  are  continued  funding  pres-
sures,  and  there’s  no  doubt  that  the  fuel  prices  are  a  major  source 
of changing economics in the industry. 

Senator PRYOR. First of all—— 
Ms. FLEMING. Senator, may I—— 
Senator PRYOR. Yes, go ahead, please. 
Ms. FLEMING. I just wanted to let you know that we have a study 
underway  for  the  House  Transportation  and  Infrastructure  Com-
mittee  that  is  looking  at  the  Essential  Air  Service  program,  but, 
more  broadly,  looking  for  options  to  make  sure  that  the  small  and 
medium  communities  are  connected  to  the  larger  transportation 
network. 

Senator PRYOR. OK. 
Ms. FLEMING. So, we’d be happy to brief you, if you’re interested 

in that—— 

Senator PRYOR. Do you know when that study will be—— 
Ms.  FLEMING.—we  just  got  it  underway,  and  are  in  the  very 
early  stages,  but,  we’d  be  happy  to  come  up  and  talk  to  you  about 
our objectives and time frames. 

Senator  PRYOR.  Yes,  we  would  like  for  you  to  do  that  when  it’s 

convenient for you, when it’s the appropriate time for it. 

Mr.  Duvall,  one  of  the  things  in  your  answer  that  concerns  me 
a little bit is, you talk about restructuring, which I understand you 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Mar 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80048.TXT JACKIE

58 

need to evaluate and look at everything, but you talked about how 
some  communities  are  more  rural  and  more  remote  than  others. 
And it sounds to me like what you’re saying is that the Administra-
tion is working on a policy, maybe, where there’s a certain number 
of  miles  that,  if  you’re  away  from  a  larger  airport,  you  just 
shouldn’t qualify for EAS. Is that right? 

Mr. DUVALL. Yes, I mean, our budget proposal this year was ba-

sically beyond 70 miles the number we put in our budget. 

Senator  PRYOR.  Well,  we’ll—I  think  it’s  very  important  that  we 
keep  EAS  viable.  And,  again,  I  know  it’s  important  to  Members  of 
the Committee. 

Ms. Fleming, let me ask you, if I may, If fuel prices remain high, 
which  nobody’s  telling  us  that  they’re  going  down  anytime  soon, 
and  the  number  of  flights  decrease  along  with  the,  you  know,  in-
creased cost of flying, what impact will that have on the airport im-
provement program and on the passenger facility charges? 

Ms.  FLEMING.  We  haven’t  looked  at  that  in  great  detail.  That’s 
something  we  could  look  at  for  you,  but  it’s  not  something  we’ve 
looked at right now. 

Senator  PRYOR.  Well,  I  mean,  it  seems  to  me  that  if  you  have 
fewer  passengers  and  flying  fewer  miles,  you’re—it’s  going  to  im-
pact  those  programs.  I  mean,  it’s  kind  of  like  the  Highway 
Fund—— 

Ms. FLEMING. Right. 
Senator PRYOR.—you know, if people drive less, there’s not going 

to be the revenue—— 

Ms. FLEMING. You would think so. 
Senator PRYOR.—going into the fund. I would like you to keep an 

eye on that. 

And  also,  I  know—again,  with  highways,  you’ve  seen  the  cost  of 
construction, just, go up a lot in the last few years. I mean, they’ve 
gone way beyond what normal inflation would be. Is that also true 
with the airport construction? 

Ms. FLEMING. You’re asking me? 
Senator PRYOR. Yes. 
Ms. FLEMING. Oh. 
Senator PRYOR. You—— 
Ms. FLEMING. I don’t know. I don’t know the—— 
Senator PRYOR. Mr. Duvall, do you—— 
Mr.  DUVALL.  Yes.  The  answer  is  absolutely  yes.  I  mean,  the  air-
ports  are  facing  financial  strains  that  they  have  not  faced  histori-
cally, both with construction costs and credit costs. Obviously, cred-
it markets disrupt municipal financing, just like they impact every-
thing  else.  And  so,  there’s  no  question  that  the  airports  are  under 
serious strain right now. 

Senator PRYOR. And, Mr. Duvall, it seems to me that, again, with 
this  high  fuel  cycle  that  we’re  in  right  now,  my  guess  is,  the  hub 
cities  and  hub  airports,  by  and  large,  will  see  a  little  less  traffic, 
but,  you  know,  roughly  the  same  amount  of  traffic,  but  my  guess 
is,  you’ll  see  fewer  planes  flying  through  the  spokes,  so  to  speak. 
And  so,  the  smaller  airports,  like  the  Little  Rock  Airport  or  the 
XNA  airport,  which  is  up  in  northwest  Arkansas,  they  will  prob-
ably have fewer flights going into the hubs. Is that your prediction? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Mar 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80048.TXT JACKIE

59 

Mr. DUVALL. You know, I think it’s going to be a market-to-mar-
ket  analysis  by  the  carriers.  There’ll  be  some  growth  markets  in 
which  it  would  make  economic  sense  for  them  to  expand  service; 
and obviously the overall demand pressures, though, you know, the 
price  pressures  in  the  industry  are  such  that  there  will  be  some 
network  reorientation,  as  was  discussed  already.  So,  obviously  the 
pressures  are  going  to  be  felt,  as  was  noted,  in  the  smaller  and 
mid-sized communities, but there will be some growth areas of the 
country in which carriers see great business opportunities and will 
continue to maintain service there. 

Senator PRYOR. That’s all I have, Mr. Chairman. Thank you. 
Senator ROCKEFELLER. Thank you, Senator Pryor. 
A  question,  to  Ms.  Fleming  and  Mr.  Krakowski,  on  LaGuardia, 
on  that  general  situation.  I  think,  at  LaGuardia,  that  one  out  of 
every  four  flights  is  delayed  at  least  1  hour.  And  so,  that’s  a  prob-
lem, as everything is up there. American, for reasons which are not 
entirely clear to me, pulled out and opened up, what, 84 slots? That 
should help. But, it certainly won’t help if others come in and take 
up  those  slots,  by  auction  or  otherwise.  And  so,  I  have  two  ques-
tions  to  ask  you.  Is  it  your  plan  to  keep  those  84  slots  unfilled,  so 
the  efficiency  is  greater,  but  then,  on  the  other  hand,  if  American 
changes its mind and decides to come back in, will they be able to? 
Mr.  KRAKOWSKI.  Actually,  on  those  slot  questions,  I  think  Mr. 

Duvall will—— 

Mr. DUVALL. Yes. I mean, I—— 
Mr. KRAKOWSKI.—answer. 
Mr. DUVALL.—obviously, American’s press release—you know, re-
mains  to  be  seen  exactly,  kind  of,  how  they’re  going  to  implement 
what  they  propose,  so  I  think  we’re  in  kind  of  a  wait-and-observe 
period  here  with  the  existing  slots  at  LaGuardia.  We  have—the 
proposed  rulemaking’s  comment  period  closed.  We  received  com-
ments from virtually everybody in the industry, and others, on that 
proposal.  The  proposal  included  a  mechanism  to  bring  down  some 
capacity—basically,  a  2-percent  reduction  in  overall  slots.  So, 
there’s  no  question,  in  our  view,  that  there  are  continual  chronic 
delay  problems  at  that  airport  that  need  to  be  addressed,  and  I 
think, as we go through the finalization of that rulemaking process, 
we’re going to try to address that issue. So—— 

Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  Which  doesn’t  answer  my  question,  does 

it? 

Mr.  DUVALL.  Well,  I  think  the  question  is—well,  I  assume  the 
question  was,  do  you  think  we  need  to  reduce  the  caps  at 
LaGuardia? Is that—— 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. Well, American has done that for you. 
Mr.  DUVALL.  Well,  American’s  announcement  for  later  in  the 
year  obviously  has  not  yet  been  fulfilled.  It’s  unclear  exactly  how 
they’re going to fly. They’re not, obviously, obligated, by their press 
release,  to  fly.  They  currently  have  rights  at  the  airport  that  we 
have not proposed to take away. 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. No, I understand that. But, if they follow 
through in what they say they’re going to do, are you going to hold 
those, not to be returned to others or auctioned to others? 

Mr.  DUVALL.  Yes,  Senator,  I  think  our—we’re  going  to  have  to 
assess,  kind  of,  exactly  what  they  do  when  they  do  it.  And  there’s 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Mar 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80048.TXT JACKIE

60 

no  question,  as  you’ve  said,  that  we  have  a  chronic  delay  problem 
at that airport, so we’ll need to assess the availability of those slots 
with  the  overall  desire  by  the  Administration  and,  I  think,  sound 
economic  policy  to  allow  competition  and  entry  into  that  market-
place.  We’ve  obviously  got  a  balance  of  policy  interests  there,  and 
we’ll try to achieve both. 

Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  I  sense  a  substantial  difference  between 
you  and  Mr.  Krakowski,  on  auctioning  of  slots,  and  the  other  two 
witnesses at the table. I sense it’s a rather strong disagreement. 

Mr.  DUVALL.  I  don’t  sense  it  with  Hank,  but  I  don’t  know  about 

the other two. 

Mr. KRAKOWSKI. I just try to operate it, sir. 
Senator ROCKEFELLER. OK. All right. 
Could you address their obvious hostility to this? 
Mr. DUVALL. Yes. I mean, there’s—obviously the proposal to take 
a  very  small  amount  of  capacity  at  the  three  New  York  area  air-
ports was obviously driven by a desire to balance the historical in-
vestments  that  have  been  made  by  the  carriers  at  these—at  the 
various  facilities  with  the  desire  to  not  pursue  a  policy  of  simply 
capping an airport, and leaving it capped, and prohibiting the abil-
ity of new entrants and competition at those airports. Cap—simply 
capping  an  airport,  without  allowing  access,  will  ultimately  drive 
up  prices,  diminish  throughput,  and  create  economic  inefficiencies. 
We  proposed,  in  our  rulemaking,  basically  a  balance  to  recognize, 
for  the  first  time,  basically,  a  property  right  in  this—in  all  three 
facilities,  for  the  incumbent  carriers,  that  they  do  not  have  today, 
in  exchange  for,  as  we  said,  a  very  small  sliver  of  capacity  to  be 
allowed  to—to  either  the  carriers,  themselves,  who  had  the  least 
interest—who wanted to bid on that, or others who wanted to enter 
the  airport.  As  an  economics  matter,  locking  down  the  New  York 
area  entirely,  through  government-imposed  caps,  is  a  really  bad 
long-run  policy,  both  for  New  York  City  and  for  the  Nation’s  air-
space.  And  so,  we  tried  to  balance  the  interests,  as  we  said,  of  the 
incumbent investments and the desire to allow competition, and it’s 
a—we  think  we  struck  a  good  balance;  but  we’re  reviewing  the 
comments,  and  the  comments  were  quite  strong,  as  you  can  imag-
ine. 

Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  Do  you  regard  the  right  of  a  737  pri-
vately-owned general aviation jet to land at a crowded airport any-
where  to  be  on  an  exact  par  with  a  legacy  airline’s  right  to  do  so? 
Mr.  DUVALL.  Yes.  I  think  our  view  is  that—as  we  expressed,  I 
think,  in  the  reauthorization  proposal,  that  obviously  you  were  a 
strong leader on, is that the—ultimately, the question of—it should 
be  driven  by  the  costs  that  these  planes  are  imposing,  not  nec-
essarily,  you  know,  who’s  onboard.  The  ultimate  objective  is  to  in-
crease  throughput,  given  available  capacity  today,  and  to  have 
charges reflect the true costs of using these facilities. 

So,  as  you  point  out,  flying  into  a  heavily  congested  airport  at 
peak  times  is  one  of  the  most  expensive  things  to  the  entire  air 
traffic control system, to our management of aviation in the United 
States.  And  currently,  charges  do  not  reflect  those  costs.  So,  as 
with  any  commodity  that’s  underpriced,  you’re  going  to  get  too 
much of it, relative to existing supply. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Mar 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80048.TXT JACKIE

61 

Mr.  Meenan  referred  to  the  textbook.  It  is  a  textbook  result, 
when  you  have  a  supply-and-demand  imbalance,  that,  basically,  if 
you do not price that supply-and-demand imbalance, the imbalance 
will persist, absent some other allocation mechanism. 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. So, you think that paying for our current 
analog  air  traffic  control  system,  where  the  legacy  airlines  pay  for 
approximately  92  percent  of  the  cost  and  general  aviation  pays  for 
8 percent, is—would you call that out of balance? 

Mr. DUVALL. Yes. As our proposal reflected, we think the costs— 
the  charges  need  to  reflect  the  true  costs,  and  that  the  current 
mechanism is out of balance, yes. 

Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  Your  question  was  accurate,  it  was  lack-

ing in passion, however. 

Mr. DUVALL. I’m very passionate about—— 
Senator ROCKEFELLER. Thank you. My—— 
[Laughter.] 
Ms. FLEMING. Mr.—— 
Senator ROCKEFELLER.—final question is—— 
Ms. FLEMING. Mr. Chairman, may I respond—— 
Senator ROCKEFELLER. Please. 
Ms.  FLEMING.—to  your  comment?  I  don’t  want  to  GAO  to  be  on 
record  that  we’re  hostile  to  the  slot  auctions.  We  feel  that  DOT 
hasn’t  fully  demonstrated  how  the  auctions  will  reduce  congestion 
and delays. But, there are more pragmatic questions as to how the 
auctions  will  be  structured  and  DOT’s  legal  authority  for  imple-
menting the auctions. 

I’d also like to point out that, as you know, developing an auction 
system  is  very,  very  complex,  and  it’s  an  iterative  process,  as  we 
saw with FCC’s spectrum auctions. 

So, I just wanted to clarify, that we’re not necessarily hostile, but 
we  think  some  things  need  to  be  further  outlined  before  DOT  pro-
ceeds in this manner. 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. I appreciate that. I appreciate that. 
Final  question  from  me.  You  had  a  conference  with  O’Hare  car-
riers  and  JFK  carriers.  Is  that  correct?  You  got  them  all  together 
to  discuss,  you  know,  soliciting  more  schedule  reductions  in  order 
to improve reliability in the airport. You had—you met with them. 

Mr. KRAKOWSKI. We’ve had conferences, yes. 
Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  You  have  not  had  one  regarding 
LaGuardia Airport. Am I overreacting to that, or is that something 
that you plan to do? 

Mr. DUVALL. You—are you referring to the ARC—the rulemaking 

committee that we have formed? 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. Yes. 
Mr. DUVALL. Yes. I mean, LaGuardia obviously was discussed at 
that.  The  primary  focus  was  JFK  and  Newark,  but  LaGuardia 
clearly  came  up.  And  we  have  had  a  Notice  of  Proposed—Supple-
mental Notice of Proposed Rulemaking on the street for, now, over 
3  years.  LaGuardia  has  been  a  chronic  problem,  obviously.  There 
have  been  discussions  about  LaGuardia,  with  the  airline  industry, 
going  on,  you  know,  25  years  now,  and  those  conversations  are 
pretty regular. 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. Response, Mr. Meenan? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Mar 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80048.TXT JACKIE

62 

Mr.  MEENAN.  Just  to  be  clear,  we  are  very  disappointed  in  the 
direction the Department has taken. We think there are far better 
means  at  its  disposal  to  address  the  delay  situation  in  New  York. 
As I said in my prepared statement, as well in my oral statement, 
we  think  that,  particularly  at  this  time,  to  be  experimenting  with 
all  of  these  new  concepts  at  a  time  when  the  industry  is  an  abso-
lute  nosedive,  is  just  the  wrong  direction  to  go.  And  we  intend  to 
do  everything  we  can  to  vindicate  our  position  in  that.  We  think 
there are better ways to address it. We have offered those, for well 
over  a  year,  up  in  New  York.  We’ve  been  engaged  in  this  debate 
with  the  FAA,  not  for  25  years,  but  for  40  years,  with  slots  at 
LaGuardia. 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. All right. We have a vote at 11:15. It has 

not started yet, but it’s obviously about to start. 

Senator Stevens, do you have—I believe you do have more ques-

tions. 

Senator STEVENS. Well, I have, just, a general question for all of 
you. Do you see any provision of existing law that’s an impediment 
to you doing what must be done now to meet this crisis, the energy 
crisis and the crisis of, really, congestion on airports? 

Mr. DUVALL. In terms of—I mean, clearly, as we proposed in the 
reauthorization, we think a massive modernization of the air traffic 
control system is—— 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. Well, that’s modernization. 
Mr. DUVALL. Yes. 
Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  What—is  there  any  impediment  in  exist-

ing law that says you can’t do what you’d like to do right now? 

Mr.  DUVALL.  I  think—obviously,  our  view  is  that  airports  gen-
erally—and we just announced a rates and charges policy change— 
need to be considering different charging approaches and expansion 
approaches,  and  we  think  that  we  have  regulatory  authority  for 
airlines  to  pursue  that.  So,  I  think,  the  short  answer  is:  not  huge 
impediments.  There  are  some  tweaks  and  changes,  I  think,  to  ex-
isting statutes that would be helpful. 

One  area,  I  think,  that  is  significant,  that  has  not  received 
enough  attention  is  the  time  it  takes  to  deliver  major  capacity 
projects.  And  I  think,  obviously,  the  Committee  bill  talked  a  little 
bit  about  environmental  processes,  but  I  think  we  have  a  funda-
mental  problem,  that  we  cannot  deliver,  even  if  we  had  a  massive 
increase  in  spending,  the  types  of  capacity  projects,  under  the  cur-
rent legal construct, to deliver these projects. 

So,  I  would  encourage  the  Committee  to  continue  looking  for 
ways  to  give  authority  to  the  agency  to—and  I  wouldn’t  say 
‘‘streamline,’’  because  I  think  these  projects  actually  deliver  sub-
stantial  environmental  benefits.  And  I  think  the  nexus  of  new  ca-
pacity  and  environmental  benefits  is  one  we  need  to  make  a  lot 
more  clear.  But,  to  deliver  projects—if  it  takes  10  to  15  years  to 
deliver  a  major  runway  capacity  project,  which  is  what  we’re  look-
ing  at  today,  you  will  see  substantial  impacts,  obviously,  on  the 
economy,  felt  by  that.  And  I  think  our  view  is,  we  can  mitigate 
these  impacts  much  more  effectively  today  than  we  could  10  years 
ago, but it does require some legal changes to those processes. 

Senator STEVENS. Well, it would seem to me the system ought to 
be  reviewed  right  now  to  find  out  whether  there  are  excessive 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Mar 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80048.TXT JACKIE

63 

charges imposed upon those providing air transportation. The costs 
of  fuel  are  rising.  I  certainly  don’t  see  any  reason  to  have  an  auc-
tion that would require people to pay more than they’re paying now 
for  the  slots  they  need.  But,  I’m—I  would  be  interested  in  finding 
out what fees and charges are involved in this system, that are col-
lected by local governments, by states, and by the Federal Govern-
ment, that could be suspended right now to give these people some 
chance to succeed. 

The system is just overburdened by the cost of getting permission 
from  the  various  entities  to  use  the  airways.  And  we  want  to  sus-
pend  the  gas  tax,  we  want  to  suspend  various  other  things.  Why 
shouldn’t  we  suspend  some  of  these  costs  right  now  and  give  the 
airlines a chance to survive? I’d hate to walk from here to Seattle. 

[Laughter.] 
Mr. DUVALL. We’d be happy to look at all the existing fees. Obvi-
ously, we—the fees are being used to generate revenues for capital 
investments,  and  those  capital  investments  are  critical  to  sus-
taining the existing system. So, as we indicated in our proposal, we 
think a complete overhaul of that fee structure is needed, and per-
haps,  in  considering  that  overhaul,  we  could  look  at  some  fees—— 
Senator  STEVENS.  An  overhaul  is  one  thing.  Suspension  of  them 
during  a  crisis  is  an  entirely  different  thing.  I—somehow  or  other, 
I  have  the  feeling—and  we’ve  talked  about  it  here—legacy  airlines 
are  going  to  be  a  thing  of  the  past  unless  they  get  some  relief. 
That’s  my  judgment.  I  hope  you  have  the  same  attitude  and  will 
find some way to give them some relief. 

Mr. DUVALL. I mean, I—Senator, the impact on fuel prices is ob-
viously difficult to overstate, and it’s—the dramatic impact is being 
felt,  obviously,  across  all  sectors,  and  the  aviation  sector  is  being 
hit as hard as any. 

I do think oil supply is fundamental to this, and, you know, in— 
in  response  to  some  of  the  comments  about  speculation,  it—obvi-
ously, in our view, it’s not clear that that’s the fundamental cause. 
You  look  at  the  exchange-traded  commodities,  versus  the  commod-
ities  that  are  not  exchange-traded;  you’ve  seen  substantial  rises  in 
both sides. We’ve seen a commodities boom that’s worldwide. 

Senator  STEVENS.  Well,  you  tell  me  how  one  institutional  inves-
tor  ends  up  with  the  same  piece  of  paper  on  oil  futures,  and  tell 
me that’s not collusion. 

Mr.  DUVALL.  I—I  mean,  I’m  not  going  to  comment  on  that.  All 

I’m going to say is that—— 

Senator STEVENS. That’s speculation. No, I think—— 
Mr. DUVALL.—we need more oil—we need more energy—— 
Senator STEVENS.—the Administration’s got its head in the sand 
on speculation. We must find some way to control that speculation. 

Thank you. 
Senator ROCKEFELLER. And on that note—— 
[Laughter.] 
Senator  ROCKEFELLER.—I  thank  all  of  you  very  much  for  your 
courtesy.  I’m  somewhat  embarrassed  that  there  was  not  a  greater 
turnout,  but  that,  in  and  of  itself,  Mr.  Meenan,  is  one  of  the  prob-
lems that the aviation industry faces. 

Mr. MEENAN. Yes. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Mar 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00067 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80048.TXT JACKIE

64 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. There is not enough understanding of the 
intricacies  and  the  perils  involved  with  aviation  in  this  Congress. 

Mr. MEENAN. Yes. 
Senator ROCKEFELLER. And this morning, in spite of Senator Ste-
vens  being  here,  and  two  others,  it’s  a  symbolism  of  absence  that 
disturbs me. 

Mr. MEENAN. Senator, thank you. 
Senator ROCKEFELLER. I thank you. 
And this hearing is adjourned. 
[Whereupon, at 11:25 a.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Mar 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00068 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80048.TXT JACKIE

A P P E N D I X 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. BARBARA BOXER, U.S. SENATOR FROM CALIFORNIA 
As  the  summer  2008  travel  season  approaches,  American  consumers  face  many 

frustrations when it comes to this year’s annual family vacation. 

I  am  sympathetic  to  the  challenges  faced  by  the  airline  industry  as  it  struggles 
to  deal  with  record  oil  prices  topping  $147  per  barrel.  I  am  also  deeply  troubled  by 
the  many  workers  who  are  losing  their  jobs  and  the  cities  facing  service  reductions 
in the wake of rising fuel prices. 

However,  rising  fuel  prices  have  also  made  the  cost  of  flying  prohibitively  expen-
sive  for  many  families,  as  airlines  have  instituted  new  charges  for  everything  from 
beverages  served  in  flight,  to  fees  for  checked  luggage,  to  increased  prices  for  seat 
selection. 

In addition to increased charges, many Americans did not have pleasant flying ex-
periences in 2007. Last year was the second worst year on record for airline delays. 
Domestic  flights  were  delayed  26  percent  of  the  time,  and  in  some  instances,  con-
sumers spent several hours stranded in airplanes on the tarmac. 

As  Americans  prepare  for  another  season  of  packed  airports  and  delayed  flights, 
objections from our friends on the other side of the aisle have prevented the passage 
of legislation that could alleviate many of these headaches. 

The FAA Reauthorization bill includes several key provisions aimed at improving 
the  quality  of  air  travel.  This  important  legislation  includes  additional  funding  to 
modernize the air traffic system, several measures to increase safety and incentives 
to hire and retain more of our valuable air traffic controllers. 

The  bill  also  includes  a  provision  I  authored  along  with  Senator  Snowe  requiring 
airlines  to  provide  adequate,  food,  water,  and  medical  care  to  passengers  trapped 
on  grounded  aircraft.  Our  Passenger  Bill  of  Rights  would  also  allow  passengers  to 
deplane  after  3  hours  in  the  absence  of  a  DOT  approved  airline  contingency  plan. 
In March 2007, a Federal appeals court ruling struck down New York State’s Pas-
senger  Bill  of  Rights  law,  stating  it  is  up  to  the  Congress  to  set  a  national  Federal 
standard. 

Airline  passengers  deserve  access  to  food,  water,  and  medical  attention  when 
stranded  on  an  aircraft  tarmac  due  to  delays.  Congress  has  the  ability  now  to  en-
sure consumers’ fundamental rights are protected by enacting the Passenger Bill of 
Rights. 

As we head into another busy travel season, we have a golden opportunity to pro-
vide consumers and the airline industry with one less headache this summer by en-
acting the FAA Reauthorization and the Passenger Bill of Rights. 

Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. GORDON H. SMITH, U.S. SENATOR FROM OREGON 
I  wish  to  thank  Chairman  Rockefeller  and  Ranking  Member  Hutchinson  for 
scheduling  this  important  hearing.  We  are  in  the  midst  of  our  summer  travel  sea-
son,  and  travelers  are  once  again  paying  for  the  depressed  state  of  our  aviation  in-
dustry.  Similar  to  last  year,  flight  delays  are  at  all-time  highs.  Record  high  fuel 
prices  are  also  having  a  devastating  impact  on  the  Nation’s  airlines.  Fares  have 
risen, flights have been eliminated and extra charges are being added for everything 
from  baggage  to  bottled  water.  Worst  of  all,  several  small  and  mid-sized  commu-
nities  are  losing  service  because  of  the  airlines’  desire  to  cut  costs  by  reducing  ca-
pacity. 

Of course, when an airline decides to reduce capacity, those routes that are elimi-
nated first tend to serve smaller airports in the less populated areas of our country. 
These  service  reductions  negatively  impact  these  communities,  many  of  which  are 
dependent on air service to lure businesses, visitors and tourists. 

Recently,  Horizon  Airlines  announced  cutbacks  in  service  to  several  communities 
in Oregon. This October, the North Bend and Klamath Falls airports will lose their 

(65) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Mar 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00069 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80048.TXT JACKIE

66 

Horizon  service,  leaving  residents  with  fewer  options  and  higher  fares.  These  cuts 
will  also  cost  jobs  in  regions  of  my  state  that  can  not  easily  absorb  these  impacts. 
Both airports have some additional commercial service, but with a slowing economy, 
those who lose their jobs may struggle to find new employment. 

Horizon Airlines also tried to change the Essential Air Service Agreement in place 
to  provide  service  to  Pendleton,  Oregon.  Fortunately,  the  Department  of  Transpor-
tation rejected Horizon’s attempt to alter the agreement and is requiring the carrier 
to continue to provide service for now. When we have airlines attempting to change 
their year-old service contracts in a way that does not benefit the local community, 
we have a significant problem on our hands. 

Over  this  past  weekend,  Delta  Air  Lines  announced  it  was  going  to  discontinue 
service  to  Salem,  Oregon  in  October.  This  is  despite  the  City  of  Salem  assembling 
an impressive consortium of community and business groups’ support and investing 
millions  of  dollars  in  the  airport  to  help  lure  commercial  service.  That  service  will 
be discontinued a year after it began, and Oregon’s Capitol will no longer have com-
mercial air service. 

I  look  forward  to  working  with  members  of  this  Committee,  the  full  Senate  and 
the Administration to do more to protect essential air services for our smaller com-
munities.  While  all  travelers  are  feeling  the  negative  effects  of  the  financial  woes 
facing the airlines, the residents of smaller communities will feel the loss of air serv-
ice  more  acutely.  The  complete  elimination  of  commercial  air  service  is  a  severe 
blow  to  any  community’s  economy  and  future,  and  I  will  work  with  my  colleagues 
to prevent this from occurring in the future. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTION SUBMITTED BY HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE TO 

HON. TYLER D. DUVALL 

Question. The Administration has proposed auctioning off slots at New York City 
airports (LaGuardia, John F. Kennedy, and Newark Liberty airports) as part of the 
Federal Aviation Administration’s (FAA) larger effort to reduce congestion and delay 
at those airports. Can you please explain how slot auctions will help reduce conges-
tion  and  delay  at  the  New  York  City  airports  when  caps  have  already  been  placed 
on the total number of slots available at those airports? 

Answer.  In  addition  to  addressing  congestion,  the  Department  also  has  been 
tasked with encouraging competition and ensuring the efficient utilization of the na-
tional airspace. We issued a rule, that for the first time ever, gives the airlines cur-
rently operating at the airports the right to the vast majority of their current oper-
ations,  but  to  introduce  competition  and  allow  for  new  entrants,  we  are  proposing 
to  allocate  a  small  number  of  slots  via  auction.  Auctions  allow  for  new  entrants  to 
gain  an  entry  into  a  capped  airport,  increasing  competition,  which  has  proven  to 
lower fares and give consumers options. 

We  believe  that  the  introduction  of  a  modest  auction  mechanism  at  these  capac-
ity-constrained  airports  will  have  a  positive  effect  on  improving  efficiency.  For  one 
thing,  to  the  extent  that  access  to  the  airport  is  perceived  to  be  a  more  valuable 
commodity,  carriers  may  start  to  serve  the  market  more  efficiently  by  using  larger 
aircraft. 

In  fact,  analysis  done  by  the  FAA  to  support  the  proposed  rulemakings  shows  it 
will lead to more efficient allocation of aircraft, including upping the size of the air-
craft  on  some  flights  (up-gauging),  to  maximize  the  value  of  slots  leased  through 
auctions.  That  can  increase  passenger  ‘‘throughput’’  significantly,  especially  during 
weekday peak periods when demand is greatest. 

Under the current system, airlines choose to differentially price tickets during the 
day.  They  may  consider  continuing  this  practice  for  auctioned  slots,  to  absorb  auc-
tion  costs  during  peak  periods,  effectively  dispersing  some  passenger  traffic  to  the 
less  congested  periods  during  mid-day.  Another  beneficial  consequence  of  the  auc-
tion mechanism would be to encourage more efficient utilization of the existing air-
port  infrastructure  by  creating  a  vibrant  secondary  market  for  trading  slots  among 
carriers. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTION SUBMITTED BY HON. BARBARA BOXER TO 

HON. TYLER D. DUVALL 

Question.  DOT  opened  up  military  airspace  during  Thanksgiving  2007  to  accom-
modate  the  increased  air  travel,  which  was  deemed  a  success  by  your  Agency.  Will 
DOT consider opening up military airspace during the summer 2008 travel season? 
Answer. The Department has coordinated with the Department of Defense (DOD) 
for  the  availability  of  military  airspace  on  several  occasions  in  the  past,  including 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Mar 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00070 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80048.TXT JACKIE

67 

during the Thanksgiving and Christmas holidays of 2007 and Memorial Day Week-
end  this  past  spring.  The  Department  will  continue  to  consider  the  need  for,  and 
the availability of this option. 

The Department’s Federal Aviation Administration (FAA) is also expanding a pro-
gram  to  help  airlines  avoid  delays  by  adjusting  air  traffic  routes  to  respond  to 
weather  developments.  This  program  allows  us  to  work  around  weather  conditions 
and keep traffic moving. 

Æ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:21 Mar 25, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00071 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\GPO\DOCS\80048.TXT JACKIE

